12326097
Bullay
Bullay is an Ortsgemeinde  a municipality belonging to a Verbandsgemeinde, a kind of collective municipality  in the Cochem-Zell district in Rhineland-Palatinate, Germany. It belongs to the Verbandsgemeinde of Zell, whose seat is in the municipality of Zell an der Mosel. Geography  Location The municipality lies on the river Moselle across from Alf. History It is said to be certain that there was a Roman settlement within the limits of what is now Bullay, which had its first documentary mention as Buley infra Cell in 1150. From 1470 to 1550 there was mining in Bullay. Four baronial noble families held the lordship in the village: Zand von Merl, Boos von Waldeck, von Metzenhausen and von Kellenbach (later von Ladenberg). Beginning in 1794, Bullay lay under French rule. In 1815 it was assigned to the Kingdom of Prussia at the of Vienna. In 1879, the line was opened. Since 1946, it has been part of the then newly founded state of Rhineland-Palatinate. Under the Verwaltungsvereinfachungsgesetz (Administration Simplification Law) of 18 July 1970, with effect from 7 November 1970, the municipality was grouped into the Verbandsgemeinde of Zell. In 1993 came the highest ever floods in the region, the Christmas Flood (Weihnachtshochwasser), also known as the Flood of the Century (Jahrhunderthochwasser). Politics  Municipal council The council is made up of 16 council members, who were elected by representation at the municipal election held on 7 June 2009, and the honorary mayor as chairman.The municipal election held on 7 June 2009 yielded the following results(Kommunalwahl Rheinland-Pfalz 2009, Gemeinderat): Mayor Bullays mayor is Matthias Mller, and his deputies are Willi Schumacher, Oswald Menten and Thomas Scheidt(Bullays council). Coat of arms The municipalitys arms might be described thus: Quarterly, first sable a cramp bendwise argent, second argent a cross engrailed gules surmounted in chief by a label of three points of the first, third argent a lion rampant of the third, and fourth sable three annulets of the second. Culture and sightseeing  Buildings The following are listed buildings or sites in Rhineland-Palatinates Directory of Cultural Monuments:* Saint Magdalenes Catholic Parish Church (Pfarrkirche St. Maria Magdalena), Kirchstrae (monumental zone)  Gothic Revival church, 1871-1873, expansion in 1936; separate tower from 1952/53, altered in 1932* Alte Poststrae  Mary Magdalene chapel; open plastered building from 1657* Bahnhofsplatz  Bullay station; many-winged Late Historicist quarrystone railway station building, partly plastered, about 1905; whole complex with platforms* Bergstrae 20  stately villa, partly sided with wood, 1920s* Brautrockstrae 40  Renaissance Revival quarrystone building, about 1900* Eisenbahnbrcke  double-deck bridge, 1875-1878, renovated in 1928-1929, in 1945 partly destroyed, subsequentlly repaired* Im Tal  Wayside chapel; brick faade, about 1900* Lindenplatz 4  Baroque scalloped niche relief* Zehnthausstrae 8  former tithe house (?); three-floor timber-frame house, partly solid, hipped roof, from 1593, possibly remodelled in the 18th century* Zehnthausstrae 14  three-floor timber-frame house, partly solid, half-hipped roof, early 17th century* Zehnthausstrae 16  timber-frame house, partly solid, 17th century* Zehnthausstrae 32  three-floor timber-frame house, partly solid, plastered, 16th century* Zehnthausstrae 34  timber-frame house, partly solid, 17th century* Zehnthausstrae 36  timber-frame house, partly solid and slated, 18th or 19th century* Jewish graveyard  44 gravestones* northeast of the village  warriors memorial cross; iron, 19th century(Directory of Cultural Monuments in Cochem-Zell district)The double-deck bridge mentioned above is the Alf-Bullay bridge, which carries a roadway across the Moselle on the lower deck, and the Moselbahn  the Koblenz-Trier railway line  on the upper deck.Bullay also has an Environmental Railway Station that has been awarded an architectural prize by the state of Rhineland-Palatinate. Gallery File:Brcke Bullay Luftaufnahme 1945.jpg|Aerial view of Bullay from 1945File:Doppelstockbrcke Alf-Bullay 2010.jpg|Alf-Bullay double-deck bridgeFile:Mosel River at Bullay.jpg|The Moselle at BullayFile:Bullay-umweltbahnhof.JPG|Environmental Railway Station Economy and infrastructure  Transport Bullay is linked by the double-deck bridge to the Moselles left bank, and thereby to Bundesstraen 49 (towards Koblenz) and 53 (towards Trier).Bullay lies on the Koblenz-Trier line, completed in 1879, over which it is linked to the Bahn InterCity network. Furthermore, the ICE 856/855 stops daily towards 6:00 and 22:00 at Bullay (DB) station. This Environmental Railway Station is moreover the last station on the Moselweinbahn (Moselle Wine Railway) running between Bullay (DB) and Traben-Trarbach. From 1905 to 1961, another station, Bullay Sd, was the northern terminus of the Moselbahn running between Trier Nord and Bullay Sd. This line, however, was dismantled in 1961 and replaced with buses. The double-deck bridge, which carries the railway from the station to the Prinzenkopftunnel is a nationally known work of railway construction. Famous people  Sons and daughters of the town * Marcus Braun (b. 1971), writer References  External links * Municipalitys official webpage de:Bullayeo:Bullayfr:Bullayit:Bullaynl:Bullaypl:Bullaypt:Bullayro:Bullayru:sr:vi:Bullayvo:Bullaywar:Bullay
12348808
Claim_club
Claim clubs, also called Actual Settlers Associations or Squatters Clubs, were a nineteenth century phenomenon in the West. Usually operating within a confined local jurisdiction, these pseudo-governmental entities sought to regulate land sales in places where there was little or no legal apparatus to deal with land-related quarrels of any size.(Bogue, A. (1958) The Iowa Claim Clubs: Symbol and Substance, The Mississippi Valley Historical Review, 45(2). September. pp. 231) Some claim clubs sought to protect squatters, while others defended early land owners.(Pelzer, L. (1936) The Cattlemens Frontier. Glendale, CA: AR. Clark. p. 87.) In the twentieth century sociologists suggested that claim clubs were a pioneer adaptation of democratic bodies on the East Coast, including halls.(Hogan, R. (1987) Carnival and Caucus: A Typology for Comparative Frontier History, Social Science History, 11(2). Summer. p 147.)PurposeClaim clubs were essentially designed to do what politicians refused to do: Make land available to needy settlers.(Southwestern Social Science Association (1968) Social Science Quarterly, University of Texas. p. 21.) Their general purpose was to protect the first settlers to arrive on unclaimed lands, particularly in their rights to speculate and cultivate. With the continuous availability of frontier lands from the 1830s through the 1890s, settlers kept moving west. Each claim club established its own rules of governance and enforcement; however, these were almost always vigilante actions. Period accounts report that in some areas, claim clubs were regarded with the same majesty of the law of the Supreme Court of the United States.(Dilke, C.W. (2005) Greater Britain: A Record of Travel in English-Speaking Countries During 1866 and 1867. Cosimo, Inc. p. 167.)East Coast land speculators were prone to roam the recently opened United States and select the most desirable spots with the intent to outbid the settler and real claimant when the lands were offered for sale at the Land Office.((nd) Tidricks in Nineteenth Century America. Retrieved 7/19/07.) Claim jumpers were also a problem. Generally they sought to be present at a land sale when the first claimant was not there. In many cases, when people who claimed land and then did not live on it and had not developed it with a shelter, fencing or other structures, claim jumpers would move in. This was one scenario where claim clubs would enter. The absentee-owned land would be exploited directly and indirectly, or just simply seized with the title held by Claim Club. Members might vote expensive local improvements for the land, including roads and schoolhouses, and assign the heavy costs of development as a tax burden on the land held by absentees. This became the regular policy of some claim clubs, designed to force the sale by absentee owners to actual residents, or at least to local speculators.Claim clubs did not always protect the honest settler against the scheming speculator. Although claim club law sometimes shielded of the simple homesteader, it was also a tool and a weapon of the speculator. Claim clubs acted not only to protect a squatters title to land he lived on and was cultivating, but also to help the same squatter defend unoccupied second and third tracts against the claim of later arrivals.(Boorstin, D. (1967) The Americans: The national experience. pp. 73-78.)The institution of the claim club is said to have reached perfection in Iowa, where more than 100 such groups carefully regulated land commerce until the United States government intervened.(Clark, D.E. (1937) The West in American History. Thomas Y. Crowell Company. p. 321.)ExamplesThe first claim club in the United States was established by settlers around Iowa, where claims were formed soon after the Revolutionary War. These clubs were established in direct violation of federal law, in what Sterling Morton described as a Meeting (History of Nebraska from the Earliest Explorations of the Trans-Mississippi Region. Lincoln, NE: Western Publishing and Engraving Company. p. 188. Retrieved 7/15/07.)  According to one report, Such clubs sprang up as readily as did the sunflowers wherever the prairie sod was broken in Illinois, Wisconsin, Iowa, Minnesota, Nebraska...(Boorstin, D. (1967) The Americans: The national experience. pp. 73-78.) Other reports corroborate the spread of claim clubs, with their presence felt in the aforementioned states, as well as Mexico, Dakota, Wyoming, Montana, Colorado and Washington.(Rister, C.C. (1947) Western America: The Exploration, Settlement, and Development of the Region Beyond the Mississippi. Prentice-Hall, Inc. p. 307.)ColoradoIn City, Colorado, the El Paso Claim Club was formed by members of the Colorado City Town Company in 1859. The Club reportedly settled land disputes and recorded real property transactions until federal government regulations provided for an official land office in 1862.(Gunn, L. (nd) Early Forms of Civil Justice: The El Paso Claim Club (1859-1862), Old Colorado City Historical Society. Retrieved 7/18/07.) The Caon City (Colorado) Claim Club first platted the town of Caon City in 1860. The Club had six members, each of whom mined coal, iron, gypsum, marble and granite mining in the area,((nd) Cannon City Colorado. Retrieved 7/18/07.) and Denver also had a claim club.(Loyola, M. McNally, M.C. and McGill, E.L. (1922) The Opening of Iowa to Settlement and Its Development During the Territorial Period. of California. pp. 51-53.)NebraskaThe Claim Club was founded in 1854, the year the city was founded. Initially designed to protect the interests of 20 men, it grew to included almost two hundred settlers. The group used violent means to impose frontier justice, including dunking in the frozen River, running off legitimate settlers, and other forms of vigilantism. The club imposed their will on the Territorial Legislature as well, and with the passage of a territorial law granting  per settler, they doubled the federally-imposed limit of .(Morton, J. and Watkins, A. (1918) Nebraska Claim Meeting, History of Nebraska from the Earliest Explorations of the Trans-Mississippi Region. Lincoln, NE: Western Publishing and Engraving Company. p. 188. Retrieved 7/15/07.) The club ran Omaha until the Supreme Court ruled against their violent measures in v. Morton, a hallmark in law cases.In the 1854 the Bellevue (Nebraska) Claim Club was organized. The original aim of the club was to secure the peaceful adjustment of all cases in which claims in this then un-surveyed country overlapped each other. The club was renowned for visiting claim jumpers with beatings to convince them to leave their claims. Its last act, reportedly in 1858, was to attempt to and feather an old man and his three sons reportedly squatting in the area.((nd) History of Sarpy County, Andreas History of the State of Nebraska. Retrieved 7/13/07.)((2007) Bellevue Settlers Club, Nebraska State Historical Society. Retrieved 7/18/07.) The Platte Valley Claim Club was established in Fremont in August, 1856 to settle land disputes, and folded by late 1857.((nd) History of Dodge County, Andreas History of the State of Nebraska. Retrieved 7/13/07.)Saint Vrain, Territory also had a claim club in the late 1850s that was designed to keep the town from failing. It did not succeed.(Hafen, L. (1952) Fort St. Vrain, The Colorado Magazine, XXIX(4). Retrieved 7/19/07.)KansasOne story of claim club justice comes from Montgomery County, Kansas town in 1867. An early settler had tilled his land and improved on it, according to the provisions of the Act. However, he had not lived on it for five years. After he sold it to another man, this same settler reportedly went to the United States Land Office to preempt the man to whom he sold the land. After doing so this settler attempted to displace the man he sold the land to and claim it as his own. When the local claim club ordered the town sheriff to put the man away, the original settler was never seen again.(Dilke, C.W. (2005) Greater Britain: A Record of Travel in English-Speaking Countries During 1866 and 1867. Cosimo, Inc. p. 167.)IowaClaim clubs also secured members stakes on land they speculated to become important to the federal government, for the purpose of selling it back to the government at a later date. Members of one Iowa claim club purchased 15,000 acres (61 km) in central Iowa, which eventually was sold in order to develop both the state capitol in Moines and City, where the state university is today.(Swierenga, R. (1968) Pioneers and Profits: Land Speculation on the Iowa Frontier. Iowa State University Press. p. 15.) Iowa had several other claim clubs, as well. In Fort Des Moines, Dodge, Iowa((2007) Des Moines Center Manuscript Collection, State of Iowa. Retrieved 7/18/07.) and Iowa City active clubs abounded. In Iowa City the clubs mission was to ...protect all persons who do or may hold claims, against the interference of any person who shall attempt to deprive such claim holders of their claims and improvements, by preemption or otherwise.((nd) Tidricks in Nineteenth Century America. Retrieved 7/19/07.)OthersIn 1835 settlers in Creek, Wisconsin formed a claim club. Other settlers did the same, including the town of South Dakota.(Robinson, D. (1925) Doane Robinsons Encyclopedia of South Dakota. University of California. p. 822) There is also a report of a claim club in Alabama in the 1850s.(Newfon, D.E. (1948) The Dixie Frontier: A Social History of the Southern Frontier. A.A. Knopf, Publishers. p. 69.)DeclineIn the latter part of the 1850s claim clubs came under pressure from the federal government, and lost public support in many communities. In an 1858 ruling, the States Department of the Interior addressed claim clubs directly, stating that, A member of a claim club, organized for the purpose of illegally appropriating and selling public lands, will be held to the strictest proof of honest intent, when asserting an individual claim.(Lester, W.W. Decisions of the Interior Department in Public Land Cases and Land Laws Passed by the Congress. United States Department of the Interior, United States General Land Office. p. 393.) The violent actions of the Omaha Claim Club may have brought about the demise of claim clubs across the country. In 1860, in in v. Morton, the Supreme Court ordered that citys club to disband.(United States Supreme Court. (1912) Baker v. Morton, United States Supreme Court Reports. Lawyers Co-operative Publishing Company. p. 150-159.) Other sources say that with the arrival of several States Land Offices across the West, the claim clubs simply were not needed.(Sorenson, A. (1874) Chapters XIV - XVII: Early history of Omaha, Early History Of Omaha; or Walks And Talks Among The Old Settlers: A Series of Sketches in the Shape of a Connected Narrative of the Events and Incidents of Early Times in Omaha together with a Brief Mention of the Most Important Events of Later Years. Omaha Bee Publisher. p. 110. Retrieved 7/14/07.)(Larsen, L. and Cottrell, B. (1997) The Gate City: A History of Omaha. of Nebraska Press. p. p 43.) The Omaha Claim Club, along with many claim clubs around Nebraska, disbanded by 1860.(Sorenson, A. (1874) Chapters XIV - XVII: Early history of Omaha, Early History Of Omaha; or Walks And Talks Among The Old Settlers: A Series of Sketches in the Shape of a Connected Narrative of the Events and Incidents of Early Times in Omaha together with a Brief Mention of the Most Important Events of Later Years. Omaha Bee Publisher. p. 110. Retrieved 7/14/07.)See also* Act of September 4, 1841* Knobbers* associationReferences
12369214
Tassajara_Hot_Springs
Tassajara Hot Springs is a natural hot springs in the Wilderness, within the Lucia Range and Padres National Forest in County, California. The hot springs have been the site of a resort of one kind or another since the 1860s.  The site is currently owned by the San Francisco Zen Buddhist Center which uses it as a study center and opens it to visitors during the summer.Etymology Tasajera is a Spanish-American word derived from an indigenous Esselen language, which designates a place where meat is hung to dry.()() It has also been known as Tassajara Springs, Tesahara Springs and on mining claims as Agua Caliente.LocationThe hot springs are located  from Carmel Valley Road. The springs are currently privately owned by the Francisco Zen Center who operate the Zen Mountain Center on site. The last  of the road into the springs is extremely narrow and steep, so much so that visitors are encouraged to use four-wheel drive vehicles or take a shuttle from Hot Springs, California at California, where the Zen Center maintains offices. Jamesburg is at the foot of Chews Ridge,  from the hot springs.A section of land  near the springs were nicknamed The Horse Pasture, so-called because the flat meadow was once used by wranglers to pasture livestock when passengers used a stage coaches to visit the springs. The land, an inholding within the borders of the Wilderness, was identified by conservancy groups as a high priority conservation for protection. The watershed offered obvious recreational opportunities and the potential for development as a wilderness retreat. The site was purchased by the Wilderness Land Trust and later conveyed  to the United States Forst Service for inclusion in the wilderness.()  area of the Lucia Mountains in County, California.()The springsIn 1918, the state mineralogist from the California State Mining Bureau() produced a report detailing the large amount of hot water that issues at Tassajara Hot Springs through about seventeen thermal springs in the bed of the creek and along its southern bank. These range in temperature from about  to  and vary from mere seepages to flows of  a minute.()Thermal waters issue from a gneiss exposed along the creek for a distance of  or more. Above and below this exposure the rock is granitic and in some places contains small garnets. The crystalline rocks are overlain by a series of shales, sandstones, and limestones, whose structure in the area north of Arroyo Seco is shown by the beds of massive buff-colored sandstone that dip northeastward at an angle of about 45. A western limb of this structure has not been recorded but may exist in the mountains further towards the coast. The observed dips at least suggest that Tassajara Hot Springs issue at a locality where Arroyo Seco crosses a zone of intense pressure in the underlying crystalline rocks.(The springs have been known and used for many years and were visited early on by campers when the only access was by means of a difficult trail. In the early part of the 20th century, a well-graded wagon road was built southward from Jamesburg across the mountains and down into the canyon, and by 1918 the springs were easily reached by stagecoach. In 1904 a stone hotel was built, and other improvements added yearly so that by 1909 there was ample accommodation for 75 people, although a larger number were put up in tents. Water from two of the largest springs has been piped to tub and plunge baths, and a vapor bath constructed over the hottest spring, which issues from the creek bed.(Analyses of two of the thermal waters showed them to be noticeably sulphuretted, and only moderately mineralized. The water of the arsenic spring has a distinctly yellow color, which in a few other springs has been ascribed to alkaline sulphides in solution. At the north edge of the creek, a few yards above the hot springs, there are two cool springs in which iron is deposited. An analysis of the easternmost of these springs was also made.(The two hot springs apparently issue from the same general source and show only slight differences in composition. Primary salinity and primary alkalinity are the chief stable properties, but the waters are characterized by high subalkalinity, of which silica is the main component. The carbonate radicle reported is presumably calculated from the alkalinity determination and doubtless includes sulphides and possibly silicates. The apparent absence of arsenic in the so-called arsenic spring is noteworthy.(Of markedly different character from the hot springs, the cool iron spring is less than half as concentrated and has secondary alkalinity as its dominant property. Subalkalinity is not reported, but is probably relatively low. The spring is probably of essentially surface origin, and not directly related to the thermal waters.(Algous growths in the creek below the hot springs are recorded, as the growths are related to the sulphuretted character of the water. Although they are common to thermal sulphur springs, the relatively large volume of water in the creek at Tassajara Hot Springs, its comparatively slow cooling, and the presence of both swift currents and of quiet pools, affords an unusually good opportunity to observe growth variations.(HistoryEsselenThe area was first occupied by and the springs were used by native Esselen people for a thousand years or more. Many of the local Native American people were subjugated by Spanish missionaries in the Mission system under Father Serra. By the  time of the American Civil War, the Europeans who came upon Tassajara  found few traces of the Esselens earlier presence. A few Esselen apparently continued to live in the region until at least the 1840s, escaping the harsh conditions of the mission and disease due to their remoteness.()EuropeansThe springs were discovered by Europeans when a hunter found the springs in 1843. Frank Rust founded the public baths in 1868.() In 1994, a skeleton was unearthed at Tassajara, and research suggested the individual had died about 150 years ago.(  In 1863, there was a brief rush in the Tassajara region. Eighteen mining claims were filed by 135 men (supposed to contain gold and silver) in the Agua Caliente Mining District. The first mining claim for the area was recorded during the period of May 125, and it was named the Vulcan Ledge, including the stream of water called Agua Caliente (i. e., Tassajara Hot Springs).() Visitors in the late 1800s traveled by stage over a rocky and steep road, and the last section was so steep that a  long pine tree trunk was chained to the rear axles to slow the four horse stagecoach on the steep downgrade.( The road is steep and narrow, such that a modern drive vehicle can take an hour to cover the rough, winding  dirt-and-rock road leading from California at  over  high Chews Ridge to the resort at .The Monterey County Board of Supervisors designated the trail to Tesahara Springs as a public highway in June,  1870, but work on a one-lane wagon road over Chews and Black Butte Ridges was not started  until the spring of 1886.()(See also:  Chews Ridge & Black Butte photographs, John Fedak, February 2006.)The hot springs was completely surrounded by the Basin Complex fire in 2008. Four trained staff members chose to remain behind, against the advice of professional fire-fighting personnel, and successfully defended the resort from the fire.()Zen Centerthumb|Menu board from the Tassajara kitchen.The springs and surrounding property are privately owned by the Francisco Zen Center, which purchased the land from Robert and Anna Beck.( The resort is used year-round as a study and practice center by the Zen Center. From Memorial Day to Labor Day each year, they rent accommodations and allow visitors to use the hot springs.The Zen Center is open during the summer and rents round yurts to visitors along with small cabins. The hot springs are divided into sex-segregated sections, although the mens side is coeducational in the evening. Visitors may also purchase meals at the monastery kitchen.NotesReferences
12384238
Uranium_mining_in_Wyoming
Uranium mining in Wyoming, a state of the States was formerly a much larger industry than it is today.  Wyoming once had many operating uranium mines, and still has the largest known uranium ore reserves of any state in the U.S.  The Wyoming uranium mining industry was hard-hit in the 1980s by the drop in the price of uranium.  When the uranium price dropped, the uranium-mining boom town of Jeffrey City lost 95% of its population in three years().positionleftpositionbottompositiontoppositiontop}}Powder River BasinGeological Survey geologist J. D. Love discovered uranium in 1951 near Pumpkin Buttes, about 25 miles northeast of Wyoming.  Other deposits were found along a 60-mile northwest-southeast trend in the southwest part of the River Basin, and production began in 1953.  The deposits are roll fronts in fluvial sandstones of the Eocene Formation and underlying Paleocene Union Formation.(Raymond E. Langden, Geology and geochemistry of the Highland uranium deposit, Wyoming Geological Association Earth Science Bulletin, Dec. 1973, p.41-48.)  The principal ore minerals are uraninite, coffinite, metatyuyamunite, and carnotite.  Gangue minerals are calcite, gypsum, pyrite, iron oxide, and barite.(Vernon A Mrak (1968) Uranium deposits in the Eocene Sandstones of the Powder River Basin, Wyoming, in Ore Deposits of the United States 1933-1967, New York: American Institute of Mining Engineers, p.838-848.)Northern Black HillsUranium was discovered in 1952  in Cretaceous sandstones of the Kara Group near its outcrop in County, Wyoming, near the northeast edge of the Hills.  Production began in 1953.  Ore minerals are uraninite and coffinite in unoxidized sandstone, and carnotite and tyuyamunite in oxidized sandstone.  Gangue minerals in unoxidized deposits are pyrite, marcasite, and calcite; in oxidized deposits calcite and iron oxide.(Olin M. Hart (1968) Uranium in the Black Hills, in Ore Deposits of the United States 1933-1967, New York: American Institute of Mining Engineers, p.832-837.)No mining has taken place in the Northern Black Hills district in recent years, but recent high uranium prices have brought new exploration drilling to the area.http://www.powertechuranium.com/s/NewsReleases.asp?ReportID201275&_TypeNews-Releases&_TitleAladdin-Project-Drilling-UpdateGas HillsThe Hills district, straddling the Natrona-Fremont county line in central Wyoming, was discovered in 1953, and ore production began in 1955.  The ore consisted of lenticular bodies of meta-autunite, uraninite, and coffinite in fluvial arkosic sandstones in the upper River Formation of Eocene age.  Mining was mostly by open pit, although there were also some underground mines.(F. D. Everett (1963) Mining Practices at Four Uranium Properties in the Gas Hills, Wyoming, US Bureau of Mines, Information Circular 8151.)  Strathmore Minerals Corp. of British Columbia is currently applying for permits to mine properties in the Gas Hills district.http://www.strathmoreminerals.com/s/GasHills.asp  Little Mountain districtIn the Little Mountain mining district on the west side of the Mountains, Horn County, Wyoming, uranium was produced from 1955 to 1970 from paleokarst breccias in the Limestone of Mississippian age.  The uranium occurs as carnotite and tyuyamunite.(Ray E. Harris (1983) Uranium and thorium in the Bighorn Basin, in Bighorn Basin, Wyoming Geological Association, 34th Annual Field Conference Guidebook, p.171-177.)Shirley BasinUranium was discovered in the Basin, Carbon County, in 1955.  Production began in 1960 from underground and open-pit mines.  Mining by leaching began in 1961, the first in-situ leach mining of uranium in the United States.  The ore occurs as roll fronts in Eocene sandstone of the River Formation, as uraninite with pyrite, marcasite, hematite, calcite, and organic matter.(E. N. Harshman (1972) Geology and Uranium Deposits, Shirley Basin Area, Wyoming, US Geological Survey, Professional Paper 745.)Crooks Gap districtThe Crooks Gap district of Fremont County contains uranium ore in fluvial sandstones of the Eocene Spring Formation.(Milton O. Childers, Uranium occurrences in Upper Cretaceous and Tertiary Strata of Wyoming and Northern Colorado, The Mountain Geologist, Oct. 1974, p.137-141.)Current ActivityBy 2006, the only active uranium mine in Wyoming was the Ranch-Highland leaching operation in the River Basin, owned by Power Resources, Inc., a subsidiary of Cameco.  The mine produced 907 tonnes of yellowcake (uranium oxide concentrate, U3O8) in 2006, making it the leading uranium producer in the States.(W.M. Sutherland, Wyoming, Mining Engineering, May 2007, p.126.)In October 2007, Energy Metals Corp. applied for a Regulatory Commission (NRC) permit to start an leach mine at the Moore Ranch deposit in Campbell County in the River Basin.  Energy Metals is a subsidiary of One.  The permit application is the first NRC application since 1988 for a new uranium recovery facility.  The Moore Ranch deposit contains an estimated 5.8 million pounds (2600 tonnes) of uranium oxide.  The uranium will be absorbed onto ion-exchange resin beads at the mine; the beads will be shipped to existing facilities of Power Resources Inc. (Cameco) in Wyoming and Nebraska for recovery of the uranium.(Uranium One submits application for Moore ranch project in Wyoming, Mining Engineering, Nov. 2007, p.18.)Resistance to uranium miningA campaign has been underway to halt any effort to mine uranium in the Black Hills because of its effect on Native American and wildlife populations, as well as the effects of mining on the table and local ranchers.(Jones, Peter M. Uranium mining in the Black Hills of South Dakota. July 19, 2007. Indigenous Peoples Issues Today website:http://indigenousissuestoday.blogspot.com/2007/07/uranium-mining-in-black-hills-of-south.html)(White Face, Charmaine. Black Hills - Powertech Exploratory Drilling. Aligning for Responsible Mining website: http://uraniumisnotmyfriend.org/black_hills_powertech_exploratory_drilling) Indigenous leaders and anti-nuclear activists began organizing around this issue in the 1970s and there are still efforts underway to prevent mining on native lands.( White Face, Charmaine. URGENT - Stop Black Hills Uranium Mining. January 12, 2009. Republic of Lakotah website: http://www.republicoflakotah.com/?p943) External links * Wyoming Geological Survey:  Uranium Page* Wyoming Department of Environmental Quality:  Uranium Mill Tailing Cleanup Program FAQs* Wyoming Mining Association:  Wyoming UraniumCitations(See also*mining*mining in the United States*of uranium minesExternal links* Wyoming Geological Survey: WGS uranium group, accessed 18 May 2009.(- )
12395051
The_World_Without_Us
The World Without Us is a non-fiction book about what would happen to the natural and environment if humans suddenly disappeared, written by American journalist Weisman and published by St. Martins Thomas Dunne Books.() It is a book-length expansion of Weismans own February 2005 Discover article Earth Without People.(.) Written largely as a experiment, it outlines, for example, how cities and houses would deteriorate, how long man-made artifacts would last, and how remaining lifeforms would evolve. Weisman concludes that residential neighborhoods would become forests within 500 years, and that radioactive waste, bronze statues, plastics, and Rushmore would be among the longest lasting evidence of human presence on Earth.The author of four previous books and numerous articles for magazines, Weisman traveled to interview academics, scientists and other authorities. He used quotations from these interviews to explain the effects of the natural environment and to substantiate predictions. The book has been translated and published in many countries. It was successful in the U.S., reaching #6 on the New York Times Best Seller list(.) and #1 on the Francisco Chronicle Best-Sellers list in September 2007.(.) It ranked #1 on Time(Poniewozik, James; Top 10 New TV Series; time.com) and Weeklys  of 2007.Century Fox has purchased the rights to the book with the intent of creating a picture.()BackgroundThe idea of exploring the effects of the depopulating of the Earth is an old one, having been a regular trope in fiction novels for decades. Post-apocalyptic literature in general had often tried to imagine the fate of civilization and its artifacts after the end of humanity. Indeed, an extremely popular 1949 novel, Abides, portrayed the breakdown of urban systems and structures after a pandemic, through the eyes of a survivor, who muses at the end of the first chapter: What would happen to the world and its creatures without man? That he was left to see.The World Without Us applies a more ecological view to that old story. Before writing it, the author, Weisman, had written four books, including, Gaviotas: A Village to Reinvent the World, in 1998, about the eco-village of Gaviotas in Colombia; and An Echo In My Blood, in 1999, about his familys history immigrating from Ukraine to the United States. He has worked as an international journalist for American magazines and newspapers, and at the time of writing the book was an Associate Professor of Journalism and Latin American Studies at the of Arizona. The position required him to teach only one class in the spring semester, and he was free to travel and conduct research the rest of the year.(.)The idea for The World Without Us was suggested to Weisman in 2004 by Josie Glausiusz, an editor at Discover.(Weisman (2007), 277.) She had pondered the idea for several years and asked Weisman to write a feature on the subject after she re-read Journey through a Doomed Land, an article he published in 1994 in Magazine about the state of Chernobyl eight years after abandonment.( His Discover article, Earth Without People, published in the February 2005 issue and re-printed in The Best American Science Writing 2006 anthology,(.) describes how nature has thrived in the abandoned Demilitarized Zone and how nature would overwhelm the environment of York City.( Using interviews with paleoecologists, the article speculates that megafauna would return and that forest cover, like the Forest, would spread over Europe and the United States. The article raises the prospect of failing power plants, chemical plants, dams, and petroleum tanks.To expand this into a book, Weismans agent found an editor and publisher at Martins Press. Among the 23 page bibliography are two articles he wrote for the Angeles Times Magazine (Naked Planet on persistent organic pollutants, and The Real Indiana Jones on the civilization) and one published in the Nast Traveler (Diamond in the Wild on diamond mining), as well as Discovers Earth Without People.(Weisman (2007), 289311.) Additional research saw Weisman travel to England, Cyprus, Turkey, Panama, and Kenya. Interviews with academics quoted in the book include biologist O. Wilson on the Korean Demilitarized Zone,(Weisman (2007), 129, 189190.) archaeologist Rathje on plastics in garbage,(Weisman (2007), 119120.) forest botanist Rackham on vegetative cover across Britain,(Weisman (2007), 150151.) anthropologist Demarest on the crash of Mayan civilization,(Weisman (2007), 224229.) paleobiologist Erwin on evolution,(Weisman (2007), 229232.) and philosopher Bostrom on Transhumanism.(Weisman (2007), 240244.)SynopsisThe book is divided into 19 chapters, with a prelude, coda, bibliography and index. Each chapter deals with a new topic, such as the potential fates of plastics, petroleum infrastructure, nuclear facilities, and artworks. It is written from the point of view of a journalist with explanations and testimonies backing his predictions. There is no unifying narrative, cohesive single-chapter overview, or thesis.()(.)Weismans thought experiment pursues two themes: how nature would react to the disappearance of humans and what legacy humans would leave behind. To foresee how other life could continue without humans, Weisman reports from areas where the natural environment exists with little human intervention, like the Forest, the Reef, and the Atoll. He interviews biologist O. Wilson and visits with members of the Federation for Environmental Movement at the Demilitarized Zone where few humans have penetrated since 1953.(Weisman (2007), 183&ndash;188.) He tries to conceive how life may evolve by describing the past evolution of pre-historic plants and animals, but notes Douglas Erwins warning that we cant predict what the world will be 5 million years later by looking at the survivors.(Weisman (2007), 232.) Several chapters are dedicated to megafauna, which Weisman predicts would proliferate. He profiles soil samples from the past 200 years and extrapolates concentrations of heavy metals and foreign substances into a future without industrial inputs. Carbon dioxide levels in the atmosphere and implications for climatic change are likewise examined.Image:Pripjat Panorama.jpg|right|thumb|300px|The abandoned city of Prypiat, near Chernobyl With material from previous articles, Weisman uses the fate of the civilization to illustrate the possibility of an entrenched society vanishing and how the natural environment quickly conceals evidence.(Weisman (2007), 223&ndash;8.) To demonstrate how vegetation could compromise human built infrastructure, Weisman interviewed hydrologists and employees at the Canal, where constant maintenance is required to keep the jungle vegetation and silt away from the dams.(Weisman (2007), 173&ndash;178.) To illustrate abandoned cities succumbing to nature, Weisman reports from Chernobyl, Ukraine (abandoned in 1986) and Varosha, Cyprus (abandoned in 1974). Weisman finds that their structures crumble as weather does unrepaired damage and other life forms create new habitats. In Turkey, Weisman contrasts the construction practices of the rapidly growing Istanbul, as typical for large cities in less developed countries, with the cities in Cappadocia. Due to a large demand for housing in Istanbul much of it was developed quickly with whatever material was available and could collapse in a major earthquake or other natural disaster.(Weisman (2007), 103&ndash;105.) Cappadocian underground cities were built thousands of years ago out of volcanic tuff, and are likely to survive for centuries to come.(Weisman (2007), 106&ndash;111.)Weisman uses York City as a model to outline how an unmaintained urban area would deconstruct. He explains that sewers would clog, underground streams would flood subway corridors, and soils under roads would erode and cave in. From interviews with members of the Conservation Society(Weisman (2007), 22&ndash;24.) and the York Botanical Gardens(Weisman (2007), 28&ndash;32.) Weisman predicts that native vegetation would return, spreading from parks and out-surviving invasive species. Without humans to provide food and warmth, rats and cockroaches would die off.right|thumb|200px|An abandoned house in a state of collapseWeisman explains that a common house would begin to fall apart as water eventually leaks into the roof around the flashings, erodes the wood and rusts the nails, leading to sagging walls and eventual collapse. After 500 years all that would be left would be aluminum dishwasher parts, stainless steel cookware, and plastic handles.(Weisman (2007), 18.) The longest-lasting evidence on Earth of a human presence would be radioactive materials, ceramics, bronze statues, and Mount Rushmore. In space, the plaques, the Golden Record, and radio waves would outlast the Earth itself.(Weisman (2007), 249&ndash;254.)Breaking from the theme of the natural environment after humans, Weisman considers what could lead to the sudden, complete demise of humans without serious damage to the built and natural environment. That scenario, he concludes, is extremely unlikely. He also considers transhumanism, the Human Extinction Movement, the of Euthanasia and A. Leslies The End of the World: the Science and Ethics of Human Extinction.(Weisman (2007), 239&ndash;244.) Weisman concludes the book considering a new version of the policy. While he admits it is a draconian measure,(Weisman (2007), 272.) he states, The bottom line is that any species that overstretches its resource base suffers a population crash. Limiting our reproduction would be damn hard, but limiting our consumptive instincts may be even harder.() He responded to criticism of this saying I knew in advance that I would touch some peoples sensitive spots by bringing up the population issue, but I did so because its been missing too long from the discussion of how we must deal with the situation our economic and demographic growth have driven us too (sic).(PublicationThe book was first published on July 10, 2007, as a hardback in the United States by St. Martins Thomas Dunne Books, in United Kingdom by Books and in Canada by HarperCollins. The paperback was released in July 2008. It has been translated and published in France by Groupe Flammarion as Homo disparitus,() in Germany by Piper as Die Welt ohne uns,() in Portugal by Estrela Polar as O Mundo Sem Ns,() in Italy by Einaudi as Il mondo senza di noi,() in Poland by CKA as wiat bez nas,() and in Japan by Hayakawa Publishing as Jinrui ga kieta sekai.()Pete Garceau designed the cover art for the American release, which one critic said was a thick layer of sugar-coated sweetness in an effort to not alarm potential readers. Yes, I am a book about the environment. But Im harmless! No, really! ( ) The Canadian version, designed by Ellen Cipriano, is similar to the American version but with a photo illustration rather than the disarming cartoon illustration. Cover art for the international releases contrast the natural environment with a decaying built environment. Adam Grupper voiced the ten hour long, unabridged English language audiobook which was published by Macmillan Audio and Audiobooks, and released simultaneously with the hardcover book.()() AudioFile gave the audio presentation its Earphones Award, called Gruppers reading sincere and balanced, and wrote, Never veering into sensationalism, always objective and phlegmatic, Grupper takes what could be a depressing topic and makes it a book you just cant stop listening to.()ReceptionAs the book was released Weisman launched his book tour with stops throughout the United States, Canada and overseas to Lisbon and Brussels.() Weisman did television interviews on Daily Show and The Today Show and radio interviews on Edition, of the Nation, Diane Rehm Show, on Earth, Marketplace, and It Happens.() Meanwhile, the book debuted on the York Times Best Seller list for non-fiction hardcovers at #10 on July 29(.) and spent nine weeks in the top ten,(.) peaking at #6 on August 12 and September 9.((.) In the Canadian market, it spent 10 weeks on Globe and Mails non-fiction best seller list, peaking at #3 on August 11.(.)(.) The book reached #1 on the Francisco Chronicle Best-Sellers list for non-fiction on September 23( and spent 11 weeks on the Todays Top 150 Best-Selling Books, peaking at #48.(. Requires navigation to October 28, 2007 or The World Without Us entry.) Reviewers at the Journal recommended the book for all environmental collections and the audiobook for most public and academic library audiobook collections.(.)(.) The book ranked #1 on Time( and Weeklys top  of 2007 and was listed in the Hudson Booksellers Best Books published in 2007.()()() In the Amazon.com Best Books of 2007, it placed #4 overall in the United States and #1 in the non-fiction category in Canada.()()The writing style was positively received as being vivid and well-written, sometimes grim, but with appropriate language.() Even an overall negative review by Michael Grunwald in Washington Post remarked the writing was always lucid, sometimes elegant.(.) In New York Times Book Review Jennifer Schuessler said Weisman has a flirtation with religious language, his occasionally portentous impassivity giving way to the familiar rhetoric of eco-hellfire.(.) Maslin of New York Times found the writing had an arid, plain, what-if style while being strangely uniform in tone.(.) On the reporting techniques, Kamiya wrote that Weismans science reporting, at once lucid and full of wonder ... is the heart and soul of this book and that it is written as if by a compassionate and curious observer on another planet.( Plain Dealer book editor Karen Long said Weisman uses the precise, unhurried language of a good science writer and shows a knack for unearthing unexpected sources and provocative facts.(.)Several critics found the lack of an anthropomorphic point of view hurt the books relevance.( Robert Braile in Boston Globe wrote that it has no real context ... no rationale for probing this fantasy other than Weismans unsubstantiated premise that people find it fascinating.(.) Michael Grunwald in Washington Post also questioned the premise: Imagining the human footprint on a post-human planet might be fun for dormitory potheads who have already settled the questions of Gods existence and Fergies hotness, but its not clear why the rest of us need this level of documentary evidence.( On the other hand, Alanna Mitchell in the Globe and Mail review found relevance in the context of societys passiveness to resource depletion combined with an anthropomorphic vanity. She writes the book is designed to help us find the how of survival by shaking us out of our passive dance with death.(.)The books environmental focus was also criticized by some. Christopher Orlet of American Spectator wrote that it is a prime example of the wrongheaded, extremist views of the Greens.() Braile agrees that the book could be an environmentalists nightmare, possibly fueling the cheap shots taken at the green movement ... by critics who say environmentalists care more about nature than people.( Environmentalist Steffen found the book presents nothing new, but that using the sudden and clean disappearance of humans provides a unique framework, although extremely unlikely and insensitive.() Two critics who call the book a Jeremiad ultimately gave it a positive review.((.) Guardian says we learn during the course of this book, to feel good about the disappearance of humanity from the Earth.()Other critics hailed the environmental perspective. Chauncey Mabe of the Florida Sun-Sentinel calls the book one of the most satisfying environmental books of recent memory, one devoid of self-righteousness, alarmism or tiresome doomsaying.(.) Tom Spears of the News Service concludes its more a portrait of ourselves, taken through an odd lens and sometimes an obituary is the best biography.()GenreThe book is categorized as non-fiction science but some commentators emphasize it may be better described as fiction.(.) The World Without Us is grounded in environmental and journalism. Like other environmental books, it discusses the impact that the human race has had on the planet.(.) Weismans thought experiment removes the judgments and sufferings of humans by focusing on a hypothetical post-human world. This approach to the genre, which throws the spotlight on the earth itself,( was found to be creative and objective.() There have been other books that address similar topics, such as Benfords 1999 book Deep Time: How Humanity Communicates Across Millennia. fiction writers such as G. Wells (War of the Worlds, 1898) and Wyndham (Day of the Triffids, 1951) had earlier touched upon the possible fate of cities and other man-made structures after the sudden removal of their creators. Similar parallels in the decay of civilization are detailed in 1949 post-apocalyptic fiction novel by Berkeley English professor R. Stewart, Abides.Addressing his approach, Weisman said that eliminating the human element eliminated the fear factor that people are doing something wrong or that they will die; it is meant to be read as a fantasy, according to the author.( Josie Appleton of Spiked related the book to todays romanticisation of nature in that it linked the decadence and detachment of a modern consumerist society with an ignorance of the efforts required to produce products so easily disposed.(.) Appleton also felt the book countered the Nature knows best notion by highlighting the randomness of natural forces.(Weismans science journalism style uses interviews with academic and professional authorities to substantiate conclusions, while maintaining the cool and dispassionate tone...of a scientific observer rather than an activist.( Weisman said he purposely avoided the activist label: Some of our finest science and nature writers only get read by people who already agree with them. Its nice to get some affirmation for whatever it is you believe is true, even if its quite sobering, but I wanted to write something that people would read ... without minimizing the significance of whats going on, nor trivializing it, nor oversimplifying it.() Fortey compares the book to the works of Diamond, Flannery and Wilson, and writes that The World Without Us narrowly avoids engendering the gloom-and-doom ennui that tends to engulf the poor reader after reading a catalogue of human rapacity.(.) Lynas in the Statesman noted that whereas most environmental books sag under the weight of their accumulated bad news, The World Without Us seems refreshingly positive.( Demonstrating the optimism on the grim subject matter Appleton quotes an ecologist from the book saying if the planet can recover from the Permian, it can recover from the human.(See also* Earth After Us explores the geological legacy of the human species.* Will Come Soft Rains, a 1920 poem by Teasdale.* Man: A Zoology of the Future considers the evolution of life on Earth 50 million years after the extinction of human beings.* The plot of and Earth by Asimov (a continuation of his Trilogy), includes Aurora, a habitable planet which was abandoned by people for thousands of years. That planet, however, was settled by people, and its limited ecology was maintained by them, leading to its deterioration in the absence of human beings.There have been several TV specials relating to the same topic:(.)* After People shows what would happen if humans disappeared instantly.* Population Zero is the same as the above, but gives more detail into certain things.* Future Is Wild, while not seeking to explain our disappearance, shows how life on Earth (without humans) would evolve 5, 100 and 200 million years in the future.ReferencesExternal links* * Declinism Declined A long review of The World Without Us.* An interview with Alan Weisman about The World Without UsWelt ohne unsmundo sin nosotrosdisparitusmondo senza di noi Dnyazh:
12402677
Sudan_Khartoum_Refinery_Company
The Sudan Khartoum Refinery Company is a petroleum company in Sudan.  The company its name is abbreviated to KRC.  The company was founded in 1997 and began operations in 2000.  KRC is based in Khartoum.OwnershipThe company is 50% owned by the Sudanese governments Ministry of Energy & Mining (MEM) and 50% owned by the National Petroleum Corporation (CNPC)..OperationsThe company operates an refinery 70 kilometers north of Khartoum.  The capacity of the refinery is 100,000 barrels of oil per day.See also*Sudapet*SPPHCExternal links*Sudan Khartoum Refinery Company official site*Sudan Khartoum Refinery Company page at MBendi
12417680
Jerome_Pearson
Jerome Pearson (born 1938) is an American engineer and scientist best known for his work on elevators and space elevator.  He is president of STAR, Inc., and has developed aircraft and spacecraft technology for the States Air Force, DARPA, and NASA.  He holds several patents and is the author of nearly 100 publications in aircraft, spacecraft, electrodynamic tethers, SETI, and global climate control.Pearson received his degree in engineering from University in Louis in 1961, and his degree in geology from State University in Ohio, in 1977.  After serving in the S. Marine Corps, he became an aerospace engineer for the Langley and Ames research centers during the Apollo Program.  He joined the Force Research Laboratory (AFRL) in 1971, and developed vibration control for high-power lasers and a kinetic-kill vehicle concept for President Reagans Defense Initiative in the 1980s.  As Chief of the AFRL Structural Dynamics Branch, he led the development of the high-temperature acoustics test facility at AFB in Ohio, which was used for high-speed missile testing and the Aerospace Plane development.  In the 1980s he consulted for Disney World in Florida, and consulted on the CommuniCore Pavilion.  In 1998 he founded Star Technology and Research, Inc., a small business in Mount Pleasant, SC, for aerospace research and development, and currently serves as its president.Pearson is an Associate Fellow of the AIAA, a Fellow of the Interplanetary Society, and a Beta Pi Eminent Engineer.  As President of STAR, Inc., he received the U. S. Small Business Administration National Award in 2001.  Sponsored by Arthur Clarke, he was elected Member of the Academy of Astronautics in 2002.Selected publicationsPearson was an early co-inventor of the space elevator.  His publication in Acta Astronautica in 1975 introduced the concept to the world spaceflight community.(The Orbital Tower:  A Spacecraft Launcher Using the Earths Rotational Energy, Acta Astronautica, Vol. 2, pp. 785-799, Sep/Oct 1975.)Arthur Clarke then contacted Pearson for the technical background of his novel, The Fountains of Paradise, published in 1978, and acknowledged this contribution in the Afterward.  Shortly thereafter, Pearson invented the space elevator, balanced about the points in the Moon-Earth system, and extended the concept on a contract with the Institute for Advanced Concepts.(Anchored Lunar Satellites for Cislunar Transportation and Communication, Journal of the Astronautical Sciences, Vol. XXVII, No. 1, pp. 39-62, Jan/Mar 1979.)()He then applied rotating tethers for mining asteroids, proposed a rotating space tether plus a rocket or gun for Earth-to-space launches, and tethers for orbit propellantless maneuvering space vehicles.(Asteroid Retrieval by Rotary Rocket, AIAA Paper 80-0116, AIAA Aerospace Sciences Meeting, 610 January 1980.)(Low-Cost Space Launcher and Orbital Fuel Depot, Acta Astronautica, Vol. 19, No. 4, pp. 315-320, 1989.)(Overview of the ElectroDynamic Delivery Express (EDDE), with J. Carroll, E. Levin, J. Oldson, and P. Hausgen, AIAA Paper 2003-4790, 39th Joint Propulsion Conference and Exhibit, Huntsville, AL, 2023 July 2003.)Pearson wrote invited articles on space elevators and tethers for Encyclopdia Britannica and New Scientist, was featured discussing space elevators in the Discovery Channel series Science of the Impossible, and proposed the rarity of Earth-like planets as an explanation for the lack of success of SETI.(Press Up For Space, Encyclopaedia Britannica Yearbook of Science and the Future, pp. 42 55, 1991.)(The Lonely Life of a Double Planet, New Scientist, Vol. 119, No 1627, 25 August 1988.)(The Moon and SETI, Acta Astronautica, Vol. 26, No. 3/4, pp. 151-155, 1992.)Pearson developed a space-based solar shield to counteract global warming and control Earths climate,(Earth Rings for Planetary Environment Control, with John Oldson and Eugene Levin, Acta Astronautica Vol. 58, No. 1, pp. 44-57, 2006.) and multi-winglets for improved aircraft performance.(Performance Analysis of a Wing with Multiple Winglets, with M. J. Smith, N. Komerath, R. Ames, O. Wong, and R. Snodgrass, AIAA Paper 2001-2407, AIAA Applied Aerodynamics Conference, Anaheim, CA, 1114 June 2001.)Pearson has also written about the origins of the concept of the space elevator, and how it has been mistakenly attributed to Konstantin Tsiolkovsky.(Konstantin Tsiolkovski and the Origin of the Space Elevator, IAF-97-IAA.2.1.09, 48th IAF Congress, Torino, Italy, October 610, 1997.)References(External links* Jeromes bio* Space Elevators page of STAR, Inc. websitePearsonPearson
12433325
International_rankings_of_Russia
The following are international rankings of Russia.Agriculture*Largest barley producer, output of 15.7 million metric (2007)*Largest buckwheat producer, output of 1 004 850 (2007)*Largest oats producer, output of 5.1 million metric tons (2005)*Largest rye producer, output of 3.6 million metric tons (2005)*Largest sunflower seed producer, output of 6.3 million metric tons (2005)*Largest currant and gooseberry producer, output of  463,500 tons (2005)*Largest raspberry producer, output of 110,000 tons (2004)*Largest vetches producer, output of 377,750 tons(FAOSTAT)*Largest livestock of domesticated reindeer, about two-thirds of the worlds(International Journal of Entrepreneurship and Small Business: husbandry in Russia by Konstantin Klokov, an abstract.)Cities*GaWC Inventory of Cities, 1999: Moscow 7 points, Alpha World City*GaWC Inventory of World Cities, 1999: Petersburg 1 point, Minimal evidence of world city formationEconomicworld GNI percapita.PNG|thumb|right|334px|GNI per capita:  * Wall Street Journal and the Foundation: of Economic Freedom 2006, ranked 122 out of 157 countries*Monetary Fund: GDP (nominal) per capita 2006, ranked 59 out of 182 countries*Monetary Fund: GDP (nominal) 2009, ranked 8 out of 181 countries*Economic Forum: Competitiveness Index 2006-2007, ranked 62 out of 125 countriesDemographics* Nations: Human Development Index 2006, ranked 65 out of 177 countries* Kearney/Foreign Policy Magazine: Index 2006, ranked 47 out of 62 countries*Highest crude divorce rate, 4.42 per 1000 (2004)Energy*Largest proven natural gas reserves, 44,650,000,000,000 m (2008)*Largest natural gas producer, 654,000,000,000 m (2007)*Largest natural gas exporter, 173,000,000,000 cu m (2007)*Largest oil producer,  (https://www.cia.gov/library/publications/the-world-factbook/rankorder/2173rank.html) (2009)Environment*University: Sustainability Index 2005, ranked 33 out of 146 countriesGeography*Largest forest area, 8,087,900 km*Largest land area, 17,075,200 km(all countries of the world listed by largest to smallest land area population and population density)*Largest total area, 17,098,242 km(Reporters sans frontires - Russia - 2005 Annual report)*Largest EEZ continental shelf area,  3,817,843 km2*Largest unfrozen freshwater reserves, approximately one-quarter of the worlds(Library of Congress)*Most countries bordered, 14 (16 if Abkhazia and Ossetia are counted), the same number as with China*Most time zones (contiguous territory), 9Military*Largest nuclear arsenal, 5,200 / 8,800 active/total warheads (2005 est)(Robert S. Norris and Hans M. Kristensen )*Largest tank army, 22,800 tanks*Most corvettes in operation, 85Mining*Largest asbestos producer, 925,000 tons (2005)*Largest diamond producer, 38,000,000 carats (2005)*Largest nickel producer, 300,000 tons (2005)*Largest palladium producer, 143 tons (2005)Politics* International: Perceptions Index 2006, ranked  121 out of 163 countries*Without Borders: Worldwide press freedom index 2006, ranked 147 out of 168 countriesSociety*Intelligence Unit: index 2005, ranked 102 out of 108 countriesSports*Top position at World Chess Rankings (men), top 10 players average score of 2724 (2009)*Top position at World Chess Rankings (women), top 10 players average score of 2469 (2009)*Russia/USSR: Most Winter Olympic gold medals,  120(78 gold medals for USSR team, 33 gold medals for Russia, 9 gold medals for Unified Team of states.) (2008)*Russia/USSR: Winner of most Bandy World Championships (men), 19 (1957, 1961, 1963, 1965, 1967, 1969, 1971, 1973, 1975, 1977, 1979, 1985, 1989, 1991, 1999, 2001, 2006, 2007, 2008) (as of 2009)*Russia/USSR: Most World Chess Champions, 10 (as of 2009)*Russia/USSR: Best performance at Track World Championships, Women (cycling), 48 gold medals, 111 total medals (2009)*Russia/USSR: Best performance at FIE World Championships in Fencing, 121 gold medals, 257 total medals (2009)*Russia/USSR: Best performance at World Figure Skating Championships, 74 gold medals, 178 total medals, (2009)*Russia/USSR: Best performance at World Artistic Gymnastics Championships, 138 gold medals, 333 total medals (2009)*Russia/USSR: Best performance at World Rhythmic Gymnastics Championships, 23 gold medals, 58 total medals (2009)*Russia/USSR: Best performance at gymnastics World Championships, 21 gold medals (2009)*Russia/USSR: Best performance at World Womens Handball Championship, 7 gold medals, 10 total medals (2009)*Russia/USSR: Winner of most Ice Hockey World Championships (men), 25 times winner (2009)*Russia/USSR: Best performance at Ice Racing World Championship, 26 times winner, (2009)*Russia/USSR: Best performance at World Shooting Championships, 307 gold medals, 656 total medals (2009)*Russia/USSR: Best performance at World Allround Speed Skating Championships for Women, 24 gold medals, 69 total medals (2009)*Russia/USSR: Best performance at World Sprint Speed Skating Championships for Men, 11 gold medals, 24 total medals (2009)*Russia/USSR: Winner of most Volleyball World Championships (men), 6 (1949, 1952, 1960, 1962, 1978, 1982) (2006)*Russia/USSR: Winner of most Volleyball World Championships (women), 6 (1952, 1956, 1960, 1970, 1990, 2006) (2006)*Russia/USSR: Winner of most World Cups (men), 5 (1965, 1977, 1981, 1991, 1999) (2009)*Russia/USSR: Best performance at World Weightlifting Championships (men), 350 gold medals, 746 total medals (2007)*Russia/USSR: Best performance at FILA Wrestling World Championships, 64 times winner in three team tournaments (2009)Technology*Intelligence Unit e-readiness rankings 2007, ranked 57 out of 69 countries*Most television broadcast stations,  7,306 (as of 1998)*Most space launches per year, 32 in 2009(Russian space program in 2009: plans and reality)Transport*Largest total length of electrified railways, over 44,000 km(Invest in Russia - Infrastructure)See also*of countries*by country*of international rankingsReferences
12457455
Crangan_Bay,_New_South_Wales
Crangan Bay is a coastal suburb of the Central Coast region of South Wales, Australia, located between Budgewoi and Swansea on the bay of the same name. It is part of the Shire local government area.The suburb is presently an unpopulated bushland area with kangaroos and koalas and ancient forests, and has not been subject to urban development. Local conservation groups are currently in a fight with a huge urban development company and the Coal and Allied mining company who intend to turn this area into a suburb. This bay is part of the greater Wallarah Peninsula and Lower Hunter bioregions and contains a large proportion of endangered species.External links
12467211
Moyie,_British_Columbia
44px Moyie is an uincorporated village in the East Kootenay of Columbia, Canada. It is located on  Highway 3, 19 miles (30 km) south of Cranbrook on the eastern shore of Lake.()Once known as Grande Quete, the origin of Moyies name is, via the river of the same name, thought to be the French word mouille, meaning wet.(St. Eugene MineIn 1893, rich galena deposits were discovered near Moyie Lake by a Ktunaxa man by the name of Pielle or (Pierre).(() Pielle took the galena to Father Coccola, then head of the St. Eugene Mission, who sent the samples to Spokane for analysis.  Upon learning that the ore contained high percentages of silver, Coccola, Pielle and a Spokane developer by the name of James Cronin each staked a claim above Moyie Lake and registered them in Steele on June 25. thumb|left|300px|St. Eugene Mining Company in Moyie in 1908Pielle and Father Coccola both sold their claims in 1895 for $12,000. Father Coccola used the profits to construct a hospital and the St. Eugene Church in the St. Eugene Mission.() Miners and other fortune seekers began to rush to the area and throughout the next decade the St. Eugene Mine produced more than $10,000,000 in ore and was the catalyst for the Consolidated Mining and Smelting Company, later known as Cominco.(()MoyieMoyie was developed in 1897 by Glencairn Campbell, who purchased the property and subdivided it into lots. Lot sales were brisk as the Pacific Railway completed a tote road that allowed twice weekly stagecoach service from Fort Steele, while another tote road from Lake was completed that November.()It was predicted that Moyie would have a prosperous future and the CPRs new sternwheeler Moyie, launched in 1898, was named for the town.( The first newspaper, the Moyie City Leader was published in the spring of 1898. One of the first stores in Moyie was a meat market owned Pat Burns, one of a string of such stores that supplied beef to the railway and the residents along the line.( By 1900, Moyie had a population of 600, a train station, a water company and a school with twelve students.(  In the 1901 census, Moyie had a thousand residents, predominantly males who lived in boarding houses. Most of the local recreation consisted of what was offered by the lakefront saloons and brothels.( station at Moyie.gif|thumb|right|325px|CPR station at Moyie in 1908By 1906, Moyie was promoted as Moyie City and had five hotels, a lumber mill,  a brewery and the St. Peters church built by Father Nicholas Coccola in 1904.(In 1907 the St. Eugene Mine was described by the Canadian Department of Mines as being ...the most important silver-lead mine in Canada..( By 1909 Moyie had a population of 1,200 with about 450 employed in the mine.  However, by 1920, Moyies glory days had passed and the mine only employed 20 men. The population plummeted to 100 people and Moyie never recovered.(TodayToday  Moyie is a quiet retirement community. Its former glory can still be found in its restored heritage buildings: the fire station, the landmark St. Peters Catholic Church and the Kokanee Cove Pub, which was built from parts of the old Manhattan Hotel.(  All that remains of the St. Eugene Mine are piles of mine tailings and concrete foundations.(NotesExternal links****
12488547
Williams_family_of_Caerhays_and_Burncoose
The Williams family of Caerhays and Burncoose, were, for several generations, dominant in the Cornish Industrial Revolution as owners of mines and smelting works. They also developed williamsii hybrid camellias and fine gardens at Burncoose, Gwennap and Michael Caerhays, in Cornwall, United Kingdom.Family members* John Williams the First (16851761) Purchased Burncoose in 1715, married Thomasine Paynter.* John Williams the Second (1714- ?) Initiated the construction of the County Adit, which eventually became a 40-mile system of adits, draining over 60 mines.(For more information on the Great Adit , see this website and this one)* Michael Williams (17301775), son of John the First. He married Susanna, daughter of Henry  Harris of Cusgarne, Cornwall, by his wife Elizabeth, daughter of William Beauchamp (16701729) of Pengreep, Cornwall. He lived at Burncoose and was the father of,* John Williams the Third (23 September 1753-17 April 1841) Son of Michael Williams (17301775). Controlled the Gwennap copperbelt and copper smelting works in Swansea. Also owned tin-smelting works, sulphur mines and quarries. Director of The Bank. With the family of Falmouth, built the Plymouth breakwater and developed the harbour at Portreath and linked it by tramway to his mine at Poldice. Purchased land at Scorrier and built Scorrier House there. Married Catherine Harvey in 1776. Received a dream warning of the assassination of the Prime Minister in 1812, correct in every detail.(The Times, Saturday, 16 August 1828; pg. 2; Issue 13673; col F Remarkable Coincidence.)* John Williams the Fourth (12 April 1778-11 August 1849), FRS (6 March 1828). Son of John the Third.* Michael Williams, MP for the Western Division of Cornwall from 1853 to 1858. Son of John the Third. High Sheriff of Glamorgan in 1840, Deputy Lieutenant of Cornwall and Deputy-Warden of the Stannaries. Bought Caerhays Estate in 1853.* Sir William Williams, (3 August 1791 - 24 March 1870(The Peerage.com)), Son of John the Third. He served as Deputy-Lieutenant of Cornwall, Sheriff of Cornwall and Deputy-Warden of the Stannaries in 1851. He was created Baronet Williams of Tregullow in the County of Cornwall, on 4 August 1866.(Note: There is a significant opportunity for confusion with this name.  See Williams and Baronets.)* Frederick Martin Williams (18301878), was Conservative Member of Parliament for Truro.(Baronets#Williams Baronets, of Tregullow (1866) gives the succession.)* Philippa Williams ( ? -1861)* Trefusis Heneage Williams of Penryn Park, Hope, Ontario, son of Tucker Williams, and grandson of John Williams (17531841) of Scorrier House. He was the hero of the of Batoche and his statue stands in front of the town hall at Port Hope. His son General Victor Seymour Williams served in the Boer War, War I and Williams (Canada) was named in his honour.* John Michael Williams (25 December 1813-1880), married Elizabeth Maria Davey, dau of Stephen Davey of Redruth, in 1852 (Burkes A Genealogical and Heraldic Dictionary of the Landed Gentry of Great Britain (1863) Williams of Burncoose and Caerhays Castle article, provided by Google Books.)* Charles Williams (30 September 1861 - 29 March 1939), son of John Michael Williams and Elizabeth Davey, his wife. MP for the Truro Division of Cornwall, 18921895, High Sheriff of Cornwall 1888, Lord Lieutenant of Cornwall 1918-1936.(Who was Who)* Charlotte Williams, daughter of John Michael Williams, married Edward Powys Rogers. They moved to Burncoose in 1916.(Burncoose gardens a guidebook with a historical introduction by F.J.Williams (n.d, purchased at Burncoose 24 February 2008))* Harriet Rogers, daughter of Edward Powys Rogers and Charlotte Rogers, married James Malcolm McLaren (18741935), a geologist and developed a garden at Tregye, near Carnon Downs.(* Francis Julian Williams (16 April 1927 - ), CBE, current owner of Castle.(Whos Who)Caerhays CastleCaerhays Castle is a mock-mediaeval castle, designed by John Nash on the south coast of Cornwall, at St Michael Caerhays, between Truro and Austell.(Caerhays Estate official website)(Caerhays history section of Estate website.)  The garden(Caerhays garden section of Estate website.) holds the NCCPG National Magnolia Collection. It was bought by the Williams family, who still own it. The gardens are open to the public each year during March, April and May.See also*Cornish familiesNotes, References and Sources(Sources*Williams, F. J., et al. Burncoose gardens: a garden oasis in the Minewastes of Cornwall by F. J. Williams C.B.E., Arnold Dance, David Knuckey.*Smelt, Maurice (2006) 101 Cornish Lives, Penzance, Cornwall: Alison Hodge ISBN 0-906720-50-8, pages 246-248: John Williams (1753-1841), Mining magnate, born Lower Cusgarne, Gwennap.* Newell, Edmund (2004) Williams, John (17531841), Dictionary of National Biography, Oxford University Press, Sept 2004; online edn, May 2006 Link to Article (Subscription) accessed 27 July 2007
12497817
Betteshanger
Betteshanger is a village near Deal in East Kent, England. It gave its name to the largest of the four chief collieries of the coalfield.(Betteshanger Colliery, Coalfields Heritage Initiative Kent)Before the coal mineBetteshanger parish has existed at least since Domesday times and remained a small scattered parish until the advent of the Kent Coalfield. St Marys church sits almost alone in woodland in the centre of the parish. At Little Betteshanger a cluster of houses surround Betteshanger Farm and are very close to Northbourne Primary School.Mining in BetteshangerBetteshanger colliery opened in the late 1920s and was the largest of the Kent collieries. It had two shafts of almost 2000 feet, plaques can still be seen where the shafts were once sunk.Betteshanger had a tradition of union militancy; it was the first pit to come out on strike during the second World War and took active part in the miners strikes of 1972, 1974 and 1984/5.It was the last Kent colliery to close, closing for good in 1989. The colliery was served by a railway branch which left the main line between Deal & Sandwich.(http://www.eastkentlightrailway.moonfruit.com/#/latest-news/4539478701)Village layoutThe miners houses were laid out in three streets: Circular Road, Northway, and Broad Lane.Circular Road, often known simply as the circle is in fact oval in shape and is a one-way street. Houses have even numbers on inside of the circle, and odd on the outside. Northway connects the circle with the rest of the world and is a short street. As a road Broad Lane predates the coal mine and has miners houses on just one side. Additionally, the former village shop is now a domestic dwelling and although numbered as part of Circular Road, sits on an unnamed stub-road which used to serve as the entrance to the colliery itself.Betteshanger Park DevelopmentWith support from East England Development Agency (SEEDA), as part of the National Coalfields Programme (NCP)(http://www.homesandcommunities.co.uk/ourwork/national-coalfields-programme) a childrens play area, including play equipment and a skateboard ramp, and more recently an industrial park, have opened on the site of the former colliery. Also Country Park has been developed on a former spoil tip (on the north of the site).Current plans for Betteshanger Industrial Park is the proposal from College to set up the agricultural centre, creating more than 1,000 jobs. But this is still yet to be confirmed. Local opposition to this proposal, wants to turn the site into a chairtable trust with the development of free enterprise formulas and continued growth of the site.(http://www.thisiskent.co.uk/Betteshanger-local-trust-proposed/story-12701698-detail/story.html)ReferencesExternal linkspl:Betteshanger
12517515
National_Museums_of_the_United_Kingdom
There are a number of Museums in the Kingdom, which are owned and operated by the state. The national museums of the UK are funded by the for Culture, Media and Sport (DCMS) of the United Kingdom government, and are all located in England. There are 14 national museums, all established by Acts of Parliament, as well as another eight which are sponsored by the DCMS.()In addition, there are national museums in Scotland, Wales and Ireland, which are supported by the devolved legislatures. National museums in Scotland are funded by the Executive Education Department,() in Wales by the Assembly Government,() and in Northern Ireland by the of Culture, Arts and Leisure of the Ireland Executive.() Free entrance is standard practice in all UK National Museums, although some exhibits do require an admission fee to view. Several of the museums have more than one location throughout the UK. National Museums of the United Kingdom National museums established by Act of Parliament* Museum, London* War Museum, London, Cambridge and Manchester* of London, London* Gallery, London* Maritime Museum, London* Museums Liverpool, Liverpool* Museum of Science and Industry, London, York, Bradford, and Shildon, County Durham* National Portrait Gallery, London* History Museum, London* Armouries, Leeds, London and Portsmouth* John Soanes Museum, London* Tate, London, Liverpool and St. Ives, Cornwall* and Albert Museum, London* Collection, LondonSponsored museums* Museum, London* Museum, London* Museum and Gardens, London* of Science and Industry in Manchester, Manchester* Coal Mining Museum for England, Overton, West Yorkshire* Football Museum, Preston, Lancashire* History Museum, Manchester* and Wear Museums National Museums in Scotland  National Museums in Wales  National Museums in Northern Ireland * Museum* Folk & Transport Museum* American Folk Park* County MuseumReferences See also *of museums in England*of museums in Scotland*of museums in Wales*of museums in Northern IrelandExternal links* Department for Culture, Media and Sport: Museums and galleries* National Museums Scotland* National Museum Wales * National Museums Northern Ireland
12542102
The_Chronicles_of_Riddick_(series)
The Chronicles of Riddick is a fiction action/horror franchise, spanning two live-action films and their novelizations, a direct-to-DVD film, numerous shorts, two games, an Internet-based video game, figurines and hundreds of instances of fiction. The Chronicles of Riddick is also the title of the second film in the series. The series follows the exploits of the character Richard B. Riddick (either portrayed or voiced by Diesel in all appearances of the character) in the 28th century, and the universe in which they take place.  The Chronicles of Riddick universe and its canon was initially created with the introduction of the first installment of the franchise, Pitch Black (later called The Chronicles of Riddick: Pitch Black), which was written by Twohy (also director), Wheat, and his brother Jim Wheat.FilmsPitch Black (2000)The first installment of the franchise, Pitch Black, was a lower budget production, but is now something of a cult film. The story involved Riddick being transported to prison on the Hunter Gratzner, a commercial cargo ship. When the spaceship is damaged in the wake of a comet and makes an emergency crash landing on an isolated desert planet, Riddick escapes. However, when flying creatures, known as Biorapters, begin attacking the survivors, Riddick joins forces with the other survivors to escape the planet. After the release of the sequel The Chronicles of Riddick, this film was renamed The Chronicles of Riddick: Pitch Black. Since then all other media in the series has borne the The Chronicles of Riddick branding.The Chronicles of Riddick (2004)The second feature film in the series, and the second live-action film, The Chronicles of Riddick was a bigger budget production and was more action-oriented than earlier installments in the franchise. It takes place five years after Pitch Black and involved Riddicks meeting with Jack and Imam, his escape from the prison planet Crematoria, and his battle with the Necromonger fleet. It received mixed reviews.The Chronicles of Riddick: Dark Fury (2004)Dark Fury, a made-for-DVD movie, acts as a bridge between the live-action films of Pitch Black and The Chronicles of Riddick. It takes place shortly after Pitch Black and involves Riddick and the other two survivors of Pitch Black, Jack and Imam, and their run-in with a mercenary ship, as well as its captain who wishes to keep Riddick frozen as part of her collection of warriors from around the universe.Possible sequelsIn a November 13, 2007 blogpost, writer/director Twohy acknowledged that, aided by good numbers in DVD sales, sequels were still on the table. But if another movie surfaces, it probably wont be a Universal movie and probably will be an independent movie.  Which means well have to make it for substantially less than the last installment. But thats okay. Pitch Black was $22 million all in. Maybe its time to go back to our roots  as we go on to The UnderVerse.()On August 25, 2008, Diesel told MTV News the Riddick sequels were an active project, with Twohy currently writing the scripts. Said Diesel, The only question is whether we take a page from the Lord of the Rings guys and try to shoot the two chapters at the same time.()On March 11, 2009, Diesel told Gamespot that people would hear more about the movie soon and that the script is wrapping up and by the release of Dark Athena there would be news of it sprouting up.()On August 4, 2009, Twohy confirmed that Diesels newly restored box office clout may help get another Riddick outing off the ground.() Ive sketched out two stories and Vin and I have figured out which one we liked best, he said.On December 3, 2009, Diesel updated on his Facebook page that location scouting has begun in New Zealand for the new movie.On February 11, 2010 Diesel and Twohy confirmed production of the fourth film entitled Riddick.(Vin Diesel signs up for another Riddick)On Sept 20, 2010 The Furyan was announced by Diesel on his FaceBook Page.On October 27, 2010, Diesel confirmed that at least one more sequel was planned, and that the plot would most likely revolve around Riddicks return to Furya.On May 24, 2011 Diesel announced on his Facebook page that the writer/director of the films told him they could begin filming within months, but he would be working virtually pro bono. He said he was undecided as to what he would do.(http://www.facebook.com/VinDiesel)Rumours have it that most likely the films title would be Riddick, The Furyan as it relates to Riddick going back to his home planet Furya.On September 5, 2011, Diesel announced that filming for the new Riddick film will commence soon in Canada and will be distributed by Universal. Diesel also confirmed that the film will carry an R rating.(http://www.darkhorizons.com/news/21676/vin-diesel-s-latest-update-on-riddick)As of September 23, 2011, the title of the film is listed as The Chronicles of Riddick: Dead Man Stalking and word has been given that Urban will reprise his role as Vaako from Chronicles of Riddick.(http://www.bloody-disgusting.com/news/26452)Shorts / animated shortsInto Pitch BlackInto Pitch Black is a Sci-Fi channel special which aired before Pitch Black, and was about lawmen investigating Riddicks past as well as an investigation into the crash of the Hunter Gratzner (the spaceship from Pitch Black). It is considered a rarity now, and is only available on 2 copies of the Pitch Black DVD. It shows several inconsistencies with the official canon of the franchise, and might be possibly retconned by the other movies and video games.Slam CityPITCHBLACK: Slam City is a short movie prequel to Pitch Black by animator Brian Murray with Twohy which is available for download at the Pitch Black website.http://www.pitchblack.com/blackbox/slamcity.html Slam City is in the form of an official, confidential prison record detailing Riddicks arrival and escape from the Ursa Luna Slamcity Facility in eleven hours twenty-two minutes. Notably, it shows Riddick undergoing the surgery (by means of a retired veterinarian named Cutter) that gives him eyeshinethe ability to see in the darkand paying for this with a pack of Kool cigarettes as mentioned in Pitch Black.  Johns is seen at the end of the movie and is charged with capturing Riddick.Some events, such as Riddicks eyeshine, have been retconned, however, for it is revealed in Butcher Bay that Riddick received them in a much different fashion. The rest of the video (his escape from Slam City) may be canon, though.Video gamesTwo full-scale video games based on the Riddick series have been released, as well as two short Internet games.The Hunt For RiddickThe Hunt For Riddick is a point-and-click game on the Riddick official website http://www.thechroniclesofriddick.com/hunt/hunt.php?chap1 where the player plays a rookie mercenary hired by Toombs to research Riddick and possibly find his whereabouts. The game gives much information about the Riddick universe and the player travels to a variety of locations. These include: Origin (a planet that little is known about but the game begins at and appears to be mostly a shipyard), Lupus Five (the planet Kyra joined mercenaries on), Helion Prime, Furya, Aquila Major, Crematoria, and U.V. 6.Escape from CrematoriaEscape from Crematoria was a Web-based game available at the official site, www.TheMercs.TheChroniclesOfRiddick.com,() advertised as a viral game for site members only, which entails killing the Lord , and which awarded successful players with UD points that could be traded for prizes. The entire site, including the game, has been unavailable since January 2005.Escape from Butcher BayEscape from Butcher Bay is a video game based on the Riddick series, released for the Xbox and Windows PC. It acts as a prequel to Pitch Black, and involves Riddicks escape from the eponymous prison, Butcher Bay.  Escape from Butcher Bay 2 was said to be confirmed as of September 2004 for future development. This second project later became Assault on Dark Athena (See below).The Assault on Dark AthenaThe Assault on Dark Athena is a video game for the PlayStation 3, Xbox 360, Windows, and Mac OS X computers. It includes an enhanced remake of Escape from Butcher Bay, and is also a retelling of the events before Pitch Black. Characters  Richard B. Riddick The series follows the exploits of the character Richard B. Riddick.  Riddick is an escaped convict with exceptional hand to hand fighting skills and the ability to see in the dark.  While sharing the spotlight in Pitch Black, Riddick went on to be the main protagonist of the series.His character is played by Diesel throughout the series.William J. JohnsWilliam J. Johns is a war veteran and mercenary who was trusted to track down Riddick after he escaped from Slam City, and the primary human antagonist of Pitch Black. He captured Riddick and brought him to Butcher Bay, but upon discovering that he could not get as much of a reward as he wanted, helped Riddick escape. The Johns Chase Log on the Pitch Black special features tells of the events afterward: Riddick stabs Johns and leaves him for dead. Johns becomes a morphine addict after having it prescribed to him because of the wound, and then chases Riddick down while also avoiding other mercenaries on Riddicks trail. He eventually catches Riddick on the planet Aquila Major (featured in the opening scene of Chronicles of Riddick) by killing a child and threatening to kill more unless Riddick surrenders. He gets a seat on the transport vessel Hunter Gratzner, which crashes onto the Dark Planet in Pitch Black. Johns promises to free Riddick after the crash, as he states that he is tired of chasing him. The validity of this statement is unclear. Johns helps the crash survivors (though also impedes them with his self-centeredness) and by killing one of the creatures with a shotgun, learns of their weakness to light. However, after suggesting to kill Jack, Riddick wounds Johns mortally and leaves him for dead. Johns is killed shortly afterward when a bioraptor bites his head off.He was played by Hauser.Abu Imam al-WalidA character that featured in the first three Riddick movies (See above).He was played by David.Jack B. Badd/Jackie B. Badd/KyraAnother character from the first three Riddick movies (See above).In Pitch Black and Dark Fury she was played by Griffith.In Chronicles of Riddick she was played by Davalos.Alexander ToombsThe mercenary from Chronicles of Riddick and Dark Fury.He was played by Chinlund.Zhylaw/Lord MarshalThe antagonist from Chronicles of Riddick. Before Riddicks birth, Zhylaw consulted an Elemental seer, who told him that a Furyan male would be born that would kill him in the future. In retaliation, Zhylaw attacked Furya in an attempt to massacre all male children, going so far as to personally strangle newborn infants with their own umbilical cords. He strangled Riddick with his umbilical cord and believed him dead, but Riddick actually survived. In Chronicles, the Lord Marshal and his army of Necromongers attacked Helion Prime. The Lord Marshal noticed Riddick when he killed one of his men. Suspicious of his abilities, the Lord Marshal has Riddick taken into his fortress to confirm his identity. Placed before the psychic Quasi-Deads, who claim Riddick is a Furyan, the Lord Marshal orders his death. Luckly, Riddick escapes and runs into Toombs, who takes Riddick to Crematoria. The Lord Marshal commands Necromonger Commander Vaako to find Riddick and have him killed, so Vaako sets out with a small group of Necromongers and a Purifier to bring him down. Vaako is curious as to why the Lord Marshal is so afraid of Riddick. With encouragement from his rabidly ambitious wife, Dame Vaako, the two learn, before he achieved his current title, the Lord Marshal destroyed the Furyans homeworld of Furya and its citizens. This occurred after a seer foretold that a single Furyan would cause his downfall. They deduce Riddick is the one in the prophecy. Vaako returns to the Legion Vast, where the Lord Marshal promotes him for killing Riddick. Not quite convinced of Riddicks death, the Lord Marshal orders the Final Protocol, which will ultimately destroy all life on Helion Prime. But Riddick already infiltrated the mother ship and makes his way to the throne room, where he comes face to face with the Lord Marshal. Riddick battles with the Lord Marshal, whose unique powers prove too great for Riddick to handle. But the Lord Marshal was killed afterwords by Riddick at the end.He was played by Feore.PurifierA member of the Necromonger fleet, the Purifier revealed that he, too, was Furyan like Riddick, before being converted. When Riddick falls unconscious after fighting the Necromonger fleet chasing him, the Purifier pulls him into the safety of the hangar and tells Riddick, We all began as something else. Regretting what he has done under the Necromonger influence, the Purifier tells Riddick that the Furyan in him hopes he goes after the Lord Marshal, before committing suicide by walking into the sunlight of Crematoria.He was played by Roache.Pope JoePope Joe is a hermit, and former Bovine Veterinarian, that lives in the sewers of Butcher Bay. After Riddick retrieved his radio from the sewers, he heals Riddick, and is credited with giving him his eyeshine that he uses throughout the franchise to see in the dark, but is not believed to be the actual source.CreaturesM6-117 AliensThese aliens are the predatory creatures from Pitch Black. They live on the planet M6-117, every 22 years on which an eclipse comes, in which a huge planet goes in front of M6-117 and the two planets stay aligned for a long (but undefined) amount of time. It is referred to as an ever-lasting-darkness. The M6-117 Aliens are also known as Biorapters.Ursa Luna HumanoidsThese are humanoids seen in the flash movie on the Pitchblack.com website. They can see in the dark (like Riddick, who they refer to as Darkeye) and they live in the Ursa Luna prison (a.k.a. Slam City) where the guards do not tend to go. The Ursa Luna Humanoids are also called Shiners.Crematoria HellhoundsThe Crematoria HellHounds are dog-like creatures from The Chronicles of Riddick that live on Crematoria. The guards at the prison release them to kill/eat the prisoners when its feeding time.The Crematoria HellHounds can also be called Crema-hounds for short.LennsersLennsers are cyborgs from The Chronicles of Riddick. They see in infrared vision, the Necromongers use them to detect breeders. Body movement professionals were used to show the lennsers as robots without free will.LocationsAll Chronicles of Riddick stories take place in the distant future of the 28th century, long after mankind has discovered faster-than-light flight and has since colonized most of the inhabitable worlds across the galaxy.UnderverseA parallel universe described as a dark mirror of the normal universe where death has no meaning, the Underverse is the ultimate destination for the Necromongers, who are being led there by the Lord Marshal, the only being to have actually been to the Underverse. Lord Marshals pilgrimage to the Underverse gave him almost supernatural powers, and he returned a holy half dead.EarthThe homeworld of the human race, the planet Earth is no longer considered a significant planet in the grand scheme of the galaxy as hundreds of other more strategic and resource-rich worlds have also been colonized. Earth has never been seen in the Riddick universe, and few characters have even mentioned it. Of the few who have, Paris in Pitch Black, before he is eaten alive by the planets creatures, mentions that he wanted to die In France, on Earth. I never even saw France.M6-117This is a moon of a planet which was the first world seen in the franchise and also the primary setting for the first live-action feature film Pitch Black. Although it has a similar atmosphere and gravity to Earth, M6-117 is a desolate desert experiencing almost constant daylight hours from three suns. One is solitary, while the other two form a binary pair. Once every 22 years, the moon will experience a eclipse of all the suns as they set behind the parent planet and the eclipse lasts for months, allowing nocturnal creatures who are harmed by light to emerge onto the surface from a network of vast, underground caverns. It is implied that these creatures were responsible for making all other lifeforms on the planet extinct, and are responsible for turning the surface into a graveyard. Their sizes range from bat-sized to about twice the size of a regular human. A previous human mining operation on the planet, who gave it the designation M6-117, suffered the same fate.Aquila MajorSeen destroyed during the opening scenes of The Chronicles of Riddick, Aquila Major appears to be very urban but also densely forested in many areas as well. After a devastating campaign against the Aquilans, who are forced to either convert or die, the Lord Marshal of the Necromongers orders the destruction of the planet with a massive bombardment known as the Ascension Protocol.Aguerra PrimePresumably the major planet in the eponymously-named Aguerran System, part of Assault on Dark Athena is set here. Over the course of the game the planet comes under siege by the mercenary/slave ship Dark Athena, which takes out it orbiting satellites to prevent the planets colonists from contacting outside help, before starting a ground assault and eventually docking the ship itself at its primary spaceport. Most or all of its inhabitants are killed or harvested for Drone recruitment, remotely-controlled cyborg soldiers.UV-6First appearing in Chronicles of Riddick, this cold, barren planet is covered in ridged terrain that resembles giant fingerprints. Riddick hides here in a cave which is actually the skeleton of a whale-sized carnivorous creature, for five years, between the events of Dark Fury and Chronicles of Riddick.CrematoriaDescribed as one of the last remaining triple maximum security prisons, Crematoria is a harsh prison colony reserved for only the most dangerous criminals.  The surface of the planet is uninhabitable, as the temperatures are in the wild extremes: 700F on the daylit side and -300F on the nighttime side. This makes the prison almost impossible to escape from, as there is only a constantly shifting twilight buffer zone on the surface of about 20 miles where humans can survive and where travel is possible.FuryaFurya was once a bustling planet whose inhabitants were fierce warriors, perhaps even a superior off-shoot of normal human beings due to the harsh conditions of the planet. The Lord Marshal of the Necromongers bombarded the planet and massacred the inhabitants in order to prevent the fulfillment of a prophecy that a Furyan would cause his downfall. This massacre takes place 30 years before The Chronicles of Riddick. An unknown but slim number of Furyans managed to escape the devastation, and from Furya itself, but the planet is now dead, with no life to speak of.Helion PrimeA major planet of the worlds of man, Helion Prime was founded as a world where men of all faiths, religions and creeds could peacefully co-exist. It is now a flourishing and prosperous world, and the location of the city New Mecca and home of Abu Imam al-Walid and his family. The planet is constantly lit through artificial means. It is here where Riddick first learns of the Necromongers. New Mecca is taken over by Necromongers after a brief one night long battle between Necromongers and Helion troopers (although armed Helion resistance continues until Riddick kills the Lord Marshal), but gains freedom after Riddick slays the Lord Marshal. The only planet to be seen or at least mentioned in all three Riddick films.Lupus FiveThe planet where Kyra joined the mercenaries. It is mentioned in Chronicles of Riddick and is seen in the Hunt For Riddick game. It appears to be barren and over-industrialized, and contains a well-developed space transportation industry.Planet OriginSeen in the internet flash game Hunt for Riddick, little is known about the planet Origin but the game begins at and appears to be mostly a shipyard.Races / factionsMercsSince the main character of the franchise is an escaped convicted murderer with a big price on his head, mercenaries and hunters feature heavily in the stories and are often simply referred to as Mercs. It would also appear that being a Merc is a common profession in the Riddick storyline. Mercs are often depicted as inept when compared to Riddick, simple-minded, greedy and immoral.FuryanThe Furyans are an off-shoot of the human species. Riddick is one of the last surviving Furyans. In The Chronicles of Riddick it is revealed that he is the Alpha Furyan, the strongest of the race.In the movie Pitch Black, Riddick is renowned for the unique appearance and function of his eyes. When asked about it, he says that his eyes received a surgical shine job on Butcher Bay by a doctor for 20 menthol Kools. However, in Chronicles of Riddick: Escape from Butcher Bay it is revealed that the doctor, Pope Joe, was not responsible for this procedure. Pope Joe merely stitched a wound on Riddicks arm in payment for the retrieval of Pope Joes beloved radio.  The eye shine was developed in an as-yet unspecified fashion but was either developed or granted to him through his heritage as Furyan.In Chronicles of Riddick: Dark Fury, one of Antonia Chillingsworths frozen specimens is labeled as a Furyan. The label is emblazoned with Furya, accompanied by the comment Killer Of Men beneath the plaque.Furyans are impressive physical specimens; They are stronger, faster, tougher, and hardier in most respects than the humanoid races in the Riddick universe. Riddick is considered the strongest and most powerful Furyan seen. Riddick has been bestowed with The Wrath of the Furyans or The Furyan Rage. This is essentially the collective anguish, pain, suffering and anger of the billions of Furyans who didnt escape the Necromonger slaughter 30 years ago.  Its use is displayed against Vaako and the Hunting Party of Necromonger Soldiers, and he also used this technique against Abbott and his fellow prison guards in Butcher Bay post-interrogation.The extent of the physical abilities of a Furyan are unknown. Riddick has held his own against particularly vicious predatory creatures (from Pitch Black). His physical strength and stamina allowed him to escape detainment by the hunter Johns in Pitch Black. He has inordinate athleticism and agility as demonstrated by his raw speed evading the creatures.ElementalsThe Elementals are introduced in The Chronicles of Riddick. The one that is seen in the film, Aereon (played by Dench), is humanoid and is seemingly composed of nothing more than dense air. She becomes translucent when in the presence of blowing winds and, because of her negligible mass, she can glide through the air for extended periods of time (which is often confused with an ability to fly). The novelization by Dean Foster states that the Elementals are an offshoot of humanity. One of the Necromongers refers to her as an Air Elemental (which in classical ceremonial magic is what Paracelsus calls a sylph).  And the novel also hints that there are fire, water, and earth Elementals, but no other members of this race are seen in the film.  According to the DVD, there are also elementals that represent Aether.As portrayed in the film, the Elementals are a logical race, deciding their actions on complex calculations rather than on personal opinions or emotion.  They are largely a neutral people, apparently unwilling to participate in the conflicts that they view as beneath them, but take action when their calculations show that their intervention is necessary. The Necromongers point out that the Elementals do not seem to believe in any god. Dame Vaako in the film refers to them as witches and spies, which is likely meant simply to provoke Aereon.Diesel says that in the next film he will meet fire and water Elementals, possibly explaining more of their society and evolution.The only other possible Elemental seen is a mentally offset prisoner in Escape From Butcher Bay who considers himself to be an Elemental king.NecromongersThe Necromongers are a cult of warriors, with their own distinctive architecture and uniforms representing their religious beliefs, who conquer planets as they make their way on a grotesque pilgrimage to Underverse--their promised land. Their religions code of conduct states that you keep what you kill, which applies to almost anythingnot the least of which meaning that anybody could challenge the leader of the Necromongers and take his place by killing him, although due to his supernatural abilities none before Lord Vaako had dared to attempt to do so. Their leader, as Lord Vaako states is the holy half-dead Lord Marshal (who can even steal the souls of his enemies), systematically commands his Necromonger Legion Vast to overrun worlds and convert its inhabitants into Necromongers; those that oppose conversion die. Converts receive the mark of pain which is meant to instill in them the idea that one pain can lessen another. Due to the Lord Marshals prior foray into the Underverse, the Necromongers have the most advanced and dangerous weaponry in the galaxy, able to destroy planets, which they do after a campaign to replenish their ranks. The Lord Marshal launched a personal crusade against the planet Furya, after being told a prophecy by a seer that a Furyan would lead to his downfall, which proved to ultimately be true. The Furyan who finally killed him was Riddick.ReferencesChroniques de Riddick (saga)
12560100
Alish_Lambaranski
right|thumb|220px| Alish LambaranskiAlish Lambaranski (Azeri: li Cmil olu Lmbranski) (1914, Lambaran, Karabakh region1999, Baku) was an Azerbaijani petroleum engineer who developed a successful career in the Azerbaijan to become chief of a large oil refinery. He won a Stalin medal for his work in fuel mining. After that, he led Azerbaijans union of oil refineries, Azpetrolplants. Later in his career, Lambaranski was appointed Mayor of Baku, a public post he successfully held from 1958 to 1966.(The Architectural Face of Modern Baku. Profile: Alish Lambaranski by Azad Sharifov. Azerbaijan International. Winter 1998, #6.4). After that Alish Lambaranski held the post of the Chief Engineer/Architect of the City of Baku for many years.Back in the 1960s, one of the most persistent problems in Baku was a lack of housing. In order to change the situation, Lambaranski assembled a strong, professional team of city leaders and soon developed a plan to solve the housing problem. His plan was to create micro-regions with public utilities and playgrounds. He also widened Bakus crowded streets, and replaced the noisy, old trams with trolleys and motorized buses. Older, single-storied buildings were torn down to make room for new construction.The list of building projects that he carried out includes the Palace, Palace, the renovation of the Opera and Ballet Theater when it burned down, the of Young Spectators, the Plant of Consumer Conditioners and the of Deep Water Sea Foundations, not to mention several large residential districts. New cinemas, schools, kindergartens and cafes appeared in Baku as well. Lambaranski traveled quite extensively, and once while abroad, he noticed beautiful, colorful benches placed under trees. He knew that the people of Baku liked to stop and chat whenever they met, so he began producing benches to give the people a place to rest while they talked. The benches became so popular that the famous Azerbaijani composer Guliyev, a good friend of his, composed a lively tune called The Benches of Baku. Known for his efforts, Lambaranski soon became popular among the people of Baku. They respectfully and affectionately called him our mayor instead of the usual title, Chairman of the City Executive.(ReferencesLnbranski
12572928
Elizabethtown,_New_Mexico
Elizabethtown is a small unincorporated community in Colfax County, Mexico, States. It is located just off Mexico State Road 38, between the communities of Eagle Nest and Red River. It is just east of the National Forest. The community is a former mining town, and lies northeast of Mountain, and west of Baldy Mountain.HistoryMostly a ghost town now, Elizabethtown began in 1866 with the founding of area gold mines and the Copper Mine. It was New Mexicos first incorporated town.  Founded by the commander of Fort Union (north of Vegas, New Mexico), Captain William H. Moore, and named for his daughter, Elizabeth Catherine Moore. Nicknamed E-Town, the town grew to over 7000 residents at its height of prosperity in 1870, and it was designated the first seat of the newly formed Colfax County.  In 1872 there were only about 100 residents left as the mines dwindled, and the county seat was moved to Cimarron. The town revived somewhat when the Topeka and Santa Fe Railroad passed nearby in the early 1890s, making mining feasible once again. The village was also part of the County War. A fire took most of the town in 1903, and the town mostly died out by 1917 with the decline in the mines.Serial killer Charles Kennedy lived between Elizabethtown and Taos, luring weary travelers to dine and stay with him at his cabin; he may have killed 14 or more people.(Story of Charles Kennedy - at Legends of America) Kennedy was killed by a group of angry vigilantes, led by the notorious Allison.GeographyLocation of Elizabethtown is  (36.619198, -105.28445).The elevation is 8481 feet (2585 m).                     Major highways* Mexico State Road 38References(External links* Elizabethtown page @ Legends of America(New Mexico)
12591215
Overcapitalisation
Overcapitalisation refers to an economic phenomenon whereby the valuation/ price of an asset is superior to its real value  however difficult to define - therefore putting a strain on attempts to obtain a reasonable on investment. This is especially the case when goods are at stake which are necessary to engage in the production of goods or delivery of services (e.g. agricultural holdings, industrial plants, etc.). It is less the case with those contemporary financial instruments that are valued not for their returns, but for their potential earnings upon resale. Overcapitalisation is closely related (in causes and consequences) to inflation. As the financialisation of the economy has led to the monetisation (also called securitisation) of many non-financial assets, such as estate, infrastructures, etc., overcapitalisation has become rife, with deleterious consequences at the level of firms (struggling to achieve an unrealisticly high level of profitability), households (struggling to pay their inflated mortgage), and individuals (whose equity holding, and hence borrowing and repayment potential, may be vastly over-valued).ExamplesIn his book Collapse, Diamond gives an example of widespread overcapitalisation (Chapter 13, Mining Australia, paragraph on imported values) when he describes how settlers in Australia bought or leased land at prices derived from those at home (England), and then were pushed very hard (and usually failed) to achieve the necessary returns, wrecking the fragile resource in the process by over-exploitation.  
12608362
Kladno_District
footnotes                The Kladno District (Okres Kladno in Czech) is a district (okres) within the Bohemian Region (Stedoesk kraj) of the Republic. The capital of the district is the city of Kladno.Complete list of municipalitiesBle -Bloky -Beovice -Blichov -Blevice -Brandsek -Brakov -Bratronice -Buthrad -ernuc -Chrn -Cvrovice -Dolany -Drnek -Druec -Detovice -Dnov -Hobovice -Horn Bezdkov -Hoeovice -Hoeoviky -Hospozn -Hostou -Hradeno -Hrdlv -Hebe -Jarpice -Jedomlice -Jemnky -Kaice -Kamenn ehrovice -Kamenn Most -Kladno -Klobuky -Kmetinves -Knovz -Kole -Krlovice -Kutrovice -Kvlice -Kyice -Lny -Ledce -Lhota -Libochoviky -Libovice -Libun -Lidice -Lsk -Louck -Makotasy -Mal Kyice -Mal Ptono -Malkovice -Neprobylice -Neumice -Otvovice -Ple -Pavlov -Pchery -Pleten jezd -Plchov -Podlen -Potovice -Pozde -Pelc -isuty -Sazen -Slan -Slatina -Smeno -Steheleves -Stochov -Stradonice -Studenves -Svrov -Svinaov -lapanice -Tebichovice -Tebz -Tebusice -Tuchlovice -Tuany -Uhy -Unho -Velk Dobr -Velk Ptono -Velvary -Vinaice -Vran -Vrbiany -Zjezd -Zkolany -Zichovec -Zlonice -Zvolenves -elenice -ilina -iice - Gallery File:Kladno CZ St Florian chapel front view 028.jpg|St. Florian chapel by Ignc Dientzenhofer in main street of KladnoFile:Kladno CZ Mining sculpture Vana Stone 043.jpg|Mining sculpture and Vas Stone in a park next to the grammar school in Kladno commemorate mining past of the city.File:KladnoRozdelov.JPG|Row of 1950s high rises in style of realism in Rozdlov, western suburb of KladnoFile:Kladno CZ CSA Street towards W 192.jpg|Prefab houses (panelks) from 1970s along SA (Czechoslovak Army) Street, one of main arteries of Kladno.File:FBE CTU building.jpg|Building of the Faculty of Biomedical Engineering, a branch of Technical University in KladnoFile:CD Class 912 at Kladno station CZ 328.jpg|Class 912 diesel multiple unit at Kladno railway station. The district has quite dense railroad network but no trunk line passes through it.File:Slanska hora CZ from NNE 074.jpg|Hill of hora (330 m) with town of Slan at its foot as seen from apple orchards between Slan and BlahoticeFile:Slany CZ from summit of Slanska hora 021.jpg|Partial view of Slan from summit of hora File:Slany CZ pohled na centrum od Brodu 350.jpg|Gothic St. Gotthard Church from 13th century in SlanFile:Slany CZ Husova 0362.JPG|Pedestrian zone in centre of SlanFile:Slany CZ Velvarska brana 0376.jpg|Gothic Velvary Gate from 15th century in SlanFile:Slany CZ Holy Sepulchre chapel 204.jpg|Holy Sepulchre Chapel above Kvek in southern outskirts of Slan File:Mlynek Zizice CZ LO vz. 36 053.jpg|Back to 1938 state restored Pillbox Type 36 in a hillside above hamlet of Mlnek near iice. It was a part of so called Line a section of pre-WWII Czechoslovak fortifications against Germany defending western approaches to Prague.File:Knoviz CZ from SE 142.jpg|Landscape near KnovzFile:Saky CZ Baroque house after restoration 169.jpg|Baroque house in small village of Saky near TebichoviceFile:Brandysek CZ from W from Theodor 141.jpg|Landscape near Brandsek in central part of the districtFile:Expressway R7 CZ east of Brandysek 002.jpg|Expressway R7 (Prague - Chomutov) passing by BrandsekFile:Dretovice CZ St. Wenceslas church.JPG|St. Wenceslaus Church in DetoviceFile:Bustehrad CZ 240.jpg|Church of Exaltation of the Holy Cross in ButhradFile:Bustehrad CZ 238.jpg|Museum of writer Pavel in ButhradFile:Peter Stehlik 2009.05.12 Lidice 002aa.jpg|The memorial site where village of Lidice used to stand until its extermination by Nazi occupants in 1942File:Lidice_CZ_Horks_farm.JPG|Remains of Horks Farm, the site of mass murder of LidiceFile:Lidice CZ cross.JPG|Thorn-crowned cross above grave of Lidices menFile:Lidice 2001 denkmal der kinder von lidice.jpg|Memorial to abducted and murdered children from Lidice by Uchytilov. Each child has a life-sized bronze sculpture.File:Lidice CZ new Lidice municipal office.JPG|Lidice lives. New village of Lidice built in vicinity of its predecessor after War IIFile:Makotrasy CZ 01.JPG|Landscape near MakotasyFile:Budec CZ St Peter church 134.jpg|Church of SS Peter and Paul at early medieval fortified settlement of Bude near Zkolany. The rotunda built around 900 CE with tower added in late 12th century is the oldest preserved building in the whole Republic.File:Kolec Chateau CZ front and Holy Trinity Chapel from NNW 091.jpg|Desperately dilapidated chateau in KoleFile:Blevice CZ general view from NW 218.jpg|Village of BleviceFile:Velvary, Velk Buina, pohled k pu.JPG|Landscape near Velvary with Mt. p (460 m) on northern horizon. Such slightly rolled lowland with vast fields and almost absent forests is typical for the northern half of Kladno District. File:Velvary CZ Town Hall and St Catherine Church.JPG|St. Catherine Church and Town Hall in VelvaryFile:VRAN MSTYS - BRNA - ZIMA.jpg|Slan (Lower) Gate in Vran. The small market town never had real fortifications, except two symbolic gates on both ends.File:Klobuck menhir1.jpg|Menhir in Klobuky associated with legend about shepherd turned in stone.File:Kralovice KL CZ bridge over Bakovsky potok 085.jpg|Stone arch bridge over the potok stream in village of Krlovice. The bridge is decorated with pair of statues depicting St. Wenceslas and St. John Nepomucene, patrons of Bohemia.File:Neprobylice KL CZ belfry 085.jpg|Belfry in NeprobyliceFile:Trebiz CZ 031.jpg|Common in Tebz, a preserved village partially turned into museum. File:Lisky_CZ_Kralovka_030.jpg|Small shrine above Krlovka (Queens Spring) near LskFile:Libovice CZ from N 301.jpg|Village of LiboviceFile:Turany KL CZ belfry from E 259.jpg|Wooden belfry in Tuany. Unlike other areas of the Czech Republic many wooden bell towers survived into present time in Kladno District. File:Svidna deserted medieval settlement CZ 162.jpg|Periwinkle covers remains of medieval village of Svdna in a forest near Drnek. The settlement, deserted in early 16th century, belongs to prominent sites of Central-European medieval archaeology. File:SmecnoCastle.JPG|Renaissance castle in small town of Smeno was the seat of of Martinic, one of the most influential noble families of Bohemia File:Smeno, kostel.JPG|Holy Trinity Church in SmenoFile:LibusinStGeorgeChurch.JPG|Small St. George Church, surrounded with cemetery, stands in the middle of remains of Slavic fortified settlement from 9th - 11th centuries CE. The original Pemyslids domain, the core area of emerging Czech state encompassed the present day districts of Kladno and Prague-West.File:Dl Schller, duln v.jpg|Defunct Schller Colliery near LibunFile:Stochov CZ St Wenceslas Oak 0023.jpg|Half withered St. Wenceslas Oak in Stochov has witnessed over eleven centuries of Czech historyFile:Brakov, Highway R6.jpg|Expressway R6 (Prague - Cheb) passing by BrakovFile:Hostoun KL CZ Old Jewish Cemetery 116.jpg|Old Jewish Cemetery near HostouFile:Unhost air 4268.jpg|Aerial view of downtown UnhoFile:Kyice, Common 2.jpg|Common in KyiceFile:ilina (Kladno), Kladensk str.jpg|Thoroughfare in ilinaFile:Horn Bezdkov, Old Farm.jpg|Old farm in BezdkovFile:Bratronice, Landscape.jpg|Harvested fields near BratroniceFile:Vodn ndr Klava (03).jpg|Reservoir in near Lny supplies Kladno with waterFile:Ble, potok Vznice nedaleko JInova.jpg|Valley of small stream of Vznice in deep forests of Protected Landscape Area near Ble. These forests were hunting preserve of Czech rulers in the Middle Ages.()KladnoKladnoKladnode Kladnodi KladnojrsKladnoKladno(distrito)()Kladno(distrikt)(distrito)
12622848
The_Majestic,_Singapore
The Majestic () is a historic building on Tong Sen Street in Chinatown, Singapore. Located between the Park Complex and Hwa Building, it was known as Majestic Theatre, which was a opera house. HistoryEarly historyMajestic Theatre was a Cantonese house built by philanthropist Tong Sen, also a tin mining and rubber magnate, for his wife who was a Cantonese opera fan. Eu also formed an opera troupe for her, and bought the street on which the theatre sat, naming it Eu Tong Sen Street. The building was designed by and Maclaren, the leading architectural firm at that time which also designed Hotel and Memorial Hall. The theatre was completed in 1928. The Majestic Theatre was originally known as the Tien Yien Moh Toi Theatre or Tin Yin Dance Stage and was a venue for Cantonese opera until 1938, when it was converted into a cinema. The Shaw Brothers rented the place, renamed it the Queens Theatre, and used it to screen the latest Cantonese blockbuster films.When the Occupation of Singapore started in 1942 during War II, the theatre was renamed Tai Hwa Opera House when the Japanese Army took control of it. It was used to screen Japanese propaganda films.Post-war yearsShortly after the Japanese occupation ended in 1945, the Shaw Brothers lease over the theatre also ended in September the same year. It was then tenanted to The Majestic Film Company, which gave the theatre its current name. In 1956, Dato Wan Tho of Organisation with two partners, Wong Siew Leng and Teo Cheng Hay, bought the Majestic Teatre for S$1.1 million from the Eu family. During the 1950s and 1960s, the theatre was not only popular among the locals but also attracted stars from Kong such as Chang, Dai and Lan. In 1983, the Cathay Organisation became the sole owner after they bought out the partnership. The theatre continued screening films until 1998 when it was closed.Image : Majestic_Pic_-_3rd_center.JPGRedevelopmentIn the early 2000s, the Majestic Theatre was renovated at a cost of S$8 million into a three-story mall. The conservation building was then renamed The Majestic, and was opened on 17 January 2003.In July 2007, Cathay Realty, the estate subsidiary of the Cathay Organisation, put The Majestic up for sale at an estimated S$43 million.ArchitectureThe Majestic is one of the prominent landmarks in Chinatown, and the theatre was once the grandest building there. The building is a mixture of Western and Chinese styles.The faade of the theatre is decorated with tiles depicting Cantonese opera scenes, and shiny and colourful mosaic which show flying dragons with heads and tails connected. The theatre was built to accommodate a capacity of 1,194. The opera house was a cavernous hallway with a huge domed ceiling, below which there is a logo of the letter M for Majestic.References**External links*Official website of the Cathay Organisationru:
12636982
Fryers_Forest
Fryers Forest is an eco-village in a forest setting in central Victoria, Australia. It features excellent planning, good examples of solar passive houses and sustainable management of native bushland systems. This rural eco-village consists of 11 residential titles (1 acre each) clustered within  of common native forest.It is currently the home for 27 villagers (17 adults and 10 children). The amenities include a small community orchard, three artificial lakes stocked with fish and a community house in the making.Holmgrens design and development of Fryers Forest settlement is perhaps his most significant test of his Permaculture principles. The settlement, known as the Fryers Forest Ecovillage, is near Castlemaine. Central features of the village design are, the integration of domestic forestry with selective thinning for fire-safety (the harvested wood provides fuel for domestic wood stoves), and the integration of the design system of water storage and transfer with the village road network and residential home site location. The water keyline storage system is the main design instrument for the regeneration of a landscape degraded by over 50 years of gold mining.Despite the claims that permaculture provides sustainable solutions, there is currently no data available on the sustainability of the Fryers Forest settlement. History of the AreaThe 1857 census collector described some of the mining settlements along Fryers Creek (where gold had been discovered in late 1851) generally as Fryers Forest. At the time its official population was 800, but did not include several hundred male Chinese diggers.External links*Fryerstown historical reference*Fryers Forest Ecovillage
12650075
Mrida,_Venezuela
footnotes Santiago de los Caballeros de Mrida, Venezuela, is the capital of the municipality of Libertador and the state of Mrida, and is one of the principal cities of the Venezuelan Andes. It was founded in 1558, forming part of Nueva Granada, but later became part of the General of Venezuela, and played an active role in the War of Independence.File:Merida-Teleferico.jpg|271px|thumb|View of the cable carMrida has more than 200,000 inhabitants and a metropolitan area containing some 350,000 people. It is the main center for education and tourism in western Venezuela, the home of the prestigious University of the Andes, and the location of the highest and second longest tramway in the world.Mrida is at an altitude of approximately 1,600 meters (5,249 ft). The city sits on a plain in the valley of the Chama river, which runs from one end to the other.  The backdrop of  Mridas skyline is the countrys highest summit, Bolvar. History Mrida was founded by Rodrguez Surez on October 9, 1558 in one of the Pamplonian mining expeditions he led. He named the city after his birthplace, Mrida. The first settlement of Mrida was not the current one but 30 km to the south, in Xam, where today stands Lagunillas. Nevertheless, Rodrguez Surez had to move the settlement in November 1559 to nearby El Punto (presently the Zumba area of Mrida), because of constant confrontations with the native neighbours.( History of Mrida Yahoo Viajes Espaa)Rodrguez Surezs foundation had not been authorized by the New Granadian Authorities, so in 1560 they sent de Maldonado to arrest Juan Rodrguez and regularize the new city. On June 24 Maldonado moved Mrida to its present location on the plateau and rechristened it as Santiago de los Caballeros. The city then came to be governed by the corregimiento of Tunja until 1607, when it became itself a corregimiento of the Audiencia of Santa Fe.(In 1622, Mrida became the capital of the Governorate of Mrida, whose chief official established his residence there. The city and territory were part of New Granada until 1777, when it was integrated into the Captaincy of Venezuela .The city was elevated to the status of an see in 1785. This led to the creation of a seminary, which in 1811 became the University of the Andes. Etymology The city received its name from the founder Juan Rodrguez, in honor of his birthplace, Mrida in Extremadura, Spain. However, de Maldonado renamed it . In 1559, he changed the name again, calling it  (Saint James of the Knights). Over time, the name  came to be adopted, combining the previous appellations.The name of Mrida in Spain comes from the Latin form Augusta, from Emeritus, one who has merit, in reference to Roman soldiers who were licensed from the army. Another feature common to both the Spanish and the Venezuelan Mridas is that in both cities, there is a tributary of the main river with the name Albarregas. The residents of Mrida, Venezuela, are called M, while the inhabitants of Mrida, Spain, are , and those of a third Mrida in Mexico are referred to as . Famous residents Mrida has had several famous residents who have been distinguished in areas such as humanistic research and essay-writing, the occupation of the most famous Merideos: Febres Cordero, Rincn Gutirrez, and Picn Salas.  Other distinguished Merideos are: Politics and government Mrida is the seat of the state and municipal governments, and is also home to the Governor and the Mayors offices, the state legislature, and the regional offices of the judicial and electoral branches. Important representatives and governors are also taken to this city to meet at an annual voting session. Moreover, 13 of the 15 prefectures of the Libertador Municipality are located within the city.Nowadays, politics have an important role among the general population, although to a lesser extent than in the larger urban centers, and the most important government positions, including Mayor and Governor, are held by members of the official party, the Republic Movement.  Because of the great concentration of students, and the importance of the Universidad de Los Andes in local development, the positions of University Director and President of the Student Body of the University of The Andes are also of great importance within the local political scene; the first of these offices is currently filled by an opposition party member. Due to the recent suspension of the elections for President of the University Student Body, the city has seen an intense wave of protests that have left more than a dozen wounded.In the 2004 Venezuelan recall referendum, the city of Mrida voted against the overall trend, as at least 60% of voters opposed the continuation of President Chvezs mandate. By contrast, the majority of the rest of the population of the state of Mrida voted in favor of Chvez. Geography File:S5030026.JPG|200px|thumb|Mrida as seen from the first stop of the Cable CarThe city is located in the center of the Venezuelan Andes, in a wide plain in the valley of the Chama river, between the Nevada de Mrida to the southeast and the La Culata to the northwest. The old quarter of the city is on the plain known as Tatuy.Mrida has four principal rivers, and some smaller seasonal streams in the less urbanized parts of the city. These have a significant water flow only in times of heavy precipitation. The most important river is the Chama, followed by the Albarregas, which cross the plain and divide it into two parts: the Banda Occidental (west bank) and the Banda Oriental (east bank). These two rivers run from one end of the city to the other. The other two principal rivers, the Mucujn and the Milla, flow into the Chama and Albarregas. In the lower part of the city is found the La Rosa lake, one of some 200 lakes in the state of Mrida.In the center of the city the terrain, located on a plain, is almost flat.Nonetheless, there is an average incline of 3 to 7 degrees, which causes a difference in altitude between the high and low parts of the city of more than , the average being  above sea level at the Plaza Bolvar. However, the areas surrounding the city are rough and uneven, situated in the valleys formed by the Chama and Albarregas rivers and the Sierra Nevada and Sierra de La Culata ranges.The valley in which the city is located was formed approximately 40 to 60 million years ago with the creation of the Venezuelan Andes and its continuous erosion by the areas water systems. Its soils consist of alluvial sediment and clay. Below the city runs the major tectonic fault in the western part of the country, the Bocon fault, which forms part of the American Plate.The vegetation in the interior of the city consists of medium to tall trees, and ferns (Pteridophyte), located mainly near the basin of the Albarregas river. On the outskirts of Mrida, one finds non-urbanized areas, where sub-mountainous and seasonal jungle vegetation predominates. On the other hand, vast coniferous forests extend toward the south, where they were planted some years ago. Toward the north and east, one finds forests.Significant among the local fauna are important populations of certain small and medium-sized birds such as hummingbirds and parrots (Psittacidae), spread particularly to the south of the city. Climate Despite the fact that the country in general has hot weather and a tropical climate, Mrida  is more temperate with a mountain climate. This is because of its geographical location, in the Andes mountains, and its high altitude.Though pollution has caused a rise in temperatures, this has been less, in relative terms, than in other important cities in Venezuela, with readings that vary between 18 C and , with an overall average of . Precipitation is of medium intensity during the rainy season, from April to November.Venezuela is situated in an inter-tropical zone, so that there is very little temperature variance over the course of a year. The same is true in Mrida&mdash;the temperatures recorded in August are normally comparable to those measured under comparable conditions in broad daylight in January.On the other hand, given Mridas location in the interior of the country, far from the maritime coasts and the influence of the ocean, and its high altitude, the temperature variance over the course of a day is relatively high. Between day and night a difference of more than 10 C (18 F) can be observed; this difference sometimes reaches more than 20 C (36 F). The maximums are reached during the day, and are usually around , but on rare occasions exceed . The lower limit of daytime temperatures tends to be around .( Tutiempo: Registros diarios de temperatura de la ciudad de Mrida desde 1994.)date City planning Because of its location on a plateau, in a small valley, covering an area of some 10 to 15 km in length and between 1 and 3 km wide, the city now lacks additional space for urban development. Though its polygonal area covers some 60 km,( ULA, Alcalda de Mrida, Universidad de Catalunya, RedIALA: Jornadas de estudio previo al Plan especial del Parque Metropolitano de Mrida. 2003. Mrida, Venezuela. Archivo .pdf.) the city occupies a little over 25 km, and the rest consists of less developed zones or areas of uneven terrain, such as mountains or hillsides.For this reason, the city layout is unorganized, oriented only by the traffic axes constructed in decades past. The layout of the city center or Old Quarter is in the Colonial style, consisting of eight major avenues running East-West and forty streets running North-South, creating blocks of 50 to 100 m per side.Historically, Mrida has been characterized by less pronounced differences between socio-economic classes and for its high quality of life.  Recent years, however, owing to the economic situation confronting the country, have seen a significant increase in slums in the hills and outskirts of the city.The southeastern part of the city, historically the headquarters of the large Haciendas that produced cane, has for several decades undergone major urban development, consisting principally of single-family dwellings, and has grown almost to the point of joining with the city of Ejido, a bedroom community. Ejido currently extends to within less than 2 km of the border of Mrida, and the two cities are linked by a large avenue that goes from the neighborhoods of downtown Mrida to the outskirts of Ejido. At this point, it turns into a highway, running to the city of Viga, thereby uniting Mridas metropolitan area.Despite the limited space available for development, Mrida has the largest proportion of green areas per capita in Venezuela, thanks to its many squares and public parks, the one surrounding the river Albarregas being particularly noteworthy. The School of Architecture( Igor Puentes: Proponen red de espacios pblicos para mejorar calidad de vida de los merideos. Universidad de Los Andes. 17 November 2005 Mrida, Venezuela. Enlace web.) of the University of the Andes puts into practice diverse proposals for creating areas protected from urban development, thereby reducing the impact of population growth on the environment. Neighborhoods There were only two neighborhoods in the city at the beginning of the 20th century. One of them was Casco Central (central quarter), located in the east bank of the plateau; which in turn was divided in various zones, identified according to the name of the local square within. The other neighborhood of the city was by the other side of the Albarregas river, in the west bank. It was known as La Otra Banda (the other bank). However, as a result of the Boom, immigration and various other reasons, new neighborhoods appeared as years went by. The first to emerge were those near downtown. Then, due to the lack of real estate and in the search of quieter areas, neighborhoods were created far, at the time, from the city center. Some of these old spurs have now become part of the city. The following are the main neighborhoods of the city.File:Vista panormica plaza Bolvar.jpg|thumb|363px|right|Panoramic view of the Square next to the Government Palace and the Cathedral in the Casco Central;Belensate: Predominantly a higher-class neighborhood, it contains the largest and most luxurious houses in the city.;Casco Central: It comprises the historic city center. It is the main commercial, cultural, and urban area, containing most  museums, libraries, churches, and retail shopping stores in Mrida.;Chama: It is a residential area for the middle class located in the vicinity of the Chama river. It is the lowest-altitude neighborhood in the city, situated about 200 m lower than downtown. It will be connected to Casco Central via an cableway planned as part of the Mrida trolleybus project.;Humboldt: It is a populated neighborhood to the southwest of the city, with increasing commercial development in recent years.;La Hechicera: Located at the northern end of the city, it contains the scientific and engineering buildings of the ULA, as well as the zoo and the botanical garden.;La Parroquia: This is the current name of the village formerly known as La Punta. It shares similarities with the Casco Central, with residential and commercial zones intermingled. It contains the second Bolvar Square in the city, as well as large public high schools and sporting facilities, such as the Metropolitan Stadium and the sport complex Cinco guilas Blancas.;La Pedregosa: It is a long neighborhood located in the valley of La Pedregosa creek. It is mainly a residential zone. Although connected to the city, it is far enough from it that its development has increased in the last decades due to the availability of suitable real estate.;Los Curos: This is a popular neighborhood, almost exclusively residential, though it houses one of the few industrial zones in the city.;Pie del Llano: Situated in the middle of the city, it surrounds the airport and local branches of a number of government offices, as well as the city Mayors office. It is a commercial and residential neighborhood with plenty of public parks.;Avenida 16/Campo de Oro/Santa Juana: It is a middle class neighborhood located in the geographical center of the city. It borders the Tatuy mesa, which houses a number of car dealers and auto shops and, above all, the largest hospital of the city, the IHULA (Instituto Autnomo Hospital Universitario de los Andes)Finally, it should be noted that the municipality is divided (for political purposes) into parishes; thirteen of the municipalitys fifteen parishes are within the city. Demographics Despite being one of the largest cities in the Venezuelan Andes, Mrida has traditionally been less populated in comparison to other more rapidly growing cities in the country. At the beginning of the 19th century, the city only had about 5,000 inhabitants. The demographic growth saw no major changes until the last three decades of the 20th century, when the population tripled, from 74,000 (according to the 1971 census) to the current estimate of 214,000. The increase in number of inhabitants was mainly due to a recent exodus of farmers moving to the urban centers, a phenomenon seen all over the country. Moreover, the prestige of the University of the Andes transformed Mrida in one of the leading educational centers nationwide. As a result, the city houses an important student population from all over the country.According to the last census, performed in 2001, Mridas population was of 204,879 inhabitants. This value does not include the population omitted by the survey, which was estimated to be about 6% nationwide. However, Mridas metropolitan (greater) area, which includes the neighboring cities of Tabay and Ejido, houses over 300,000 inhabitants.In 2006, assuming the usual natural level of growth in the area (between 2.1% and 3% annually), the population reached 230,000 inhabitants, while the metropolitan area would have reached 350,000, thanks to the high growth rate in the city of Ejido, which is one of the largest of the Andes area.( Instituto de Investigaciones Econmicas y Sociales: Mrida, Proyeccin de la poblacin por municipios y parroquias, al (30-06) 1990 - 2020. Universidad de Los Andes, Venezuela. Enlace web.)-->Other estimates indicate that the actual population of the city has now reached about 250,000 inhabitants and that the metropolitan area has 350,000 inhabitants.(( Instituto de Investigaciones Econmicas y Sociales: Poblacin nacida en el exterior por grupo de edad segn sexo y pas de nacimiento. Universidad de Los Andes, Venezuela. Enlace web.)The population of Mrida is relatively homogeneous. There is, however, a large community of foreigners, resulting from the inter- and intra-continental migratory patterns of past eras. Among these there are significant groups of Italians, Portuguese, and Colombians. According to the 1990 census, a little over 4% of the population&ndash;some 7,406 inhabitants&ndash;is of foreign origin.( Economy The city of Mrida has one of the lowest poverty indexes in Venezuela. According to the 2001 census, 18.09% of the population lives in poverty; this figure is beaten only by San Cristbal (17.05%) and the municipalities of Chacao (8.69%), Baruta (11.22%) and Antonio de Los Altos (6.13%) in the state of Miranda.( INE http://www.ine.gov.ve/secciones/menuprincipal.asp?nedo14&nvalor4_6&seccion4)The citys economy has been evolving and transforming since the beginning of the 20th century. Traditionally, agriculture formed the most significant part of economic activity in Mrida, which was the distribution center for agricultural goods in the state. Furthermore, large cane haciendas were located nearby; their income led to the construction of a central sugar refinery in which all of Mridas sugar cane was processed. This refinery was eventually abandoned and has now been converted into a museum. With the construction of Cable Car, the trans-Andes highway, and the citys airport, the citys economy evolved, with the tertiary services sector&mdash;especially tourism&mdash;displacing the primary agricultural sector.Tourism, dubbed the green industry, is the principal source of income in the city, and one of the most flourishing industries. Touristic activity benefits from the potential offered by the Andes mountains surrounding the city, and from the citys own parks, museums, and plazas, among other features. In addition, in recent years, owing to the creation of the only free cultural, scientific, and technological zone in the country, the city has begun to develop in the field of technology, thanks also to the support of the university in this matter.( Eleazar Santos: Ciudades ms atractivas para invertir. Consejo nacional de promocin de inversiones. 19/07/05 Caracas, Venezuela. Enlace web.)( Cifras de Paridad de Poder Adquisitivo (PPA). Instituto Nacional de Estadsticas.)( Corpoandes: Esquema de contenido Dossier de las entidades federales; Mrida. Mrida, Venezuela. Archivo .pdf.)The city of Mrida now stands out at the national level for its low cost of living( and its high (relative to cost of living) per capita income of $4,381, ninth among Venezuelan cities.( The service sector contributes a large percentage of the states income. In Mrida 82,537 people are economically active, of whom 6.67% are unemployed.( Transportation During the colonial era and long after independence, the city was isolated from other parts of the country because of the lack of transportation routes to the outside world. Midway through the 19th century, the first highway was built, linking the city with the rest of the country, thereby facilitating access and vehicular traffic. After this point other routes were planned, but lack of maintenance and the nature of the terrain have caused significant interruptions in land traffic between Mrida and the rest of the country. Airport The city has one national airport, Carnevalli Airport, which is embedded in the center of the city, and offers connections to the principal cities of the western Venezuela, such as Maracaibo and Caracas. Furthermore, this airport is one of the most active in the country, with more than 20 daily flights to and from Caracas alone. Other nearby airports, such as Aeropuerto Internacional Juan Pablo Prez Alfonso in El Viga, also serve Mrida.The airport was closed down however in 2009 due to the many accidents that occurred because of its difficult position within the Andes.The airport was built in 1956, on the former grounds of a slaughterhouse. Commercial air service is currently provided by two airlines. There is also an area for private aviation, which receives various types of private flights as well as air ambulance flights, and the delivery of parcels and other valuables. Road network File:Carretera transandina.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Troncal 7 (Highway) after a snowstormMrida has four large internal roadways, which run from one end of the city to the other, and five smaller roadways. The largest is the combination of the Andrs Bello and Urdaneta avenues. With a length of more than 8 km, it runs from the neighborhoods of the central quarter of Mrida to the outskirts of Ejido. The other three correspond to Las Amricas and Alberto Carnevali avenues; 16 de septiembre and Tulio Febres Cordero avenues; and the corridor of Los Prceres avenue.Two national highways connect Mrida with other cities in Venezuela. The first is Troncal 7 or the Highway, which runs to the city of Valera. This highway crosses the Andes by way of the valley of the Chama River, and, arriving at the region of Apartaderos, is crossed by Local 1. Finally, following the course of the Santo Domingo River, it arrives at the city of Barinas. The other national highway is the so-called Carretera La Variante. Upon arriving at the Estanques region it becomes Local 8 or Autopista Rafael Caldera. La Variante connects Mrida with El Viga, and in turn, with the Highway, thereby giving the city a connection with Colombia and with other important destinations, such as San Cristbal and Maracaibo.In addition to the national highways, three alternative routes exit the city of Mrida. The first, called the Va del Valle (Valley Road) links the city with the north, to various communities in the valley of the Culata, in the municipality of Santos Marquina. The second is an alternative route to the city of Ejido and other communities such as Jaj and La Azulita; it is also a tourism route, with various lookout points facing Mrida in its initial section. A third minor route, used exclusively by rural vehicles, connects the city with the community of Los Nevados and with the Sierra Nevada National Park. Public transport File:Telefericodemerida.jpg|200px|thumb|left|The 1957-opened cable car line to Espejo Peak (service currently suspended)Along with a trolleybus rapid-transit system (still under construction and not fully open), the city relies on a vast system of urban and interurban bus routes which connect the city with its metropolitan area. The conventional bus routes traverse the various avenues of the city and cover a large percentage of the citys area. Mrida has one of Venezuelas best public transit systems; nevertheless, the system has become overwhelmed by increasing demand, and may be beginning to collapse. Among the existing routes, the route from the center of the city of Ejido to the center of the city of Mrida stands out, with a volume of thousands of passengers daily.The bus routes are serviced by private companies, the majority of which are cooperatives or drivers associations, following the private model practiced in most of the cities in Venezuela. However, the prices charged are regulated by the city and supervised by the municipal organization for metropolitan transport. As is the practice throughout the country, the public transport system has special fares for senior citizens, and a student pass providing some of the lowest costs in the country.After years of study, the construction of a non-polluting mass transit system was proposed; the trolleybus was chosen as the most appropriate means of transport. Construction of the trolleybus system started near the end of the 1990s. The first line was inaugurated on June 18, 2007,(Morrison, Allen (5 January 2009). The Trolleybuses of Mrida, Venezuela. Retrieved 2010-02-07.) with 15 of 34 proposed stations completed. This route serves Ejido and Mrida. The second line is in the planning stages and is expected to be 12 km long with 3 common stations alongside or crossing route 1. Route 3, an cableway (originally planned to be a funicular), is a  3 km long route that will connect the community of Chama to a Mrida trolleybus station; construction has yet to begin. Once construction is completed, Mrida will be the first city in Latin America with under 500,000 inhabitants to have a rapid-transit system. The existing bus lines will be reorganized into 47 or so feeder routes, in order to provide better public transit to less-serviced areas. Regional transport The only regional public transit available in Mrida is by bus. These depart from the city bus station. In addition, there are other private terminals from which private lines depart. From the central station one can take buses to destinations within the state, the region, and the rest of the country. Some of the most heavily used routes in the country start from this station, in particular, those that link Mrida with the city of Caracas. Though Venezuela is undertaking the construction of a national railway system, the IAFE, in order to link together the country, the city of Mrida is not projected to be a stop on this system: the nearest stop will be the city of El Viga, some 60 km away. Points of interest Mrida contains numerous historical squares, colonial houses, churches, and government buildings that make up most of its sightseeing spots. Moreover, the educational development of the city due, for the most part, to its university (ULA) has contributed to the creation of museums, libraries, and centers for scientific research, such as the Center for Astronomy Research (CIDA), located a few kilometers from the city in the mountains near Apartaderos. Monuments, public buildings, and historic places ;House of Former Governors: This colonial-style villa, located in the central quarter, was the official residence of the state governors.;Rectorates Building: Seat of the universitys rectorate and Aula Magna.;Government Palace: The government building, regional branch.;Plaza Monumental Romn Eduardo Sandia: The Bullfighting Arena of Mrida was built in 1967. It has a capacity of 16,000 people and it is frequently used for cultural activities, besides serving its original purpose of bullfighting arena during the Sun Fairs.;Cable Car: The Cable Car is one of the main touristic spots. In its trajectory, it ascends from the central quarter to the Sierra Nevada. The cable car was completed in 1958. It has now been closed. Religious buildings Mrida has about two dozen religious buildings dedicated to Christianity, the most important of which are Catholic churches and chapels, since it is the religion with most number of followers in Venezuela.;Cathedral of Mrida: The citys Minor Basilica, built in Baroque style, similar to the of Toledo, Spain. It is the main Catholic building in the city, where the Archbishop of Mrida presides the mass services.;Iglesia del Carmen: The oldest religious structure in Mrida, Our Lady of Carmen Church stands close to the Plaza Bolvar. Visitors marvel at its colonial architecture and its historical significance - the church is a seat of the Carmelite Brotherhood. It served as cathedral of the city between 1812 and 1866, before the current one was built.;Iglesia de la Tercera;Iglesia del Llano: Mridas only building in the Gothic style. It stands near the place where an old chapel held the first wooden cross brought to Mrida by the Spaniards.;Iglesia de Milla: This is one of the oldest churches in the city, originally built in the 18th century and rebuilt in 1907 after an earthquake. It is located in front of the square with the same name.;Archbishops Palace:A Baroque palace located in front of Bolvar Square. It has served as the residence for the Archbishop since 1951. It houses the Archdiocesan Museum. Parks, squares, and sightseeing Mrida is famous nationwide for its great number of parks and squares, providing its inhabitants with access to nature. There are, at least, a dozen squares and two dozen parks, some of which are described below.;Boulevard de los Pintores (Painters Boulevard): On this street painters congregate in order to create, exhibit, and sell their works.;Aquarium Garden: This aquarium exhibits both fresh and salt water fish. It also has collections relating to Mridas rural past.;Beethoven Park: Located in front of the Museum of Modern Art in the northern area of the city, this pretty park has a clock on the ground, whose numbers are flowerpots, and large mechanical carillon clock with wooden elves that play melodies from the famous German composer.;Mrida Botanical Garden: This was the first botanical garden in the city. It is located in the extreme north of the city and has about 40 hectares under cultivation.;Parque Domingo Pea: Also called Paseo de la Feria or Parque de los Conquistadores, consists of an avenue with a lookout point facing the Sierra Nevada. Student celebrations and get-togethers often take place here.;Parque Metropolitano Albarregas: This park is the largest in the city, 22 km long and 612 hectares in area. It is located on the bank of the Albarregas River, and contains play areas for children and a sculpture museum.;Parque Ciudad de los Nios (Childrens City Park): A large childrens park, which models the shape of the city on a smaller scale.;Parque de las Cinco Repblicas (Park of the Five Republics): A park that is the home of the Bolvar Column, a monument dedicated to Bolvar. This was the first sculpture constructed to honor Bolvar, in 1842. It was commissioned by the then-governor of the province, Gabriel Picn. It was erected to commemorate the moving of Bolvars remains to the Panten Nacional in Caracas, from their previous resting place in the city of Marta, Colombia, where Bolvar had been buried following his death in 1830. The monument consists of a pillar on which sits Bolvars face in bronze.;Parque del Ejrcito (Park of the Army): A small park, located in the south of the city, commemorating Venezuelas army. It has green areas, a fountain, and models of military tanks.( Carla Silvana Crdenas: El Parque La Isla recupera su belleza. Diario Frontera 21 September 2005. Mrida, Venezuela.Enlace web.);Parque La Isla (Island Park): Situated in the former location of a coffee plantation of the same name, the park was built in 1960 partly as an underwater park, and is 3.5 hectares in area. Its infrastructure is reminiscent to that of an island, offering kids play grounds, trails, and athletic courts. The park houses the largest convention center in the city, as well as the headquarters of Corpoandes (a government-run corporation that promotes development in the Andes region), facilities for cultivating orchids, and a museum dedicated to beekeeping.; Parque Las tres Mridas (Three Mridas Park): A small park that commemorates the three cities in the world named Mrida (in Spain, Mexico, and Venezuela). It features architectural elements typical of each city.;Parque Zoolgico los Chorros de Milla: A small zoo situated in the extreme north of the city where the Milla waterfalls once flowed, it contains species indigenous to Venezuela and the Andes region.;Parque la Marina (Park of the Navy): Located in Belensate, it has a large water pool surrounding a submarine fin, an underwater clock, and a childrens play area in the shape of a boat.;Parque Tibisay: This park is dedicated to Tibisay, princess of the original dwellers of the region, the tribe Mucujn.  According to legend, she still laments the death of her fianc Chief Murach, who died bravely fighting the Spanish conquistadors. This park is located at the north end of Urdaneta avenue.;Plaza Beln: A small plaza, located to the northeast of the city center, in a neighbourhood of the same name. Its design, like that of most of the other plazas described here, follows the prototypical Spanish colonial style.;Plaza Bolvar: The past and present main square of Mrida, surrounded by the most important public and historical buildings of the city.;Plaza Glorias Patrias: Consists of twin plazas constructed in honor of the independence leaders Campo Elas and Antonio Pez.;Plaza Las Heronas (Plaza of the Heroines): A plaza constructed to honor five women from Mrida who fought for independence. It is surrounded by various markets and artisans shops, and the first Cable Car station.;Plaza de Milla: The actual name of this square is Plaza Sucre. It is located in front the Iglesia de Milla and near the army headquarters, northeast of the city center. It is dedicated to the independence hero Jos de Sucre, and it is frequently visited by locals and tourists alike, due to its convenient location amongst hotels, pensions, restaurants, stores, and ice cream parlors. Education Mrida is a student city with a large percentage of its population found in classrooms, especially in the university area, where 20-30% of the population consists of students, and has a 0% illiteracy rate. It is the home of the University of the Andes, one of the most respected universities in the country, and the second to oldest. Mrida also contains various institutions of higher educations such as universities, university centers, polytechnic institutes, and university colleges, among others. Universities The University of the Andes, the most important in the city, was established in 1785, and offers undergraduate programs in art, sciences, literature, and humanities, long and short programs, as well as courses, degrees, post-graduate programs, specializations, diplomas, etc., bringing together more than 40,000 students and 6,000 professors. The university operates two campuses in Mrida, and about a dozen faculties spread throughout the city.Two other more recently founded universities are based in Mrida: the Universidad Nacional Abierta (UNA), which offers undergraduate distance-learning courses; and, from 2006, the UNEFA, which is a military university specializing in Engineering for undergraduates.  The main university centers to be found in the city are given below:* University of the Andes, ULA.* Nacional Abierta, UNA.* Universidad Nacional Experimental de las Fuerzas Armadas, UNEFA.* Santiago Mario Polithecnic Institute, IUPSM.* Colegio Universitario Hotel Escuela de Los Andes Venezolanos, CUHELAV.* Santiago de los Caballeros de Mrida Institute, ISCM.* Antonio Jos de Sucre University Institute.* Cristbal Mendoza Technological University Institute.* La Frontera Technological Institute, IUFRONT.;Primary and Secondary EducationThere are many institutions dedicated to primary and secondary education, most of which are public, under the control of the national or regional governments.  Of particular note is the Liceo Libertador. The largest education centers in the city can be found among the many private Catholic schools.  Colegio La Salle de Mrida and Colegio San Luis are among the largest with several hundred pupils each.  These are run by governing bodies Fundacin La Salle and Don Bosco, respectively.  However, all schools come ultimately under the auspices of The Venezuelan Ministerio de Educacin.Other educational institutions worth mentioning are the schools dedicated to languages, sport and music. Mrida is known as a destination to learn Spanish. Jakera Spanish School http://www.venezuelaspanishschool.com is well known and recommended. In 2007 Jakera was voted by the industry (STAR awards) as one of the top four Spanish schools worldwide. There are  also important conservatories, orchestras and choirs based in the city.  Most are linked to the universities and specialize in many kinds of instruments, as well as lyrical interpretation and the deveopment of the singing voice. Amongst the language schools, of predominance are those that teach English, though French and Italian schools can also be found. Libraries The greatest network of libraries is that of the University of the Andes. Each school has a specialized library, as well as the multidisciplinary libraries located in La Hechicera, the sports division, the administrative division, and a number of other smaller libraries, adding up to more than a dozen under the direction of Serbiula. Moreover, ULA owns the largest digital archive of the country, available to the public for research and education.Besides the university libraries, Mrida has the Biblioteca Bolivariana (Bolivarian Library), which is also an area of exhibits and historical displays, a branch of the National Library of Venezuela, and the public library Simn Bolvar, subsidized by the government. Other public and private institutions such as schools, churches, and language institutes have their own minor libraries to be used by their members.Additionally, land originally set aside for a metropolitan library in 2006 was reallocated for the use of UNEFA, and a new site for the proposed library has yet to be granted. Culture The citys culture closely resembles that of Andean Folklore and is in fact the main, if not defining, example of this folklore. Inhabitants of Mrida, with deep connections to their culture, are characterized by their well-preserved traditions and slow, unhurried way of life. The city itself can be recognized by its many well-preserved  colonial parks and buildings, in addition to its famous social scene, the local art and craftwork, and the unique regional cuisine. Museums, cultural centers, and theaters Not many know that the Archdiocesan Museum of Mrida houses the second and third oldest bells in the world, the so called Ave Mara bell from the year 909 and San Pedro of 912.( Origenes del Museo Arquidiosesano http://www.arquidiocesisdemerida.org.ve/Museo-Origenes.asp) Festivals and local customs In addition to national holidays and events, several festivals take place and have origins in Mrida. Most are religious celebrations, and a few - such as the citys famous Feria del Sol or Sun Fair that takes place in the beginning of February - are of an international scale.For Mrida, the most important and famous religious traditions are those celebrated by the citys Christian devotees during Christmas and Week. These festivities include La Quema del Ao Viejo (Burning of the Past Year), La Pasin Viviente de Cristo (Christs Living Passion) and La Paradura del Nio (Christ Childs Standing) celebrated with prayers, song, fireworks, wine and cake.Another of the more popular local customs (those without official government sanction) are the Caravanas Estudiantiles, student processionals organized by and for high school or university graduates upon earning their degree. In recent years, this tradition has been extended to include younger students who have completed their primary or elementary education. Such celebrations usually occur during the first days of June for high school graduates, and throughout nearly the entire year for college graduates. Similar festivities can be found in other parts of the country, but the Caravanas of Mrida have a special relevance and importance given the citys large student population.Other customs firmly rooted in the Mridan tradition, usually associated with fixed dates, include Patinatas Navideas or Christmas skating, which occurs in the city streets throughout the month of December; the Fiesta de las Velas on December 7 when in the evening all the electricity is turned off and some 18,000 candles are lit; the Fiesta de San Benito between January 12 and 31 celebrated with a drummers processions and street dancing; or the Vasallos de la Candelaria, another typical festivity with children and street dancing. Cuisine The cuisine of the Mrida region differs notably from that of the rest of the nation. Among the most notable differences is the arepa andina (Andean Arepa), a variant of the traditional Venezuelan arepa made from  wheat flour instead of the more common corn. This difference in ingredients is due primarily to the fact that the Andean region was one of the few places in the country where wheat historically has been harvested. Another notable dish is the pizca andina, common to Mrida, Tchira and the Colombian Andes, a soup with potato, milk, long onion, and parsley. Other important dishes are prepared with trout, the only fish found in the region.The citys typical brightened sweets, made from a base of milk and other ingredients, are also notable. There is a historical tradition of such sweets, which are said to originate in the convents where they were prepared in the 19th century. Also, one can find alfajores, aliados, and almojabanas. Popular drinks include corn liquor, mistella, and donkeys milk, which is known as Andean punch. Music The traditional music of the city is marked by waltz rhythms. It also includes regional or national rhythms, such as pasillos,  a type of merengue and bambucos. The music of Mrida, like its people, is recognizable by the laid back rhythms. The use of the violin and mandolin are almost mandatory in the music style.  Additionally, the city is commonly the birthplace of many rock and punk bands, among other genres. The city is also home to the State Symphony Orchestra. Entertainment and tourism Mrida is the quintessential touristic city in Venezuela, being one of the most sought-after destinations by national and international travelers. Hotels Lodging accommodations can be found to fit all budgets, including pensions and apartments for tourists with basic amenities. At least half of the hotels are located within the city, which is about 35% of the total number state-wide.  All in all, there are about 2,650 beds available. Moreover, there will be three large five-star hotels added before 2007, when Mrida becomes the host of the soccer event Amrica. Shops The main commercial area of Mrida lies within the historic downtown. However, all kinds of services can be found in the suburbs. Two notable destinations by locals and tourists alike are Mridas Mercado Principal (Main Market) and the Heladera Coromoto (Coromoto Ice cream Parlor). The Mercado Principal is famous for its variety of folk art, gastronomy, produce, groceries, and other local and regional goods. Heladera Coromoto is well-known because it offers the greatest variety of ice cream flavors worldwide, with more than 800 choices.(709 flavors. Cfr. World Guinness Records, 1991.) Shopping malls For those who like to go shopping and spend the day enjoying stores or food courts, Mrida offers Las Tapias or Alto Prado shopping malls, located in Ave. Andrs Bello y la Ave. Los Prceres, respectively. There, you may also enjoy watching the latest films. Currently, there are under construction three larger malls on Ave. Las Amricas: Rosario Mall, Plaza Mayor, and Rodeo Plaza. There are rumors that Sambil will also open a branch in Mrida. Nightlife As a city popular with students and tourists, Mrida enjoys a broad network of places open at night for entertainment of a public with varied tastes, composed principally of clubs and bars. There are also various cafs, restaurants, and movie theaters. Furthermore, a number of cultural and popular events constantly take place in these locations. Notable among these events are the concerts of the Symphonic Orchestra of Mrida, as well as concerts of local bands, performing rock and other musical styles.Many of the night-clubs and discos open till 5 AM or so, with a few of them open until the sun rises next morning. A common practice among the thousands of college students is grab breakfast after partying all night long, and then go to bed. Media and communication  Television There are three stations which broadcast from Mrida. Two of these are general-interest stations, airing programs including news, entertainment, and culture. The third is an institutional and educational channel and belongs to the Universidad de Los Andes.The stations are:* OMC Televisin* Televisora Andina de Mrida, (TAM)* ULATV Radio The principal radio stations radio stations of the state also broadcast from Mrida. These stations are mostly privately-owned, though in recent years some public radio stations have emerged. Press Some of the best-known newspapers from Mrida are:* El Correo de Los Andes* Cambio de Siglo http://www.cambiodesiglo.net* Frontera http://www.diariofrontera.com* Diario Pico Bolvar http://www.picobolivar.com.ve* Cultura Tatuy Sports Mrida has a strong athletic infrastructure; noteworthy among others is the Guillermo Soto Rosa Stadium, an important soccer facility and the old headquarters of the local soccer team. During the last month of 2005, the city was host to the 2005 Andean National Games, an event for which numerous athletic facilities were built, including the Cinco guilas Blancas (Five White Eagles) Sports Complexa 42 000-seat stadium and the current home stadium of the local team, Estudiantes de Mrida F. C.. Soccer is the most popular and widely-supported sport, but given the citys location, a variety of sports are also practiced as well.In addition to the aforementioned soccer, the current athletic infrastructure also supports a wide array of other traditional sports, including tennis, basketball, baseball, and Venezuelan sports such as criollas.The Metropolitan Stadium of Mrida, dedicated on May 25, 2007 with a friendly match between Venezuela and Honduras, was host to the 2007 Amrica. Health care The city enjoys the highest quality of life in Venezuela.( Eleazar Santos: Cities Most Attractive for Investment. National Council for Promotion of Investment. 7/19/05 Caracas, Venezuela. web link.) In the year 2000, thirty-six health centers were located in the metropolitan area of Mrida, as follows: one type I hospital, one type III hospital, and one type IV hospital, in the city proper, plus 15 urban clinics, four of type III and 11 of type I. The area also has 18 rural clinics, 13 of type II and 5 of type I.As in other respects, the Universidad de Los Andes and its buildings are closely tied to the city; the health care infrastructure consists largely of medical centers belonging to the former, in addition to private health centers. Notable among the public hospitals that offer free services is the Instituto Autnomo Hospital Universitario de Los Andes (IHULA), the largest in the region, as well as two smaller hospitals and a chapter of the Venezuelan Cross. The larger private hospitals (commonly referred to as clinics) are the Clinical Hospital of Mrida, the Clinical Center, the Mrida Clinic, and the Albarregas Clinic. There are also another dozen smaller clinics.In spite of the precarious public health situation in the rest of the country, the city of Mrida has been affected the least, thanks to IHULA, for which the loss of patients to private health centers has been less extreme than in other Venezuelan municipalities. See also * (state)* Municipality, Mrida References ;Bibliography* Historia de Mrida, Carlos Chalbaud Zerpa, Universidad de Los Andes. 1985, Mrida, Venezuela.* Enciclopedia de Venezuela. Edicin de El Nacional. Caracas, Venezuela.* Nuevo atlas prctico de Venezuela. Edicin de El Nacional. Caracas, Venezuela.* Enciclopedia Conocer Venezuela. Salvat. Navarra, Espaa. ISBN 84-345-4251-X* The Trolleybuses of Mrida: description, map, 29 illustrations http://www.tramz.com/ve/me/me.html;NotesVenezuelaVenezuela(on Feneselan)ab:()(Venezuela)(Venetsuela)(Venezuela)(Venesuela)(chh)(, ), ()de los Caballeros de Mrida(Venecuela)de los Caballeros de Mrida()(Veneuela)(Venezuela)(Venezuela)(Venezuela)(Venezuela)()(Venesela)(Venezuela)(Venezuelo)(Veneuela)(Venezuela)()(Venezuela)(Venezuela)Venezuela()()(Mrida, Venezuela)(Venezuela)Venezuela(Venezuela)()(Venezuela)()()MridaVenezwela(Venezuela)(Venetiola)(Venecula)(Venesuela)(Venezuela)(Venezuela)(Venezuela)()(Venewela)(Benezuela)()Venezuela(Venezuela)()(Venezuela)(Venezuela)(Venezuela)de los Caballeros de Mrida(Veneula)(Venezuela)(Venessuela)(Wenezuela)(Venezuela)ksh:MridaVenezuela(Venezuela)()(Venezuela)(Venezuela)(Venezzuela)Venezuela(Venezuela)(Venezuela)(Wynezuela)()(grad u Venezueli)(Venezuela)Venezuela(Venezuela)()(Venezuela)Mrida()(Venesuea)Mrida(Venesoln)VenezwelaMridaBenesuwelaVenezuelazh-yue:zh:
12657900
Louisiana_pearlshell
The Louisiana pearlshell, Margaritifera hembeli, is a rare species of bivalve in the Margaritiferidae family. This mussel is native to Louisiana in the United States. It also once occurred in Arkansas, but it has been extirpated from all the waterways there.(Margaritifera hembeli. The Nature Conservancy.) It is a federally listed threatened species of the United States.This mussel reaches about 10 centimeters long by 5 wide and 3 high. It is dark brown or black in color with a white nacre.(USFWS. Final endangered status for Louisiana Pearlshell (Margaritifera hembeli). Federal Register February 5, 1988.)When it was first placed on the Endangered Species List in 1988 the mussel was thought to remain only in the Boeuf river system in Parish, Louisiana. It was found in eleven streams with 90% of the total population found in four of the streams.( The mussel was downlisted to threatened status in 1993 when more populations were discovered. It was found to inhabit eight streams in the Red River drainage in Parish, Louisiana.(USFWS. Determination to reclassify the Louisiana Pearlshell (Margaritifera hembeli) from endangered to threatened. Federal Register September 24, 1993.)This mussel lives in small, shallow creeks with sandy or gravel bottoms. They are found more often in riffles and areas with faster currents than in stagnant pools. The water is clear and the substrate is stable.(Like other freshwater mussels, this species releases its larvae, termed glochidia, into the water where they enter the bodies of fish as parasites to develop into juvenile mussels. Host fish species for this mussel include striped shiner (Luxilus chrysocephalus), redfin shiner (Lythrurus umbratilis), golden shiner (Notemigonus crysoleucas),( and brown madtom (Noturus phaeus).(Johnson, P. D. and K. M. Brown. (1998). Intraspecific life history variation in the threatened Louisiana pearlshell mussel, Margaritifera hembeli. Freshwater Biology 40(2) 317-29.)This species is threatened by the loss and degradation of its habitat. These habitat changes are caused by impoundments of the waterways, including the effects of dams. Some areas, including streams in the National Forest, undergo increased sedimentation from nearby silviculture, road maintenance, and livestock grazing. Gravel mining may also cause increased sediment.( analysis reveals the species has low variability, which makes it more vulnerable to changes in its environment.(Curole, J. P., et al. (2004). Extensive allozyme monomorphism in a threatened species of freshwater mussel, Margaritifera hembeli Conrad (Bivalvia: Margaritiferidae). Conservation Genetics 5 271-78.)ReferencesSource* Bogan, A.E. 1996.  Margaritifera hembeli.   2011 IUCN Red List of Threatened Species.   Downloaded on 25 September 2011.hembeli
12669476
UtahAmerican_Energy
UtahAmerican Energy, Inc. (formerly Andalex Resources), is  a bituminous coal underground coal mine and lignite mining company, headquartered in Utah. UtahAmerican is a subsidiary of Ohio based Energy Corporation. UtahAmerican is a company with approximately $65.1 million (USD) in annual sales, and 428 employees and was started in 1996.(UtahAmerican @ Manta.com)(UtahAmerican @ Hoovers)(Mining & Natural Resource Development page @ Emery County Economic Development) (Utah American Energy, Inc. at ZipperPages.com)Crandall CanyonThe company operates the Canyon Mine, a bituminous coal, underground coal mine in northwestern County, Utah, about  15 miles (24 km) west north-west of Huntington.On Monday, August 6, 2007, at 2:48 A.M., the mine collapsed, trapping 6 workers inside. The workers are approximately 3.4 miles (5.5 km) from the mine entrance and 1500 feet (457 m) underground. The collapse registered recorded waves in magnitude 3.9 to 4.0, by seismograph stations of the of Utah. Emery County, the states No. 2 coal-producer, was also the site of a fire that killed 27 people in the Wilburg mine in December 1984.(6 miners trapped in Utah coal mine collapse @ CNN.com)(Six miners trapped after Utah coal mine collapses @ Yahoo! News)(Utah mine owner: Rescue will take 3 days @ from AP at Yahoo! News)FinesOn March 20, 2008, the company was fined $420,300 by Federal authorities for flagrant violations at a mine in Utah.(  Coal company fined $420K for flagrant violations CNN.com March 20, 2008)MinesMines operated by UtahAmerican and managed by Genwal Resources Inc.:* Aberdeen mine (produced in excess of 1.8 million mt (2.0 million st) of coal in 2006)* Centennial mine* Canyon Mine* Canyon Mine* Pinnacle mine (produced in excess of 1.8 million mt (2.0 million st) of coal in 2006)* Smokey Hollow mine* West Ridge mine* Wildcat Loadout mineReferences
12677680
Commodity_value
In the field of economics, the commodity value of a good is its market value under optimal use conditions. In a free market, the commodity value of a good will be reflected by its price. For example, if an acre of land can yield a net of $100 dollars loss by laying fallow, $50 dollars gain by being planted with corn, and $100 dollars gain by being planted with wheat, then that acres commodity value is $100 dollars; the farmer is assumed to put his land to best use. Currency Commodity value is of particular significance in the study of currency. For example, the commodity value of a coin is the value of the metal of which it is made. Gold and silver coins have a high commodity value, whereas fiat coins such as modern day quarters have a low commodity value. This is of particular historical relevance when analyzed in light of Law. Debt Asset backed debt has a commodity value equal to the price of the collateral; a loan backed by a house has a commodity value equal to the free market price of the house. Non-collateralized debt, on the other hand, does not have a commodity value; it is valuable only insofar as it is repaid. Investment Commodity value is an important consideration in hedging against inflation. Whereas fiat currencies can devalue, often catastrophically, currencies with considerable commodity value are known to better maintain their value; a government can print as many fiat bills as it wants with relative ease, the same is not true of mining metals. This leads some investors to purchase goods and debts with high commodity value, which are inherently safer than those with low, or no commodity value, minimizing risk by sacrificing potential return.See also* as an investment
12687106
Eu_Tong_Sen
Eu Tong Sen (born 1877, Penang;(South China Morning Post, 12 May 1941) died May 1941, Singapore) was a leading businessman in Malaya, Singapore and Hong Kong during the late 19th and early 20th century. He was the son of Eu Kong Pui and Kong Puis first wife, Madam Leung in Foshan, China.(Rethinking Chinese Transnational Enterprises: Cultural Affinity and Business Strategies By Leo Douw, Cen Huang, David Fu-Keung Ip, David Ip, International Institute for Asian Studies, International Institute for Asian Studies (Leiden, Netherlands) Contributor Leo Douw, Cen Huang, David Fu-Keung Ip, International Institute for Asian Studies Published by Routledge, 2001; ISBN 0-7007-1524-X, 9780700715244; pp. 159-196, 205) He was vice-president of the Anti-Opium Society and a member of the Kinta Sanitary Board.(Twentieth century impressions of British Malaya: its history, people, commerce, industries, and resources, Arnold Wright, 1908; pp. 534-538, 856)OriginsHis father, Eu Kong Pui (1853)( also known as Eu Kong, was a Chinese immigrant from Foshan, Guangdong to Penang to work as a grocery shop assistant.(Three Kings, MOTORING NEWS & CAR REVIEWS, The Highway, May, 2002) He had a wife in Foshan, Madam Leung, and a wife in Malaya, Madam Man.((He built his fortune by acquiring from the British, monopolies for tax or revenue farming (opium, alcohol or spirits, gambling and pawn broking) in Perak in the 1880s and when tin started to boom, he acquired land for mining tin. He expanded this to retailing and taxing goods from China that he sold to the miners he employed(( and set up in Gopeng, Perak, a grocery shop that was later expanded to include a Chinese dispensary to treat Chinese immigrants. He operated his businesses under the mark Chop Yan Sang.(( He had two younger brothers, Eu Kong Chun and Eu Kong Tak. His business partner was Chiu Tong Hin and his attorney was Mr. Grant Mackie of the Straits Trading Company.((In 1890( or On 24 March 1891(Song Ong Siang (1923) One Hundred Years History of the Chinese in Singapore.London : J. Murray; p. 332, 333) at only thirty eight years of age, Eu Kong Pui died, suddenly.(  While he was still a child, Eu Tong Sen had been sent back to his mother in Foshan, China, to study. However, with the sudden death of his father, he found himself, at only thirteen years of age, heir to the family estates and tin mining businesses. He returned to Malaya in 1892 ()()  but his stay with his two uncles and his step mother was short. He moved to the home of Mr. R. Butler and lived there for two and a half years, taking private tuition in English from Mr. F. W. Harley. From there he moved to Ipoh and enrolled in a Government school.(( Later he would move to Singapore where he lived for some time before moving to Hong Kong when business conditions changed.(In 1898, at the age of twenty one, he took over his fathers estate from Mr. Mackie and discovered the business to be in decline. Over the next ten years he was to expand the family business and multiply his fortune many times over. He expanded his business empire in Singapore, Malaya and Hong Kong and, at thirty years of age, was one of the richest men in the region.(In Malaya and the Straits, when tax farming was abolished and tin prices started to fall, Eu Tong Sen ventured into rubber plantations in British Malaya and remittances between Malaya and Hong Kong.(Traditional Chinese MedicineAside from his involvement in the tin mining and rubber industries, he was also responsible for extending the family business of Chinese medicine manufacturer Yan Sang into Kong; he felt it was necessary to diversify out of the tin industry, which was coming under increasing government regulation.(() He transformed the business his father left him, originating from that single dispensary in Gopeng, into a chain of traditional medicine shops. In 1908 his medicine shops in Kampar and Gopeng were flourishing.(The Tin BusinessAt its peak his businesses owned a total of 11 mines and employed 12,000 miners.( The tin business, however, was in a state of decline by the time he took over management. By 1908 he owned two mines at Kampar, three at Gopeng, one at Tronoh, one at Chenderiang, and one at Papan, together employing about 8,000 coolies. In Selangor he owned one mine at Ampang and one at Kancheng, together employing 3,000 coolies. In Batang Benna, Negri Sembilan he owned one mine employing 1,000 coolies.(He set up the Sang Woh Foundry and extended his business into the manufacture and export of tin-made items which he shipped to China and Southeast Asian countries.(The Rubber BusinessIn 1908 he commenced planting two estates of 450 and ( and eventually grew his fathers business from their original two estates of 450 and ( until his rubber estates covered more than 283 hectares of land.( Remittance BusinessUnder Eu Tong Sen, Yan Sang shops in Gopeng and Kampar, extended to providing remittance services, allowing Chinese miners and plantation workers to send their earnings home.(((  As the remittance and medicines businesses expanded, branches were set up in Penang, Ipoh, Kuala Lumpur, Hong Kong and Singapore. In 1909 Eu Tong Sen established a branch in the Sheung Wan district of Hong Kong. As his branches increased and his business spread out geographically, his potential market grew accordingly.((Lui, 1990) In 1914, he expanded the remittance business to reach throughout Malaya as well as the East Indies, Hong Kong, and southern China.((  In the 1920s when the rubber business in Malaya deteriorated, Eu Tong Sen shifted his focus to the remittance business in Hong Kong.( Eu Tong Sen Limited And Hong KongBy the late 20s the most profitable part of the Eu Yan Sang medicine shop business was in remittances not medicines. Eu Tong Sen moved from Singapore to Hong Kong in 1928. On January 7, 1932, he formed Eu Tong Sen Limited in Singapore but controlled it from Hong Kong where his remittance business was showing the best potential.BankingIn 1920, at forty two years of age, Eu Tong Sen, together with Wu Sing Pang, a rich Cantonese merchant in Singapore, founded the Wah Bank with business operations in Guangdong, Singapore and Malaya. The bank was a Cantonese bank as opposed to the Hokkien banks like the Ho Hong Bank etc.,(The International Expansion of Singapores Largest Banks by Adrian E. Tschoegl) meaning it was set up to cater mainly to the Cantonese (or Cantonese-speaking) community.( Revenue FarmsHis other commercial interests included shareholding in opium farms in Singapore and Penang.((Cinema and TheatreOutside of his businesses, Eu was an early admirer of the Brothers and invited them to Singapore as his guests.() He had a large family, with three wives and twenty-five children.() He also organised and oversaw the 1928 construction on that same street of the Majestic Theatre, a performing hall for opera, and for forming an opera troupe to perform there, all in order to entertain one of his wives who was a fan of Cantonese opera.() Later, he would become the first non-European commoner to be admitted to the Ipoh Club.() Federal Council of the Federated Malay StatesIn May 1912 he was appointed a permanent Unofficial Member of the Federal Council of the Federated Malay States, the seat having fallen vacant on the demise of Fee.(Notice: Downing Street, 22nd May, 1912. The KING has been pleased to approve of the nomination of Eu Tong Sen, Esq., to be an Unofficial Member of the Federal Council of the Federated Malay States. -- The London Gazette Issue 28611 published on the 24 May 1912. Page 13 of 94)(Ipoh Echo) Chung, Thye Phin and Eu, Tong Sen Eu Tong Sen and Thye Phin were blood brothers. They went through Chinese ceremony to become Keet Bye Heng Tai. When Chung Thye Phin travelled to Hong Kong, he stayed in Eu Tong Sens villa there and they kept an account of his expenses in the companys account books. Eu Tong Sens villa in HK was called Eucliff. It has been torn down. It was built at Repulse Bay, HK, overlooking the sea. The property was huge. It was built with stone like a castle. It included within its walled area a tennis court and also a swimming pool. Eu Tong Sen and Chung Thye Phin had common interests  motorcars, racehorses, country houses, etc. 1903 when the Ipoh Gymkhana Club was founded, both of them decided to enter their thoroughbreds regularly in the Ipoh races. They jointly built a weekend retreat, Forest Lodge, at Gopeng Road with a large stable. When Eu Tong Sen was appointed to the Federal Council, Thye Phin sold his half-lot to Eu Tong Sen who desired grander accommodations following the latters elevation in status. Thye Phin in turn bought Drummonds Hill in Taiping, a  estate and the former Residency of Sir Low.( In 1908, together with Chung Thye Phin he built a large Chinese theatre in the important mining town of Kampar near Ipoh.( Chung Thye Phins Penang firms served as the agent for Eu, Tong Sen in Penang before he (Eu) opened a branch on the island. Eu Tong Sens Penang branch, at least according to business directories, was the latest in his branch office network. It seemed to have opened only in  1920. Eu Tong Sen and Chung Thye Phin were also members of the Board of Directors of the Eastern Smelting Company, Ltd along with Boo Bee, Hung Chong, Joo Tok and his nephew Bian Kee.(Chinese Business Enterprise By Rajeswary Ampalavanar Brown. Published by Taylor & Francis, 1996. ISBN 0-415-14293-8, ISBN 978-0-415-14293-9. Pp 61, 62, 63, 64. Chapter 3: The Khaw group: Chinese business in early twentieth-century Penang by J. W. Cushman)University of Hong Kong He donated HK$55,000 to the University of Hong Kong during one of his visits there in 1918.( A 1923 Description Of His Homes In PerakEu Tong Sen is a notable with his twenty-five millions of gold dollars. He has two palaces in Ipoh; one more in Kampar, and a castle with a garden and lake in Singapore. Art treasures selected in Europe by himself fill these various residences of the great Chinese tin magnate; the marble for his houses was brought from Italy. -- Herman Norden(From Golden Gate to golden sun : a record of travel, sport and observation in Siam and Malaya by Hermann Norden, 1923)SportsEu Tong Sen took a keen interest in horse-racing, motoring and rifle-shooting. He imported the first motor car into Perak.(Eu Tong Sen was also the pioneer of Singapore to bring in calf racing. Calf racing evolves around 2 men and 2 calfs(young of a cow. Then, they will ride the calf through a series of obstacles before finally falling into a water body. The men then will have to finally swim to land and run back to the starting point, the first becoming the winnerEu Tong Sen Street (1919)In 1919, Singapores Wayang Street was renamed to Tong Sen Street in his honour.( The honour was given in recognition of his contributions of a scout fighter plane called No. 1 Eu Tong Sen, and 6,000 pounds for a tank that had two eyes to further the British efforts in World War I.(( Mr. Addison, the Minister of Munitions commissioned a painting of the tank and presented the painting to Eu Tong Sen.((Qing Government TitleHe purchased an official title from the Qing Government in 1903.( He sold it back in 1906His PassingIn May 1941, in Hong Kong, at the age of sixty three, Eu Tong Sen died of a heart attack.( However, before that fatal heart attack, Eu Tong Sen survived multiples of heart attacks and suffered a 5-day collapse a few times. He also had lung cancer but was cured of immediatelySee also*Correspondence related to the appointment of Chung Thye Phin to the position of Unofficial Member of the Federal Council of the Federated Malay States during the temporary absence on leave of the EU TONG SEN by SIR ARTHUR HENDERSON YOUNG then High Commissioner of the Federated Malay States.*Eu Kong Papers, National Archives of SingaporeReferencesFurther reading* 
12694166
Ajacan
Ajacan in the province of Axacan, variants include Xacan, Jacan, Iacan, Axaca, Axacam; was located on the Bay, in present day Virginia, States.  In his 1842 Historia de la Compania de Fesus en Nueva Espana, Alegre said Father Juan Bautista de Segura and his companions called the province Axacan.(W. Lowery, 1905)(La Florida: Spanish Exploration and Settlement in North America, 1500 To 1600 By Aleck Loker)Some early 20th-century historians promoted the idea that the early Spanish explorers who made voyages into the Chesapeake Bay between 1565 and 1570 sailed up the River as far as Virginia, based on the similarity between Axacan of the Spanish missionary chronicles and the name of the Indian town and creek on the Potomac. The chronicles describe the failed Axacan mission in 1570, which included abandonment by their guide, and massacre of the party.(Paul Wilstach, Potomac Landings, New York: Doubleday, Page & Co., 1921, p. 13)right|thumb|Clip from Gutirrez map of Spanish North America, 1562.Spanish explorersEcija, chief pilot of Spaniards searching the Chesapeake Bay for English activities in 1609, asserted that Vsquez de Ayllns failed colony of 1526-27, Miguel de Gualdape, had been located on the River somewhere near Jamestown.(Magri, F.J. (1912), Diocese of Richmond, in The Catholic Encyclopedia, New York: Robert Appleton Company. Retrieved July 20, 2008 from New Advent: http://www.newadvent.org/cathen/13050a.htm (July 20, 2008)) While some historians accepted Ecijas claim, more recent scholars believe Ayllon instead went southwest, and that the River Guandalpe was in Georgia.(Swanton, 1922, Early History of the Creek Indians and their Neighbors pp. 32-48) Gomez named the Chesapeake Bay, Immaculate Conception Bay, on his 1525 expedition.   No record of the Spanish reaching a place called Axacan was made until 1559-60, the year Sacchini ((Hist.Sec.Fesa. Pars tertia, Romae, 1650, p. 323)) says Dominican missionaries took the Indian they named Luis from there.  Don Luis was recorded in of New Spain-Mexico in 1565.(according to Aviles letter to the King, dated October 15, 1565 (Ruidiaz, La Florida, tomo ii., p. 94) and it seems probable that from him the existence of the Bay of Santa Maria of Axacan (Xacan, Jacan, Iacan, Axaca, Axacam) was learned. (Lowery, 1905, Appendix DD p. 459)...Lowery states, There can be of little doubt as to its identity with Chesapeake Bay. Velasco in his Deografio de las Indiaa 1571-1574 (p. 172) says| Babo de Santiago: esra al norte del cabo de Arenas Cabo de Arenas was in 37* 30, cera del. Bahia de San Cristobal; mas al norte. Bahia ce Santa Maria: mas al norte. Rio de San Anton: en 42 grados y 1/2 como ochenta leguas al norte del cabo de las Arenas. The Spanish Settlements Within The Present Limits Of The United States, Woodbury Lowery, New York: G.P. Putnams Sons, 1905)In 1561, Menndez de Avils believed there might be passage west of the also held the belief of a passage by way of the tributaries flowing east from the Mountains gaps and the rivers flowing west on the other side to the Pacific, as told them by the Native Americans at the range of Axacan.(The Spanish in the Chesapeake Bay, Charles A. Grymes http://www.virginiaplaces.org/settleland/spanish.html)Vincente Gonzales described a bay he visited in 1588 where natives told him of an English settlement to the north on a river flowing into it, but did not give a name to the bay. However, Juan Menendez Marques in 1606 asserted that this expedition had been to the Bay of Jacan, and Lowery (1905) also thought the Chesapeake was meant.((Relacion qye dio el Capitan Vizente Gonzales, 1588, MS. Dirc. de Hidrog., Madrid, Col. Nararrete, tomo xiv., Doc. 54, fol. 8.) Juan Menendez Marques in his Relacion esxrita en el fuerte de San Agustin . . . al P. Comesario General de Indias Fr. Miguel Avengocar, June 7, 1606 (Ruidiaz, too ii., p. 498) in The Spanish Settlements Within The Present Limits Of The United States by Woodbury Lowery,  G.P. Putnams Sons, New York and London, The Knickerbocker Press, 1905.) It is unknown how far beyond the River (Virginia) the Spanish explored. Several historians have demonstrated documentation that they did sail up to at least that rivers line.Province of AxacanThe Bay was in the Province of Axacan which included the Mountains. Virginia was not called thus at this time, before Walter Raleigh and the Queen.Image:Map of America-Ribero (1529).jpeg|thumb|200px|right|Detail of the American Coast Map by Ribero (1529), where the Southern Half of the East coast of the current US is named as Tierra de AyllnThe Bay was called Bahia de Santa Maria after the time of Vzquez de Aylln. Axacan had been called Land of The Saints earlier. The Spanish considered this land to be in their domain. Later, Avils apparently thought the Portuguese were in the vicinity of the mountains eighty leagues (~240 miles) to the north of the Chesapeake Bay and not a great distance from the channel connecting the bay from the South Sea, of Mexico.(March, 28 1568 Brit. Mus. Add. MSS.,33,983,fol.324) Greater Axacan and adjoining Allegheny Mountainss western slopes, Mocosa, to Ajacal (Avacal) was thought to have rivers connecting to the south and west seas at that time. It was due to what the Spanish viewed as trespassing that had brought about the order for the Monks to support the Virginia mining efforts. Boyano and Juan Pardo prospected through the Cherokee range in 1566-67 and barely sufficient reports suggest mining continued into the 1690s along the Mountain Range. These had routed by land. The explorers had discovered the curiosity of interior oil springs, copper outcrops, iron ore and coal for forging. All of which were located towards the Mountains and Range also in the province of Axacan and the northern areas of La Floridia as spelt on 16th century Spanish maps. North of The  Florida at todays Virginia was called Land of Don Luis by later half 16th century Spanish. Dominican FriarsPaquiquino the Virginia Indian of provincial Axacan was a brother to a chief in the lower Chesapeake Bay area.(Aviles to Philip II., Jan. 30, 1566, Ruidiaz, La Florida, tomo ii., p.151) Hes Spanish given name was Don Luis. He was reported to be from Chiskiak town on the York River. In 1559 or 1560, a Spanish vessel, perhaps, with some Dominican monks caused Paquiquino to go with them to Mexico as a guide where Aviles meets Paquiquino and thought to have learnt of the Axacan passage.(Hist. Soc. Fesu. Pars tertia, Romae, 1650, p.323, Appendix DD, The Spanish Settlements Within The Present Limits Of The United States by Woodbury Lowery) Historians generally believe it was Menendez Marques who picked up Don Luis and left another Spanish boy with one of Luis brothers the chief, a hostage in exchange. The Viceroy of New Spain had Paquiquino baptised with the name Don Luis de Velasco (Lowery 1905). de Villafae had been in the Chesapeake Bay area in 1561. He reported the chief at the Chesapeake Indians was called Regulus according to Sacchini.(Historia Societatis Fesu, Pars tertia, Romae, MDCIL., p.323, The Spanish Settlements Within The Present Limits Of The United States by Woodbury Lowery) At Mateo, Avils sent a Captain with 32 soldiers and two Dominican friars to settle the believed route to the mountain pass and rivers that was thought to lead to the Pacific Ocean. This was supposed to have returned Luis to his Chesapeake home and develop a colony at Ajacan landing. But no, the two friars who had already worked in South America and the military Captain convinced the pilot to navigate back to Europe claiming bad weather for the deviation. Some accounts declare they actually made land-fall, but, were blown off point as they tried to enter the bay. This is how Luis had arrived at Spain instead of returning to the Bay of Santa Maria. Gone for about eleven years, Don Luis had spent the past six years with Aviles. They had returned to winter at Havanna by 1570. But, now the concern was about trespassers on his Pacific Ocean passage theory to the China Spice Trade. Meanwhile, it would seem that Luis harboured resentment through the years, although, the reports declare he was eager to help evangelize his kindred.Segura MissionSegura Mission 1570 Ajacan landing included Father Segura, vice provincial of the Jesuits with seven companions, Father Luis de Quiros, Brothers Gabriel Gomez, Sancho Cevallos, Juan Bautista Mendez, Pedro de Limares, Gabriel de Solis (related to Aviles), and Cristobal Relondo, a boy named Alonso, and Indian Don Luis departed Santa Elena, just north of St. Augustine (now Parris Island(Part 11: The New World, 11.2 The Spanish and the French (1492-1540), Spanish Conquest of the New World, by George Parris  Copyright 1998)), for the Chesapeake Bay on August 5, 1570.(Buckingham Smith, Florida MSS., 1526, 1743, p.255, MS. New York Historical Society.) They had arrive at Ajacan landing on September 10, 1570. They found the local people had removed themselves from the Ajacan landing area villages due to extended drought of six years. It was reported that only a few old men remained so that they might die where their fathers had died.(A quotation cited in Woodbury Lowery in his book The Spanish Settlements Within The Presant Limits Of The United States (1905).) Indian crops there at that time was scarce and corn was brought to them. In a brief letter before the ship left the missionaries, Father Quiros wrote of the Allegheny Mountains as told him by the native, of the entrance through the mountains and China...Three or four days journey from yonder, were the mountains, and two of these days journey were by a river, and one or two days travel beyond the mountains another sea is observed.  Aviles of Spain maintain his theory that the passage to the Pacific was by way of the Chesapeake Bay.The mission called Segura Mission consisted of a hut and small chapel about two leagues, two hours canoe trip up the river of their landing, to Don Luiss brothers village. Don Luis remained with the priests as an interpreter. An expected supply vessel had not returned before winter after which Luis deserted the Monks. Within four months, Luis left the missionaries to forage on their own through the winter. Father Rogal wrote of Avales vengeance on Luis party who committed the murders on February 8, 1571.(Tanner, Societas Militans Pp.449-451) Don Luiss brother saved the boy named Alonso from the betrayal, the only survivor. Avales is reported not to have punished Luis brothers village. Father Carrera wrote of the punitive action in 1572 as he had witnessed the Ajacan landing of the delayed supply vessel.Other visitorsImage:Martin-Waldseemller-1507-North-America.JPG|thumb|map showing North America originally published in April 1507.In 1499, Vespucci for the Spanish Crown spent thirty-seven days repairing their ships at the Chesapeake Bay. About the same time, Cabot also entered the bay. On May 30, Captain Vicente Gonzalez sailed around the shores of the Chesapeake to the 39th latitude (Annapolis, Maryland) and on the return at the 37th latitude near the mouth of James River. He found and returned  evidence to St. Augustine of English there in 1588. Governor of Florida, Menendez Marques, sailed to the 38th latitude near todays Virginia and Maryland border in 1589. He found Vicente the Indian who claimed he was evangelized at the Segura Mission of Ajacan. Marques allowed him to return to the Florida capital with him. This was after the forming of the Union.Ajacan MissionThe Florida priests built the Mission across the peninsula to the River (Virginia) despite two earlier intentions. Historians attribute Spanish abandonment of the Chesapeake Bay to either the Powhatan Confederacy or privateers. Poorly documented seafaring nationals were known to fish and trade at Norfolk Anchorage.  Later in the 16th century, many pilots, as the ships master (todays Captain) was called at that time, held English and French letters of marque to raid the treasure fleet. English privateers had been sailing to the North American coast since 1562, preying on Spanish shipping loaded with royal loot from the Main. Their provision and repair anchorage was often at the mouth of the Chesapeake Bay. This is where the easterly North Atlantic current, just north of the Sea moves towards the Sea of Ireland and of Biscay of northern Spain and Portugal. Father Seguras Ajacan settlement was destroyed by the Native American Don Luis and his group of deceit, Indians.(Some claim from early printed history such as the following quoth, ...Towards the Southwest, four days journey is situate a town called Sequotan, which is the Southermost town of Wingandacoa, near unto which, six and twenty years past, there was a ship cast away, whereof some of the people were saved, and those were white people, whom the country people preserved. . . Richard Hakluyt, The Principall Voyages, Traffiques, and Discourses of the English Nations (1599-1600), reprinted in Albert Bushnell Hart, ed., American History Told by Contemporaries (New York, 1898), volume 1, 89-95.) Englands Settlement became known to the Spanish at St. Augustine in 1610. These English took the Spanish captive, who were sent by caravella to investigate, in 1611. Although many nationals came to repair or clean their ships hauls, reprovision and trade or prospect for many decades before, it remains unclear as to who removed the Spanish presence across the mining region of Axacan before the English first permanent colony at Jamestown.See also*Mission*Luis*Pardo (explorer)*League*in the Age of Discovery*colonization of the Americas*colonization of the Americas*Catholic Church and colonialism*historyReferences*Citation: Chesapeake Bay - The Mariners Museum, online.
12712727
Montana_Railroad
right|200px|thumb|Corporate cowshead logo of the Montana Railroad, from an 1899 system map.The Montana Railroad, now defunct, was an American railroad built and operated between the towns of Lombard and Lewistown, Montana, a distance of approximately 157 miles.  The railroad connected with the national railway network via a connection with the Pacific Railway at Lombard.  The Montana Railroad line was constructed between 1895 and 1903, and operated independently until 1908, when it was acquired by the Milwaukee, St. Paul and Pacific Railroad (the Milwaukee Road).  The railroad was colloquially known as the Jawbone, because of the contrast between the promising statements of the lines promoters and the companys perennially-weak financial position.HistoryThe Montana Railroad was the brainchild of Richard A. Harlow, a Montana attorney and entrepreneur, who envisioned the construction of a railway eastward from Helena to serve the mining and agricultural regions of central Montana.  His first attempt at such a project, the Montana Midland, began construction in 1893, but almost immediately failed due to the onset of the of 1893.Undeterred, in 1894 Harlow organized the Montana Railroad, a project with similar goals.  Construction work on the Montana Railroad began in 1895 at Lombard, a station on the Northern Pacific Railway 53 miles east of Helena.  The Montana Railroad route proceeded eastward from Lombard up Sixteen Mile Canyon towards the mining districts of the Castle Mountains, in southeastern Meagher County.  The railroad reached Leadborough, at the southern end of the mining district, in November 1896; unfortunately for the railroad, however, the regions mines were already past their peak by then.In the face of the declining mineral production in the Castle area, Harlow realized that his railroad needed a larger and more diversified traffic base.  He therefore announced plans to extend his railroad still farther, and in 1899 railway construction crews began working eastward down the River valley.  The Montana Railroad was completed to the new town of Harlowton (named after Harlow) in 1900.  The lines tracklayers then turned northward, finally reaching Lewistown in 1903.In 1908, the Montana Railroad was purchased by the Chicago, Milwaukee, St. Paul and Pacific Railroad, which was then in the process of constructing a new transcontinental line through the state of Montana.  The Lombard-Harlowton segment of the Montana Railroad became a part of this new Milwaukee line, although nearly all of the original route was heavily rebuilt, to reduce curvature and raise the Sixteen Mile Canyon trackage above the flood-prone canyon floor.  Work to electrify the line began in 1914.  The Montanas Harlowton-Lewistown route became a secondary main line for the Milwaukee; it was later extended to Great Falls and several branch lines were built.Nearly all of the Milwaukee Roads trackage in the area was abandoned in 1980, and today only a short segment of the former Montana Railroad (near Moore) remains in service.  Most of the former grade can still be seen, however.References**
12724700
Ralph_J._Roberts_(geologist)
thumbnail|right|400px|Ralph J. Roberts (right)Ralph J. Roberts (19112007) was an American geologist and research scientist with the USGS. He is credited with the discovery of the Carlin and Battle Mountain Gold Belts, which make up the richest gold-mining region in Nevada as well as the United States.Early lifeRoberts grew up in eastern Washington, and earned his bachelors and masters degrees from the of Washington in Seattle. His PhD research, which he conducted at University, defined the orogeny,(McCollum, L.B. and McCollum, M.B. Research within the Antler and Sonoma orogens, northwestern Nevada, 1983-1993 Geology department, Eastern Washington University. Accessed August 12, 2007.) a major mountain-building episode in the late Paleozoic.USGS workDuring War II Roberts lived in America, where he had been sent to discover and conduct fundamental research on strategic minerals. After the war he returned to the States; for the next 40 years he worked in Nevada and Utah, deciphering the geologic history of major mountain ranges and exploring mineral deposits.In 1960, Roberts published a lengthy paper that predicted the existence of important mineral-bearing rocks in Nevada.(Roberts, R.J. 1960. Alignment of mining districts in north-central Nevada. US Geological Survey Professional Papers 400-B. p. 17-19) Roberts research led to the discovery of the Carlin and Cortez-Battle Mountain gold belts. These two mining districts now represent the richest gold region in the United States, and one of the leading gold producing regions of the world.(In Memoriam - Dr. Ralph J. Roberts)During the 1970s he spent six years in Arabia, mapping ore deposits and contributing to the development of the Arabian mining industry. He retired from the USGS in 1981, but continued his mineral exploration in Nevada for over two decades.Honors and awards*Distinguished Service Award from the Department of the Interior*Medal of Merit from the American Mining Hall of Fame*Distinguished Service to the Minerals Industry Award from the Northwest Mining Association*The Ralph J. Roberts Center for Research in Geology at the University of Nevada was named in his honor.Publications* Roberts, Ralph Jackson Iron sulfide deposits at Wadi Wassat, Kingdom of Saudi Arabia USGS Open-File Report No. 82-176 (1981)* Roberts, Ralph Jackson Quicksilver deposits of the Bottle Creek District, Humboldt County, Nevada USGS Bulletin No. 922-A (1940)* Roberts, Ralph Jackson Quicksilver deposit at Buckskin Peak National mining district, Humboldt County, Nevada USGS Bulletin No. 922-E (1940)* Roberts, Ralph Jackson The genesis of disseminated and massive sulfide deposits in Saudi Arabia USGS Open-File Report No. 76-602 (1976)* Luce, Robert W., Bagdady, A., Roberts, R.J. Geology and ore deposits of the Mahd adh Dhahab district, Kingdom of Saudi Arabia USGS Open-File Report No. 76-865 (1976)* Roberts, Ralph Jackson, Rye, R.O., Mawad, M.M. Preliminary sulfur isotope investigations of mineral deposits in the Precambrian shield, Kingdom of Saudi Arabia USGS Open-File Report No. 78-776 (1978)* Roberts, Ralph Jackson, Bagdady, A., Luce, R.W. Geochemical investigations in the Mahd Adh Dhahab District, Kingdom of Saudi Arabia USGS Open-File Report No. 78-777 (1978)* Bagdady, A.Y., Whitlow, J.W., Roberts, R.J. Placer gold deposits in the Mahd Adh Dhahab district, Kingdom of Saudi Arabia USGS Open-File Report No. 78-1074 (1978)* Martin, Conrad, Roberts, R.J., Stoeser, D.B. Titaniferous magnetite in the layered intrusive complex at Lakathah, Kingdom of Saudi Arabia USGS Open-File Report No. 79-1210 (1979)* Roberts, Ralph Jackson Manganese deposits in Costa Rica USGS Bulletin No. 935-H (1944)* Roberts, Ralph Jackson, Irving, E.M. Mineral deposits of Central America USGS Bulletin No. 1034 (1957)Later lifeIn 2002, he published his autobiography, entitled A Passion for Gold.(Roberts, R.J. 2002. A Passion for Gold. University of Nevada Press.  ISBN 087417502X) ISBN 087417502XSee also*Trend*Livermore, co-discoverer of the Carlin Mine*mining in NevadaReferences(External links*Roberts obituary in News Tribune, Washington, published August 13, 2007* IN MEMORIAM Dr. Ralph J. Roberts 1911-2007*Ralph J. Roberts Center for Research in Economic Geology at the of Nevada, Reno
12742982
Mining_Enforcement_and_Safety_Administration
The Mining Enforcement and Safety Administration, States Department of the Interior, (MESA), was the predecessor organization to the Safety and Health Administration, prior to March 9, 1978. http://www.msha.gov/30cfr/18.2.htmThrough an administrative action in 1973, the States Secretary of the Interior created the new Mining Enforcement and Safety Administration (MESA) as an agency within the Department of the Interior.  Because of concern about the apparent conflict of interest between the health and safety enforcement functions of the States Bureau of Mines (BOM) and its production-focused oversight of mineral resources, BOMs safety operations and health enforcement responsibilities were split off to MESAs charge until MSHA was created. http://www.msha.gov/MSHAINFO/MSHAINF2.HTM
12751801
Coal_mine_bump
A coal mine bump (also called a bump, a mine bump, or a mountain bump) is a term used to describe a seismic jolt occurring within a mine.  The term refers to the explosive collapse of a wall or one or more support pillars,(Energy Citations Database (ECD) - - Document #7218222) sometimes called a burst. These pillars are left in place during room and pillar mining, where an original narrow passage is dug and then substantially widened as ore is removed, creating open rooms with support pillars left in place. As the coal is extracted, the pressure is redistributed onto the pillars and can increase to the extent that the pillar explodes like a hand grenade, shooting coal and rock at lethal speeds.( )In eastern United States coalfields, bumps are more likely when the overburden is at least 500 feet (152 m); where a strong, overlying stratum, such as sandstone, occurs near the coalbed; and with a strong, inflexible floor. In the United States, the number of deaths from bumps had dropped off dramatically since the early 1990s, but fatalities are more common in the West where mines often run deeper. Bumps are three times more likely in room-and-pillar mines, and are even more common in mines that do mining,( ) in which the pillars are removed as the miners retreat towards the mine entrance with the intent of allowing an orderly collapse of the mine.(Coal Mine Bumps: Five Case Studies in the Eastern United States. National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health. Accessed March 26, 2009.)IncidentsThe Mining Disaster refers to a bump which occurred in Nova Scotia, Canada on October 23, 1958.Debate over the cause of the August 6, 2007, Canyon Mine disaster, which took place 1,800 feet beneath the surface, raised public awareness about coal mine bumps.(Rescue Halted at Mine After 3 Killed and 6 Injured, New York Times, August 9, 2007, retrieved August 17, 2007) Seismologists at the University of Utah and the University of California, Berkeley concluded that an associated 3.9 magnitude temblor was likely caused not by an earthquake, but by the collapse itself.(Seismologists confirm Utah mine collapse probably caused temblor, U.S. Berkeley press release, August 9, 2007, retrieved August 17, 2007) The mines owner, E. Murray, adamantly disagreed.(Owner of Utah mine is a famously combative figure. Herald. Retrieved on August 10, 2007.)References(External links*Historic Coal Mine Bump Data
12758308
William_John_Blair
William John Blair (born: October 13, 1875 Ontario died: April 24, 1943 Ontario) was an engineer, farmer, teacher, soldier surveyor and Canadian federal politician.Early lifeBlair was born in Embro, Ontario on October 13, 1875. Blair took his post secondary education at College and later the of Toronto where he completed a Bachelors Degree in Civil Engineering. He began surveying in 1904 in Ontario and using his knowledge to Steak mining property which he later sold.He married his wife Lottie May Nethercott in 1906 and they had one daughter and one son. He moved his family west to Alberta in 1910 and continued his survey work.Early political workBlair first served in public office on the municipal level, for one term he served as Mayor of Liskeard, Ontario from 1907 to 1908.After Blair moved out west he attempted a career at Alberta provincial politics. He ran for a seat in the Alberta Legislature by running as the Conservative candidate in the ministerial by-election held on May 27, 1912 in the Sedgewick district. He was soundly defeated by incumbent Minister of Municipal Affairs Charles Stewart.Military serviceBlair joined the war effort in 1916 and became a Forces recruiter for the 151st Battalion (Alberta) of the Expeditionary Force. He worked as a military recruiter until 1917.Federal politicsBlair would try his hand at federal politics running as the Unionist candidate in the 1917 Canadian federal election. He won the election, defeating Laurier Liberal candidate and future Member of Parliament Webster Warner in a hotly contested election. Blair would serve in the House of Commons for 1 term before retiring from Federal politics.Late life and deathIn 1925 Blair became very ill and moved his family to Ontario he would spend the next 5 years recovering his health, moving back to Alberta in 1930. In 1937 he contracted Thrombosis and his family moved back to Ontario once again. He withdrew himself from public life and died April 24, 1943External links*Alberta Land Surveying History William John Blair biography*William John Blair Federal Political Experience
12766141
Richmond_Vale_railway_line
Minmi JunctionSand CuttingBrowns CollieryDuckenfield CollieryMinmi Open CutMinmi C PitDoghole Staff CabinStockrington No 2 CollieryDuckenfield No 5 CollieryStockrington No 1 CollierySix Mile LoopRichmond Vale JunctionRichmond Main BrickyardRichmond Main CollieryPelaw Main CollierySouth Maitland Railway}}The Richmond Vale Railway was a colliery railway line in the Region of South Wales, Australia, servicing coal mines at Minmi, Stockrington, Pelaw Main and Richmond Main. It was over sixteen miles long and passed through three tunnels, and was the last privately-owned, non-tourist, railway in Australia to use steam locomotives.(Richmond Vale Railway )(Neath Mount Sugarloaf - Book 2, West Wallsend Public School Centenary Committee, 1988, p.104-107, ISBN 0-7316-3401-2)HistoryThe line was privately owned, by the private firm of J & A Brown and its successor companies, J. & A. Brown and Abermain Seaham Collieries Limited (JABAS) and Coal and Allied Industries Ltd. It was constructed in sections, the earliest section being from Hexham to Minmi, built by John Eales in 1856 to service his colliery at Minmi. At Hexham the railway crossed the then Hunter River Railway Companys line to Maitland (later the Great Northern Railway) and several coal loading staiths were built on the bank of the on the Hunter River to allow the loading of coal onto ships.Minmi Collieries & RailwaysIn March 1859 J. & A. Brown purchased the railway & mine from John Eales. By June 1859 they had constructed a connection and exchange siding with the Great Northern Railway at Hexham to allow the coal to be railed to the shipping facilities at Newcastle.In 1861 J & A Brown extended the railway line at Minmi a further 300 yards and sunk a new pit named C pit, they also established a workshops at this pit.()In 1874 a new tunnel colliery named Duckenfield Colliery was sunk to the North of C pit and a branch railway was laid to this colliery. This was soon followed in 1876 by another new colliery sunk to the East of C pit named Browns Colliery (also known as Back Creek Colliery), a new branch line was also laid to this mine.()The fastest recorded journey on the line was a late passenger train from Minmi to Hexham at .(Newcastle Morning Herald, 6 July 1946.)Richmond Vale Railway & Collieries The South Wales Legislative Assembly passed the Richmond Vale Coal-mine Railway Act in 1900 which allowed the construction of line from the Minmi line (at a location later known as Minmi Junction) to serve Richmond Vale Colliery.(http://www.austlii.edu.au/au/legis/nsw/num_act/rvcrao1900nr365.pdf Richmond Vale Coal Mine Railway Act) In October 1900 before construction of the line had commenced the Browns had purchased the adjoining Stanford Greta Colliery which was renamed Pelaw Main in April 1901. Until the RVR was completed to Pelaw Main its production was hauled over a connecting railway to the East Greta Coal Mining Companys Stanford Merthyr Colliery & then onwards to East Greta Junction. Construction of the RVR did not commence until early 1904, with construction of the line to Pelaw Main completed June 1905, with the branch line to Richmond Vale Colliery being completed in August 1905. Development of Richmond Vale Colliery did not commence until 1910 and the colliery was renamed Richmond Main in 1911, however the mine did not reach full production until 1918.()In 1909-10 the line across Hexham Swamps was duplicated between the exchange sidings and Richmond Vale Junction (latter renamed Minmi Junction). During 1913-14 with the development of Duckenfield No.2 colliery at Stockrington taking place, the main line was duplicated between Minmi Junction and Stockrington. A cabin to house the electric staff instrument for the section to Six Mile Loop was constructed at Stockrington. In 1942 with the re-arrangement of the main lines at Stockrington to cater for the new Stockrington No.2 Colliery a new staff cabin was built adjacent to the level crossing at Doghole and the staff instruments were relocated to this new cabin.Method of safeworkingThe original safeworking the line after the opening of the RVR was a Ticket and Telephone System. Tickets were issued to the train driver at the start of the section & the information was telephoned to the officer in charge at the other end of the section. The section at the time was Pelaw Main to Richmond Vale Junction (later renamed Minmi Junction). Trains were not allowed to travel in opposite directions on the section at the same time & before a train could enter the section the section had to be cleared by phone communication with the other end of the section. There was a 30 minute delay between trains proceeding in the same direction & if the proceeding train was still in the section Caution was written on the ticket issued. This system worked well until November 1910 when a railmotor carrying the manager of Pelaw Main Colliery collide with the rear of a coal train in No.2 Tunnel, killing him & seriously injuring his passenger. After the coroners inquest into this accident, electric staff instruments were installed by the New South Wales Government Railways for J. & A. Brown. As part of the installation of electric staff instruments, the loop at six mile loop was brought into use as a crossing point. Staff instruments were installed at Minmi Junction, Six Mile Loop, Richmond Main Junction (Later renamed Richmond Vale Junction) & Pelaw Main. When Richmond Main Colliery started producing coal instruments were also installed for the Richmond Main - Richmond Vale Junction Section. The Minmi Junction staff instruments were moved to Stockrington in 1914 with the completion of the duplication of the line from Minmi Junction. After the construction of the direct passenger line was constructed between Richmond Main & Pelaw main Collieries in 1922, electric staff instruments were also installed on this line. The double track section of the RVR was worked by Telephone Block controlled by the traffic officers at both Hexham and Stockrington.()Stockrington Area CollieriesDuring 1912 development work started for a new mine named Duckenfield No.2 Colliery, which was located at Stockrington (near Minmi) on the RVR, but work ceased on this work in 1914. In 1922 development of Duckenfield No.2 recommenced and by the time this colliery was ready to produce coal in 1935 it had been renamed Stockrington Colliery. Further Collieries were developed in the Stockrington Valley: Duckenfield No.5 Colliery (in 1931), Stockrington No.2 Colliery (in 1940) and Stockrington No.2 Colliery No.3 Tunnel (in 1954).()Closure of Minmi CollieriesDuckenfield Colliery at Minmi closed in 1916 and Browns Colliery closed in 1924, both mines were however maintained and the railway line remained open to serve the workshops. Following a need for Borehole seam coal for use in the new water tube boilers at Richmond Main Power Station, both mines were reopened on a smaller scale in 1930. Both collieries remained open until 1932 and in 1934 both mines were sealed, the remaining workshop equipment moved to the workshops at Hexham and the line to Minmi was then closed and used for wagon storage. In late 1948 the line was relaid up to a point near where the Duckenfield Colliery branch left the main line to serve a new open cut mine being developed. This open cut opened in 1949 and mined the borehole seam outcrop around the Minmi area; this open cut removed any remains of both Duckenfield & Browns Collieries. The open cut remained open until July 1954, the Minmi branch remained until being lifted for scrap in 1974.()Passenger Line between Richmond Main & Pelaw Main CollieriesIn 1922 to increase capacity on the Pelaw Main to Richmond Vale Junction section a Direct Passenger Line was built from the compressor house at Pelaw Main to Richmond Main. This line was used for the miners passenger trains from Pelaw Main to Richmond Main. After the centralisation of locomotive facilities at Pelaw Main in 1925 this line was also used for the transferring of locos and rolling stock between the two collieries. The miners trains over this line ceased in April 1959, the line remained open for loco movements until the closure of Richmond Main.Changes in company ownershipOn 5 March 1930, the last major Brown family member John Brown, aged 78, passed away and the J. & A. Brown firm was amalgamated with Abermain Seaham Collieries Limited with the new company being known as J. & A. Brown & Abermain Seaham Collieries Ltd (commonly abbreviated to JABAS). This merger added the three Abermain Collieries served by their own railway and the SMR and the two Seaham Collieries served by a private line that branched off the main Northern Railway at Cockle Creek, to the collieries controlled by the company. Soon afterwards in April 1931 JABAS purchased the East Greta Coal Mining Company Ltd, which was in financial trouble due to the recent miners lockout. This added Stanford Merthyr No.1 at Stanford Merthyr, Stanford Merthyr No.2 at Paxton, and the recently closed East Greta Nos.1 & 2 Collieries at East Greta, all of which were served by the SMR under the companys control. This also gave JABAS a 50% interest in South Maitland Railways Ltd.() Soon after this JABAS replaced the Merthyr with Main in the two Stanford Merthyr collieries names so they could market their Greta seam coals under a common Main name.In 1960 JABAS merged with Caledonian Collieries Ltd to form Coal & Allied Industries Ltd. After this merger JABAS, become the subsidiary company that carried out the mining operations of Coal & Allied until being renamed Coal & Allied Operations Pty Ltd in 1980.() In April 1967 Coal & Allied purchased Hebburn Ltd which added Hebburn No.2 and its associated railway to the companys assets. The purchase of Hebburn Ltd also gave C & A the full ownership of South Maitland Railways Pty Ltd.()The Link Line and flood workingsThe Richmond Vale railway had two connections to the nearby privately owned South Maitland Railway lines at Pelaw Main. The first being the original connection to Stanford Merthyr Colliery, which fell out of use after the completion of the RVR in 1905, this connection was rebuilt in 1934 after the 1931 purchase of the East Greta Coal Mining Company by JABAS to allow the haulage of coal from Stanford Main No.1 Colliery over the RVR. The second connection to the South Maitland system dated from 1936 when a Link Line was constructed from Pelaw Main Colliery to the SMR at Weston. This line was used by JABAS for any gas coal from its 3 Abermain collieries and Stanford Main No.2 Colliery at Paxton that was for shipment at the companys coal loader at Hexham, any coal that was to be shipped at the Dyke at Newcastle still had to travel over the SMR to East Greta Junction & the NSWGR to Newcastle. With the opening of the coal preparation plant at Hexham the traffic over the line increased as the small coal that was to be washed also travelled over the link line. The line fell out of use after the closure of rail operations at Abermain No.2 Colliery in December 1963 & the connection with the SMR was lifted in August 1964, the line was lifted during 1973.()The Richmond Vale railway provided a separate route and connection to the Main north line at Hexham and was used as an alternate route when the South Maitland lines were flooded during the 1949,1950,1951,1952 & 1955 floods.()Hexham Coal Preparation PlantTo cater for the increased demand for small coal a central preparation plant was built by JABAS adjacent to the exchange sidings at Hexham. Construction of this plant and associated sidings began during 1953 and the completed plant came into operation in June 1953. The preparation plant was served by a series of new sidings with connections to the RVR at the Stockrington end entry to the exchange sidings and to the NSW Department of Railways coal roads. The connection to the government mainlines was at the southern end of the plant and these sidings were known as J & A Browns Coal Plant Sidings, Hexham. The sidings had a dump station for unloading the unwashed coal and a loading point for loading the washed coal into coal wagons. The connection to government main remained in use until 1962, when following the construction of a stacking & reclaim system the plant was then serviced via the exchange sidings and the connection was removed in 1973.()Closure of the line beyond Stockrington With the opening of Stockrington No.2 Colliery No.3 Tunnel in 1954, Duckenfield no.5 Colliery closed in 1955, followed by Stockrington Colliery in 1956 and Stockrington No.2 Colliery in 1957. Stanford Main No.1 Colliery was also closed in 1957.The 1960s saw a dramatic slump in the coal industry, and in February 1961 Pelaw Main Colliery closed, the railway line to this mine remained open to serve the locomotive sheds at this colliery. On 14 July 1967, Richmond Main Colliery, and had once held the record for the largest daily production in the State, was also closed (except for its power station which lasted until 1976). After the closure of Richmond Main Colliery J. & A. Brown and Abermain Seaham Collieries Ltd., promptly ceased operations beyond Stockrington No.2 Colliery on the Richmond Vale Railway. All serviceable locomotives were transferred from Pelaw Main to the Hexham Exchange Sidings and others transferred to Pelaw Main sheds. Loading also ceased at the staithes at Hexham with the 60-miler collier MV Stephen Brown loading on 1 November 1967. The railway line to the staithes remained in use serving the adjacent engineering workshops.()Despite Stockrington No.2 Colliery continuing to work at full capacity, following the closure of the line beyond Stockrington the railway began single line working only. Initially the up line was used with the down line being used for the storage of surplus coal hopper wagons. However over the remaining life of the railway both lines saw long periods of single line working.  This meant a logjam developed from time to time which necessitated week-end workings on the railway in order to reduce colliery stockpiles.(Andrews, Brian R., Stockrington No.2 Colliery Workings in the Australian Railway Historical Societys Bulletin volume XXIII, No.421, November, 1972, p.237-9) The oil crisis of the early 1970s revived Stockrington No.2 Collierys life and by mid 1973 some six to eight trains each carrying 500 Tons ran between Stockrington and Hexham.()In 1973 the all of the rails towards Richmond Main beyond the site of the former Stockrington No.1 Colliery were lifted for use at other C & A operations. In October 1973 the line serving the engineering workshops at Hexham was closed and the right angled crossing across the Government Railway mainline was removed.() The engineering workshops remained open constructing and overhauling equipment for the underground coal mining industry.()Unit train loader at Hexham & the end of Non-Air working on the PTC main lineDuring 1972 the Public Transport Commission of New South Wales advised the users of non-air coal wagons that they planned to ban the operation of these wagons to Port Waratah in the near future. Due to the number of loading points at the various  C & A operations that would have needed converting as they were designed accept non-air type wagons only, the company decided to build a Unit Train Loading System at the Hexham Coal Preparation Plant and load all of the companys export coal through this system. The PTC would still work non-air wagons from East Greta Junction to Hexham, but from Hexham onwards the trains had to consist of air braked wagons.The work consisted of a new set of sidings and dump hoppers between the coal preparation plant and the PTC main line to allow the emptying of non-air wagons of washed coal, these sidings were known as Coal & Allied Siding. Unwashed coal ran via the existing exchange sidings. The new loading point was constructed at the Newcastle end of the preparation plant and was served by a balloon loop and a 1200T loading bin. The rails for both balloon loop and C & A Siding came from the section of the RVR beyond Stockrington. The balloon loop was brought into use in June 1973, C & A siding was also ready for use in June 1973 but due to industrial problems it was not used until 17 August 1973. The last non-air train from Hexham to Port Waratah ran on 15 August 1973.()The non-air wagons continued to be used between East Greta Junction and Hexham, but by 1977 the NSW PTC was planning to changeover this traffic to the older BCH type wagons that had been released from the longer distance coal trains with the changeover to occur during Easter 1977. Because of this planned changeover large numbers of non-air wagons were scrapped, however by August 1977 with many non-air wagons scrapped and the promised BCH wagons yet to appear on the East Greta to Hexham trains, it become necessary for the SMR, RVR & coal preparation plant at Hexham to work Saturdays to ensure that sufficient wagons were returned to the collieries to allow loading to take place on the following Monday. By late October sufficient BCH trains had been made available to eliminate the need for Saturday workings. By early 1978 it was planned to end the use on non-airs on the main line and the last train ran on 8 February 1978. From this date onwards the remaining 1000 wagons were used on the RVR between Stockrington and Hexham only.()Final closure and demolitionFile:Richmond Vale Protest.jpg|thumb|right|Railwaymen protesting against the lines closure encamped alongside it, with their hijacked Beyer-Peacock locomotive, 11 October 1987. Due to the tight economic conditions facing the NSW coal mining industry at the time & the need to rationalise some of its operations on 28 August 1987 Coal and Allied industries decided it was more economical to ship the coal to port by road and announced the planned closure of the Stockrington to Hexham line from 25 September 1987. The railway operated normally until 18 September when following a dispute between a loco crew & management, coal haulage ceased and only empty wagons were to be worked to Hexham for storage. The last coal was dumped at the coal preparation plant on 21 September and on 22 September No.25 cleared the empty wagons from the preparation plant and then made two trips to Stockrington to work the remaining empty wagons to Hexham. However on 24 September as part of the vigorous protest efforts by the railway employees SMR No.25 was hijacked and after spending a day at Doghole the loco was moved to Lenaghans Drive road bridge and a protest camp set up. However due to a lack of support from their fellow unionists at the other C & A operations the protest ended with no effect on 15 October 1987.Within weeks after the railways closure the sidings were lifted from Stockrington area leaving only the main line and dead end head shunt intact. The rails were also lifted from the RVR served dump hoppers at the coal preparation plant. In January 1988 scrapping commenced of the many stored coal wagons, this scrapping was completed in August 1988. A selection of 40 wagons was kept for preservation by the RVRM.In May 1988 the coal preparation plant at Hexham was also closed, this was followed by the closure of Stockrington No.2 Colliery in June 1988. Demolition of Stockrington No.2 soon followed and this was completed by December 1988. Dismantling of the coal preparation plant at Hexham started in March 1989 with demolition taking place over the following 18 months.() With the downturn in the underground coalmining industry the engineering workshops at Hexham also closed in November 1989(), this marked the end of C & A in the lower Hunter Valley.LocomotivesNos.1 & 2The first locomotives, No. 1 and 2, used on the original Minmi to Hexham railway were 0-4-2T side tank locomotives built by and W Hawthorn of Newcastle-on-Tyne in 1856 (builders Nos.947 & 948). In 1922 they were both rebuilt into saddle tanks. No.1 was scraped in 1942 and No.2 was sold to Stewarts and Lloyds in 1941.()Nos.3 & 4In 1878 No. 3, an 0-6-0T saddle-tank, was purchased by J. & A. Brown from and Company in Leeds, England (builders No.2236), this was similar to an engine No.20, named the The Buck which was also built by Kitsons (builder No.1620), that Browns wanted to buy from the New South Wales Government Railway. The Buck, was built in 1870 and was used to haul coal on the Government Railways from Hexham to Newcastle. No. 20 was finally bought from the Government Railways in 1891 and renumbered No. 4 on Browns roster. From the early 1920s both locos were being used on shunting the staithes at Hexham. No.3 remained in service until 1966 and No.4 lasted until November 1967.() Both survive, No.3 at the Steam Railway and Museum and No.4 by the South Wales Rail Transport Museum and is now on display at the Newcastle Regional Museum at the former GNR Honeysuckle Workshops at Newcastle.Nos.5,6,7 & 8 Mersey TanksWith the Richmond Vale Railway nearing completion there was a need for larger locomotives to haul the trains over the line, John Brown purchased four large 0-6-4T side-tanks locos from England. These locos had been built by Peacock and Company in 1885-86 for the Railway in Liverpool. The first three locos were purchased in 1905, with the fourth loco purchased in 1908. Before these locos were shipped to Australia they had their vacuum operated brakes & condensing apparatus removed, they then had enclosed cabs & steam brakes fitted. Upon arrival in Australia they were given J. & A. Brown Nos. 5-8 & were known as the 5 class. No.5 was originally Mersey Railway No.1 and was built in 1885 (builders No.2601) & was named THE MAJOR, No.6 was Mersey Railway No.7 and was built in 1886 (builders No.2607) & was named LIVERPOOL, No.7 was Mersey Railway No.9 and was built in 1886 (builders No.2782) & was named CONNAUGHT, No.8 was Mersey Railway No.4 and was built in 1885 (builders No.2604) & was named GLADSTONE. Initially Nos.5-7 still carried their Mersey Railway nameplates whilst in J. & A. Brown ownership, no photographic evidence has been found of No.8 with its nameplates intact whilst in J. & A. Brown service. After the introduction of the R.O.D. locos the 5 class locos were set aside when major repairs were required. Nos.7 & 8 had been withdrawn by 1934 and No.6 was sold to Cessnock Collieries Ltd in 1934 for use at their Kalingo Colliery. In 1936 after a period of storage No.5 was transferred to the JABAS Abermain Colliery railway system where it remained until 1939 it was then placed in storage. In 1941 after being overhauled it was used on the Hexham to Stockrington trains until suffering boiler defects in July 1942 when it was withdrawn.() No.5 is now preserved at the South Wales Rail Transport Museum, New South Wales.() The Driving wheelset from No.8 also survives at Richmond Main.No.9 Pelaw Main, No.10 Richmond Main & No.11 HexhamIn 1908 and Company of Leeds was asked by J. & A. Brown to supply a large 2-8-2T side-tank engine. This new loco was designed for Browns and was based on the Central Railway class 8A 0-8-0 tender engines dating from 1902 that Kitsons had built for the GCR. This loco was built in 1908 (builders No.4567) and was fitted with cast brass nameplates by Kitsons with the name PELAW MAIN. Upon arrival this was given the number 9 and with the loco being successful and with Richmond Main Colliery undergoing development that two similar locos were ordered. These 2 new locos were built in 1911 (builders Nos.4798 & 4834) and were numbered 10-11, these two locos were also fitted with brass nameplates No.10 carrying the name RICHMOND MAIN and No.11 HEXHAM. These three locos were the mainstay of traffic on the RVR until the arrival of the ROD locos, when they were relegated to secondary duties. By the 1940s the three locos were being used on the Stockrington to Hexham workings. No.11 was withdrawn in 1949 and was scrapped in 1966. By 1954 Nos.9 & 10 were standby locos and were only used intermittently. However from 1969 both locos were used regularly in shunting the sidings at Hexham. In October 1972 both locos returned to main line traffic being regularly used on the Stockrington to Hexham trains. No. 9 worked until November 1980 and No.10 worked until December 1976 and both are preserved at Richmond Main..()Nos.12-24 RODsThese 13 locomotives were part of a class of 521 2-8-0 tender engines that were built by several locomotive builders for the Railway Operating Division (R.O.D.) of the Engineers for use in France during the First World War. These locomotives were based off the pre war Central Railway Class 8K 2-8-0 locos design by G. Robinson After the armistice these locomotives were surplus and J. & A. Brown bought 13 of these locomotives, these were built by the British Locomotive Company (9 locos), and Company (1 loco) and the Central Railway (3 locos). These 13 locos were bought over a period from March 1925 to March 1927. The first three locos arrived complete on the S.S. Boorara in February 1926. They were unloaded in Sydney and hauled to Hexham. In late 1927 the rest arrived in crates on Browns new ship the S.S. Minmi on its maiden voyage to Hexham. The dismantled locos were gradually reassembled with the last locos not being reassembled until 1931. The whole 13 locos were never in service at the one time with the maximum in service at the one time being ten in 1954. The class lasted until 28 June 1973 when the last ROD in service No.24 was withdrawn. Nos.20 & 24 are preserved by the Steam Railway and Museum and No.23 is preserved by the Richmond Vale Railway Museum.()No.26Purchased second hand from the Sydney & Suburban Blue Metal Cos gravel quarry at Widermere in 1948 to serve the recently opened open cut at Minmi, this loco was former NSWGR 2-6-4T side tank loco 2013 built by Peacock and Company in 1885 (builders No.2567). Due to the condition of the loco it underwent a major overhaul at Hexham Workshops & when this was completed in 1949 it was actually transferred to Abermain instead of its intended use on Minmi Open Cut trains. It was fitted with a replacement second hand boiler obtained from Hebburn Ltd in 1954. It remained at Abermain until the closure of the Abermain Collieries railway system in 1963 and was then stored at Hexham. In February 1967 it was transferred to Hebburn to replace that systems failed Robert Stephenson & Hawthorn loco. No.26 was used intermittently on the Hebburn system until December 1967 when it was put aside, it was cut up in March 1970 at Hebburn No.1 Colliery.()3013Due to problems experienced with No.26 whilst at Hebburn that required the hiring of a South Maitland Railways locomotive and since that SMR was short of locos due to the state of their loco fleet at the time, JABAS purchased 4-6-4T 3013 from the New South Wales Department of Railways. This locomotive was built by Peacock and Company in 1903 (builders No.4456). This loco was delivered to Hebburn Colliery at Weston on 15 May 1967, where it remained until the closure of Hebburn No.2 Colliery in June 1972 when it was transferred to Hexham on 12 July 1972. It was regularly used on duties at Hexham until the arrival of the second SMR Ten class loco in May 1973, when it was used mainly on standby duties until being stored in 1976. In 1981 the loco was sold to the Lachlan Valley Railway,() where it was dismantled for overhaul. In October 2009 the dismantled loco was transferred to the Canberra ARHS.Abermain Nos.1 & 2These 2 0-6-0T saddle tank locos were built by the Engine Company for the Abermain Coal Company No.1 in 1911 (builders No.1606) and No.2 in 1922 (builders No.1916) for use on the Abermain Collieries rail system between Abermain Nos.2 & 3 Collieries and the exchange sidings with the SMR at Abermain No.1 Colliery. Upon the formation of JABAS in 1931 these 2 locos kept their original road Nos and were known as Abermain No.1 & 2. The 2 locos remained on the Abermain system other than when being transferred to Hexham Workshops for overhaul, and their return to Abermain. In 1955 No.1 loco was transferred to Hexham mainly for use in servicing the new coal preparation plant. It was withdrawn in 1961 after a suffering a burnt boiler and was scrapped in 1966. No.2 loco was transferred to Hexham in December 1963 after the closure of the rail line servicing Abermain No.2 Colliery. At Hexham it was used to service the coal preparation plant & the coal staithes until 1969 when it was withdrawn, in June 1973 it was sold to the Hunter Valley Steam Railway and Museum.()South Maitland Railways 10 Class LocosThe first of the fourteen locos of this class was supplied to the East Greta Coal Mining Company in 1912 by Peacock and Company. In the following years the remaining locos were supplied to both the East Greta Coal Mining Co. and its successor South Maitland Railways Pty Ltd with the last arriving in 1926. These fourteen locos were used on coal haulage over the South Maitland system between the various collieries at Cessnock and the transfer point with the government railways at East Greta Junction at Maitland.In 1973 with the remaining R.O.D. locos at Hexham due for withdrawal from service and with South Maitland Railways being a fully owned subsidiary of Coal & Allied since 1967, two 10 class locos were transferred to Hexham. After the withdrawal of No.9 Pelaw Main in 1980 a third 10 class was transferred to Hexham. After the replacing of steam on the SMR by SRA diesels in June 1983 a fourth 10 class was allocated to Hexham to work the Richmond Vale Railway. All of the fourteen Maitland Railways 10 Class worked on the surviving section of the RVR between Hexham and Stockrington at various times. All fourteen locos survive.The line todayOf the once extensive system, only the relaid former passenger line (Richmond Main-Pelaw Main) and a short section of the line towards Stockrington (Richmond Main-Leggetts Drive) remains, used for tourist trains by the Richmond Vale Railway Museum. The vast majority of the alignment is in situ, and all three tunnels and two bridges are intact, but in a dilapidated state. The alignment has been encroached just opposite Leggetts Drive by a private landing strip, and near No. 2 Tunnel by a mining access road, where the cutting has been filled. Some track is still in place across Hexham Swamp and at the former Stockrington Colliery site, though unusable.There are still some physical remnants along the route, the aforementioned bridges and tunnels being the most recognisable. There are two dilapidated buildings remaining at the Hexham site, though not much else remains there. It has been suggested that one or some non-air wagons are sitting in a dilapidated state in the former Stockrington sidings, though this is yet to be confirmed.The Richmond Vale Railway and Mining Museum currently occupies the former Richmond Main Colliery, and operates trains on the former passenger line from Richmond Main to Pelaw Main. The Museum is custodian of a number of historic locomotives and items of rolling stock.Future proposalsThere was a proposal for a new freight and coal line to bypass the Newcastle urban area. The line would branch off the Main North railway line at Cockle Creek to join the Richmond Vale line near Seahampton, then use the northern (Stockrington-Minmi Junction-Hexham) part of the old Richmond Vale railway to connect to the main government line at Hexham.(NSW Planning Dept.)(http://www.parliament.nsw.gov.au/prod/lc/qalc.nsf/ad22cc96ba50555dca257051007aa5c8/ca25707400260aa3ca25706f0001fe5f!OpenDocument)Richmond Vale Railway MuseumAfter the closure of Richmond Main Power Station in 1976, Cessnock City Council acquired the abandoned Richmond Main Colliery  together with 40 acres surrounding the buildings from Coal & Allied. In 1979 the newly formed Richmond Vale Preservation Co-operative Society assumed the responsibility for the railway, leaving the development of Richmond Main Park and Mining Museum to be done independently. The aims of the Society are:*To preserve and record the history of rail haulage of coal in the Hunter Region, and all related aspects.*To preserve and record the industrial rail history of the Hunter Region.*To develop a steam hauled tourist railway from Richmond Main to Weston.The society soon started collecting rolling stock & locomotives, and also commenced relaying rails at the Richmond Main site. The rails reached Leggetts Drive in June 1987, and reached Pelaw Main Colliery in October 1991.Steam locomotivesThe museum has in its collection a number of RVR steam locomotives and steam locos from industries of the Hunter Valley.(RVRM Newsletter March/April 2004 issue)* 0-4-0ST Alison Ex John Lysaght - built 1922, Andrew Barclay & Sons (B/N 1738) (Static pending cosmetic restoration)* 0-4-0ST Marjorie Ex John Lysaght - built 1938, Clyde Engineering (B/N 462) (Operational)* 0-4-0ST Kathleen Ex John Lysaght - built 1921, Avonside Engine Co. (B/N 1862) (under Restoration to operational condition)* 2-8-2T No. 9 Pelaw Main Ex J & A Brown - built 1908, Kitson & Co. (B/N 4567) (Static, pending restoration)* 2-8-2T No. 10 Richmond Main Ex J & A Brown - built 1911, Kitson & Co. (B/N 4798) (Static, pending restoration)* 2-8-2T SMR19 Ex SMR - built 1915, Beyer Peacock (B/N 5910) (stored pending cosmetic restoration)* 2-8-2T SMR22 Ex SMR - built 1920, Beyer Peacock (B/N 6055) (Static)* 2-8-2T SMR24 Ex SMR - built 1922, Beyer Peacock (B/N 6125) (Overhaul)* 2-8-2T SMR25 Ex SMR - built 1922, Beyer Peacock (B/N 6126) (Stored, will be restored when Kathleen is finished)* 2-8-2T SMR30 Ex SMR - built 1924, Beyer Peacock (B/N 5294) (Overhaul)* BHP 2 60T Steam Crane/Locomotive Ex BHP - built 1913, Industrial Works (B/N 2967) (Static awaiting restoration)* BHP 5 15T Steam Crane/Locomotive Ex BHP - built 1920, Industrial Works (B/N 4146)(Restoration to operational condition almost complete)* 2-8-0 ROD23 Ex J & A Brown - built 1918, GCR (Dismantled, long-term restoration)Diesel locomotivesThe museum also operates a small number of ex-industrial diesels, and owns a wide variety of ex-NSWGR and ex-industrial rollingstock.(RVRM Newsletter March/April 2004 issue)Ex-industrial diesels are:* BHP 34 - built 1954, A. Goninan (B/N 3/S1003) (Operational)* BHP 42 (Static)* BHP 43 - built 1960, A.Goninan (B/N 3456-10/60-007) (Static)* BHP 53 - built 1963, A Goninan (B/N 9211-4/64-018) (Operational)* BHP 54 - built 1965, A Goninan (B/N 3835-12/65-020) (Static)* DR1 Ex Commonwealth Railways - built 1954, Ruston & Hornsby (B/N 3279868) (Static)* Planet Number 54 Ex NSW Maritime Services Board - Built 1955, F.C. Hibberd (B/N 3715) (Operational)* NSWGR Former steam operated now diesel powered 70T crane No. 1073, converted during use with NSWGR  - built 1928, Craven Brothers (Operational)Line extensionThe present caretakers of the railway, the Richmond Vale Railway Museum, are presently pursuing a plan to extend the line to the former SMR down main at Weston station, in order to link up with the South Maitland Railway. This would follow the former Link Line alignment most of the way, which is still largely intact. Another proposal was also floated some time ago which would have seen the line reinstated between Leggetts Drive and Richmond Vale Junction, then from there to Pelaw Main, giving a round trip. This was discarded in favour of the Weston link.Locomotive overhauls diesel locos BHP34, BHP Centre cab diesel No. 53, Planet No. 54 (ex-Coffs Harbour Jetty) and Ex-Lysaghts 0-4-0 tank Marjorie are operational. Locomotives to be returned to service in the next few years are 0-4-0 saddle tank Kathleen (similar to Marjorie), SMR24. A long term project is underway to return ex-ROD 2-8-0 No. 23 (withdrawn as No. 21) to steam, however it requires major boiler work, and other, more pressing projects have set it back somewhat.References* 
12775251
Broken_Hill_Ore_Deposit
File:KintoreHeadframe.JPG|thumb|Old Kintore headframe, now a museum exhibit, Broken HillThe Broken Hill Ore Deposit is located underneath Broken Hill in western South Wales, Australia, and is the namesake for the town. It is arguably the worlds richest and largest zinc-lead ore deposit. Discovery File:Chlorargyrite-119394.jpg|thumb|Chlorargyrite lining a vug in gossan at Broken HillThe Broken Hill ore deposit was discovered in 1883 by boundary rider Rasp, who discovered the gossan or weathered sulfide outcrop of massive lead-zinc sulfides on a feature known as Broken Hill. Rasp reported finding massive galena, sphalerite, cerussite and other oxide minerals, but was most concerned with the galena, a primary source of lead. His reports, believed exaggerated at the time, of masses of lead in the desert, soon proved true and sparked a lead rush similar to gold rushes. Exploitation Broken Hill was exploited initially by small prospectors working the gossan for easily won galena, and soon dozens of shafts were sunk. Ore was carted to South Australia by camel trains, wagons and pack mules. A major secondary source of income became apparent, with extremely high silver grades recovered, including native silver, and other rare silver minerals present in abundance.Mining has gradually moved away from the initial small prospectors, in line with the experience in all other major mineral fields, toward gradual consolidation of claims and tenure, an increase in tenure and mine size and efficiencies in operations resulting in smaller workforces. This has accelerated in the last part of the 20th century via the formation of the Broken Hill Proprietary Company - now Billiton  - and its exit from Broken Hill, toward only two operators at present, utilising highly efficient bulk underground mechanised mining. Geology The Broken Hill ore body is hosted within the gneisses of the Willyama Supergroup (Map), a mesoproterozoic sequence of quartz-rich feldspathic gneisses of interpreted sandstone protolith, and micaceous gneisses of siltstone protolith. The Broken Hill ore deposit is considered to be roughly 1,800 million years old. The simplified geology of the Broken Hill ore body is a series of boomerang-shaped, highly sheared and disrupted ribbon-like and poddy massive sulfide lenses which outcropped in the central section (the old Broken Hills gossan hills) and plunge steeply north and moderately south.The ore consists of massive, recrystallised sphalerite-rich, galena-sphalerite and galena-rich sulfide lenses often consisting of up to 100% lead-zinc sulfides, with little or no pyrite, chalcopyrite or gangue sulfides. The ore is hosted within a unit of gneiss known as the Potosi Gneiss.The footwall to the mineralization is a psammopelite gneiss, consisting of feldspar, quartz, garnet, biotite and amphibole, with a pelite gneiss on the hanging wall. The footwall gneiss contains anomalous mineral chemistries including a rare lead-rich feldspar and manganese-rich garnet chemistries.Ore is predominantly hosted at this stratigraphic break, but much of the ore body is structurally remobilised or offset into both the hangingwall and footwall, and the geometry of the ore deposit is particularly complex on the local scale. Genesis The genesis of the Broken Hill ore body is of great historical importance to geologists, particularly in Australia, as it is an iconic ore body and one of the most studied in the world, with over 1,500 papers published to date. It is also of great current importance, as conceptions of the genesis of this enigmatic ore deposit and its structural and stratigraphic setting drives exploration for repetitions of the ore deposit along strike, and in finding analogues elsewhere in the world.The genesis of Broken Hill is also of interest as it is of enduring controversy and conjecture, with the jury still mostly out on the matter although consensus has been reached on several key facets of the genetic processes which resulted in Broken Hills formation. The interpretations presented below are the most palatable middle view of a range of opinions. SEDEX mineralisation Broken Hill is widely considered to be a sedimentary exhalative (SEDEX) deposit which has been extensively reworked and modified by metamorphism and shearing. Key evidence for this over-arching theory includes the association of silver, lead and zinc, which is found in many other SEDEX deposits worldwide and the position of the bulk of mineralization at a key stratigraphic contact between psammite and psammopelite gneisses.The Potosi Gneiss, and the manganiferous garnet horizon, are considered key indicators of original bedding orientation (S0) and are thus key exploration targets, as there is a proven association of anomalous lead and zinc within the gneissic stratigraphy with these horizons on a regional basis. Metamorphic overprints The Broken Hill ore deposit is hosted within the Proterozoic gneisses of the Broken Hill Block, adjacent to the Curnamona Craton in South Australia. The terrane in which Broken Hill is hosted has undergone a series of several metamorphic deformations at amphibolite facies(). This has resulted in the squeezing of the lead and zinc sulfides into the current basic boomerang shape, and resulted in the separation of the ore body into zinc-rich and lead-rich lodes and domains. The lodes themselves show various structural facies, and show variable responses to shearing, though mostly in a ductile fashion. Many lodes, particularly the lead lodes, have sharp contacts with gneissic host rocks, indicating they have become structurally relocated during peak metamorphism. Similarly, it is conjectured that the current position of the zinc and lead lodes at Broken Hill may not necessarily be related to their original position along the bedding planes (S0), or vertically within the stratigraphic section.It has taken some considerable effort to see through the overwhelming structural overprint of metamorphism to infer the SEDEX classification. Metasomatism The lower part of the Willyama Supergroup has undergone intense sodium alteration, particularly the Broken Hill Block and subdomain. This has resulted in pervasive albite alteration particularly in the Olary domain adjacent to Broken Hill. The influence of high-temperature metamorphic fluids on the ore deposit cannot be discounted, although it is considered less central to genetic factors than previous theories of hydrothermal origins for the deposits. The current consensus view is that metasomatic overprints are present as a result of the focusing of flow through the zones of weakness around the massive sulfides, which are ductile failure loci in themselves. Metasomatic effects include re-equilibrating isotopic systematics of the lead-zinc sulfides and wall-rocks, and introduction of rare elements into the sulfide bodies to form one of the most diverse mineralogical assemblages in the Earths crust, with 1500 or more mineral species recognized at Broken Hill, including several dozen not reported elsewhere. The association of the Broken Hill line of lode with a horizon of manganiferous garnets is considered to be partly a function of a potential protolith of exhalative manganiferous chert, metamorphically upgraded to a garnetiferous gneiss, and perhaps some reconsititution of that protolith by metasomatism associated with the nearby massive sulfides. Broken Hill Type ore deposits File:Spessartine-Galena-120130.jpg|thumb|garnet crystals in massive galena, Broken HillBroken Hill is the type locality for a class of ore deposits known as Broken Hill Type, or BHT, ore deposits. This is a classification grouping of similar deposits for use in genesis theories and mineral exploration methodologies. The key criteria for BHT ore deposits are;* Association with major sedimentary packages of sandstone protoliths underlying siltstone protolith sequences in highly disturbed metamorphic terranes* A Proterozoic age is considered important, as no other major SEDEX lead-zinc deposits of this style are known from the Phanerozoic or Archaean* Association with manganiferous garnets. References *Mining and Exploration at Broken Hill: A Review . Sydney: Department of Mineral Resources, New South Wales, 1981.*Minerals of Broken Hill at Mindat.org(
12789447
Palaeochannel
Palaeochannels or paleochannels are deposits of unconsolidated sediments or semi-consolidated rocks deposited in ancient, currently inactive river and stream channel systems. The word palaeochannel is formed from the words palaeo or old, and channel; ie; a palaeochannel is an old channel. This may be synonymous with palaeovalley and palaeoriver.  Recognition A palaeochannel is distinct from the overbank deposits of currently active river channels, including ephemeral water courses which do not regularly flow (such as the River, Central Australia). A palaeochannel is distinct from such watercourses because the river bed is filled with sedimentary deposits which are unrelated to the normal bed load of the current drainage pattern.Many palaeochannels are arranged on old drainage patterns which are distinct from the current drainage system of a catchment. For example, palaeochannels may relate to a system of rivers and creeks which drained east-west and the current drainage direction is north-south. Palaeochannels can be most easily identified as broad erosional channels into a basement which underlies a system of depositional sequences which may contain several episodes of deposition and represent meandering peneplain streams. Thereafter, a palaeochannel may form part of the regolith of a region and, although it is unconsolidated or partly consolidated, is currently part of the erosional surface. Palaeochannels can also be identified according to their age. For example, there are deposits of Tertiary lignites situated in Tertiary river systems which are preserved on top of Archaean basement in the Craton of Western Australia.()  These  river systems have laid in place for ~15 to 50 million years and would be considered palaeochannels.  Formation Paleochannels form when river channels aggrade, depositing sediment on their bed. For these channel deposits to be preserved, the flow must not re-occupy and re-erode them. Examples of what may cause long-term preservation include the channels being in a net-depositional environment and/or being in a subsiding basin. Paleochannels may also be preserved in the short-term on non-net-depositional floodplains in which the river migrates or avulses away from its previous course. This preservation is short-term because unless the channel deposits are buried, flow will eventually re-occupy its formerly-occupied course, re-working and eroding the channel deposits. Geological importance Palaeochannels are important to geology for a number of reasons;* Understanding movements of faults, which may redirect river systems and thus form stranded channels which are in essence palaeochannels.* Preserving Tertiary, Eocene and Recent sediments and fossils within them, and are important locations for palaeontology, palaeobotany and archaeology. * Preserving evidence of older erosional surfaces and levels, useful for estimating the net erosional budget of older regolith* Preserving sedimentary records useful for understanding climatic conditions, including various isotopic indicators of past rainfall, temperatures and climates, which are used in understanding change and warming Economic importance Palaeochannels can host economic ore deposits of uranium,() lignite, metals such as gold and platinum, heavy minerals such as tin, tungsten, and ore preserved as paleo-placer deposits. References ( See also * Sedimentology* Erosion* genesis* mining* ore deposits
12800335
Zangezur_Copper_and_Molybdenum_Combine
The Zangezur Copper and Molybdenum Combine () is a mining industry enterprise in Armenia. History The first geological investigations with Kajaran in the province Syunik took place in 1935. The building of Kajaran copper and molybdenum mine began in 1940, but was interrupted because of the World War II until 1944. The mine first started production in 1951, and has continued production to the present day. After the independence of Armenia from the Union in the year 1991 the deep economic crisis seized also the Zangezur copper and molybdenum collective combined. It stood still until 1994.In 2004 the combine was privatized and currently the owners are:  the CRONIMET Mining GmbH (60% of shares), The Plant of Pure Iron OJSC (15% of shares), Armenian Molybdenum Production Ltd. (12.5%) and Zangezur Mining Ltd (12.5%)(ZCMC - Our History). References  External links *Official websiteKupfer- und Molybdnkombinat- 
12820880
Lake_Ore-be-gone
 cities  Lake Ore-be-gone is a  artificial lake, formed by the flooding of three open-pit iron ore mines, within the city limits of Gilbert, Minnesota, USA.Since the flooding of the mining pits, the area around the lake has been subject to reclamation, and there now exist beaches and docks.  As of June 2011, the beaches previously closed due to low water have been excavated and a new swimming area and boat landing are in the works.There are many sunken attractions for scuba divers to explore near the boat landings and the beach.  A map can be found outside the changing house, and the sites are typically marked with white buoys from late spring to October.The lakes name is a pun on the well-known fictional town of Wobegon, purportedly located in Minnesota. External links * The City of Gilberts website regarding Lake Ore-be-gone
12837054
Samuel_Hardman_Smith
 religion AnglicanSamuel Hardman Smith (July 22, 1868 &ndash; February 21, 1956)(http://www.findagrave.com/cgi-bin/fg.cgi?pagegr&GSlnSmith&GSfnSamuel&GSby1868&GSbyrelin&GSdyrelin&GScntry10&GSobn&GRid50336866&dfall&) was a politician in Alberta, Canada, and a municipal councillor in Edmonton.BiographySamuel Smith was born at The Grange, Hethersett, Norfolk, England, on July 22, 1868.  His family moved to Iowa in 1880 to farm near LeMars, where Smith attended high school.  Upon graduating, he farmed with his father until 1897 when he and his brother moved to Manitoba.  There, Smith farmed and later entered the real estate business.He moved to Edmonton in 1901.  He formed a real estate company - Western Realty Company, Ltd. - and had interests in coal mining and other businesses.  He was vice president of Western Clays, Ltd. and of Sandeman & Cope Company, Ltd.In the 1905 municipal election, he ran for alderman on City Council.  He placed third of ten candidates, and was one four candidates elected to a two year term.  He completed his term, but did not seek re-election at its expiration and did not re-enter politics thereafter.In 1907 he married Florence White.Samuel Smith was active with the Edmonton Club, the Church, and the Liberal Party.References*Edmonton Public Library biography of Samuel Smith*City of Edmonton biography of Samuel Smith
12857499
Aoranthe_penduliflora
Aoranthe penduliflora is a species of plant in the Rubiaceae family. It is endemic to Tanzania where it is found in the Mountains.(Iversen, Endemic and Near-Endemic Trees In the Usambara Mountains. http://www.easternarc.org/eucamp/near-endemiceast_west_usambara.html (accessed 24 Aug 2007).)  It is threatened by loss caused by logging, mining, and agriculture.(Lovett, J. & Clarke, G.P. 1998.  Aoranthe penduliflora.   2006 IUCN Red List of Threatened Species.   Downloaded on 20 August 2007.)  It grows as a tree with simple, opposite leaves.  The flowers are cream and red, and the fruit ripens orange.(Centre for Ecology Law and Policy, The Environment Department, The University of York, Aoranthe penduliflora. Jul 12 2007. http://www.york.ac.uk/res/celp/webpages/projects/ecology/tree%20guide/pages/RUBIACEAE/Aoranthe%20penduliflora%20%20.htm (accessed Aug 25 2007).)Referencespenduliflora
12870151
Jiangxi_Copper
Jiangxi Copper () (),(,) is the largest copper producer in China. Its operations include copper mining, milling, smelting and refining to produce copper-related products, including pyrite concentrates, acid and electrolytic gold and silver. Its chairman is Mr. Li Yuhuang and its headquarter is located at Guixi, Jiangxi, China.Jiangxi Copper is Chinas largest copper producer, and  manufactures 340,000 tons of copper annually from its mines, which include the Dexing and Yongping pits and the Wushan underground mine.Jiangxi Copper is also engaged in the production, processing and sale of copper cathodes, copper rods and wires and other related products. The Company also provides precious metals such as gold and silver; chemical products such as acid and sulfur ore concentrate; as well as rare metals and minerals such as molybdenum, selenium, rhenium, tellurium and bismuth. Jiangxi Copper is also involved in the exploration and exploitation of copper, gold, silver, lead and zinc, as well as the provision of services. Jiangxi Copper distributes its products in domestic markets, and exports to Kong, Taiwan, Australia and Thailand, among others. During the year 2008, Jiangxi Copper increased approximately 6.09 million metric tons of copper, 145 metric tons of gold and 1,700 metric tons of silver in reserve.It owns a copper smelter and refinery, and its majority-owned Jiangxi Copper Products subsidiary manufactures copper rods and wires. Other operations include gold and silver production. Jiangxi Copper Company Limited was formed by parent Jiangxi Copper Corporation, which is owned by the Chinese government, in 1997. Jiangxi Copper Corporation owns 48% of Jiangxi Copper Company Limited. Officers and directors*Yihuang Li: Chairman of the Board*Baomin Li: Vice Chairman of the Board*Chengjiu Gan: Chief Financial Officer*Qifang Pan: Secretary of the Board*Dazhao Tong: Secretary of the Board (Hong Kong)*Jianmin Gao: Executive Director*Qing Liang: Executive Director*Chiwei Wang: Deputy General Manager*Jianghao Liu: Chief Engineer*Ziping Long: Deputy General ManagerReferences External links *www.jxcc.com (official website)CopperCopperzh:
12876570
Glyn_Jones_(Welsh_writer)
signature Glyn Jones (28 February 1905  10 April 1995) was a 20th century Welsh author, poet and a very important figure in literature.() He served as both Chairman and President of the Welsh Academys English-language section.() In one of his most important works, The Dragon Has Two Tongues, he discusses the ways that the period between the World Wars affected his generation of Welsh authors.(Early lifeJones was born in Tydfil in 1905 into a Welsh speaking household,( his father was a post office clerk and his mother a teacher.(Brown (2001), pg. 38) Despite Welsh being his family language, as with all main-stream education in Wales during the first half of the twentieth century, he was educated in English. Jones obtained a place at Cyfarthfa Castle Grammar School, and by the time he left secondary education he had all but lost his ability to speak Welsh fluently. In his later life, Jones re-taught himself the Welsh language, though his literary works were always in English. After leaving Cyfartha Grammar, he gained a place at St Pauls College in Cheltenham.()From an early age Jones was a devout Christian; his parents being Welsh Nonconformists. Jones attended Sunday School as a child and in his later life he was a member of Minny Street Congregational Chapel in Cardiff.( His religious beliefs and his Welshness informed all his creative work,() even when many of his contemporary authors rejected religion.( On leaving full-time education Jones found work as a teacher, leaving Merthyr to take up a post in Cardiff, where the poverty of his pupils profoundly disturbed him,( and informed his political position as a Socialist. Although a Left wing thinker, Jones was never a member of the Labour Party, though in his later life he was sympathetic to the aims of Cymru.( In 1935, he married Phyllis Doreen Jones,( to whom all his books were dedicated.(  His earliest poetry was published in 1933 in Dublin Magazine,( and in 1935, on the suggestion of his friend Thomas,( he wrote a collection of short stories, entitled The Blue Bed. The collection, which included tales located in undefined almost mystical locations, others of Welsh village life, comic and highly visual, received a remarkable critical assessment from reviewers in London.() One of the tales from The Blue Book, I was Born in the Ystrad Valley, a tale of an armed Communist insurrection, was born from his own experiences of life in the slums of Cardiff. His initial writings were heavily influenced by fellow Welsh author, Evans, though The Blue Books did not carry the harsh tones of Evans work.(With the outbreak of the Second World War, and although not of call-up age, Jones registered as a objector in 1940.( This decision saw him dismissed from his teaching post by the Glamorgan Education Authority, although he found another teacher job soon after.Literary careerJones continued writing his poetry, with a collection of poems published in 1939. His first literary critique of poetry was of English Romantic poetry, of which he shared a style of striking imagery and sensuous language, being drawn to both H. Lawrence and Manley Hopkins.( Jones was particular impressed with Hopkins, and wrote an essay on his awareness of Welsh poetic metrics. The 1940s saw two more works published, a second collection of poetry, The Dream of Jake Hopkins (1944) and a second book of short stories The Water Music and other stories (1944). As in his earlier work, The Water Music saw his tales set in either the industrial Merthyr of his childhood, or the greener landscape of Carmarthenshire.(The 1950s and 1960s saw Jones concentrate on writing his three novels, The Valley, The City, The Village (1956), The Learning Lark (1960) and The Island of Apples (1965). His first novel, The Valley, The City, The Village, a bildungsroman centred around a young artist, is full of description and character, though it was criticised by some reviewers for its lack of formal unity( and overly exotic language.( Though some critics, such as Stephens, believe that Jones use of a variety of narrative and rhetorical techniques make the work a tour-de-force.( His second novel, The Learning Lark, is a picaresque send-up of the education system in a corrupt mining village. But despite reflecting ugly natured teachers, bribing their way to headships, there is no biting satire, and the book is full of comedic tones with Jones holding up a mirror towards the flaws within human traits.( His third novel, The Island of Apples, set in a fictionalised Merthyr, uses the myth of Afallon to explore the pain of the loss of childhood, again told through the eyes of a young narrator.(During the 1960s, Jones was at the centre of a literary controversy, when Scottish poet MacDiarmid lifted verbatim lines from one of Jones short stories and published them as part of his poem Perfect. Although Jones himself remained silent on the issue, supporters of both men filled columns in Times Literary Supplement, arguing over the merits of the situation.( MacDiarmid later stated that he had a memory, and that he must have used Jones lines unconsciously.() In later years neither poet showed much distress when they met, and were able to laugh off the controversy.( The decade also saw Jones publish his most important work, The Dragon has Two Tongues, a criticism of Anglo-Welsh literature; an autobiographical work examining the effect of education, religion and politics on a generation of Welsh writers between the two World Wars,( and an important account of his friendship with several important Welsh writers including Caradoc Evans, Dylan Thomas, Gwyn Jones and Rhys.(The 1970s saw Jones return to poetry and short stories, with two collections of stories published, Selected Short Stories (1971) and Welsh Heirs (1977); which bookended a poetic compilation Selected Poems (1975).In the 1980s, Jones spent increasing time translating Welsh language works into English. Although Jones was now a fluent Welsh speaker he never wrote in his mother-tongue, once stating that his Welsh was ...the language of adolescence, not the mother tongue, which the artist will be likely to use for his creative purposes.( Jones first translated Welsh texts in 1954, working with J. Morgan on The Saga of Llywarch the Old. In 1981 he worked on his own translations with When the Rose Bush brings forth Apples followed by Honeydew on the Wormwood: a further selection of old Welsh verses in 1984.Relationship with Dylan ThomasIn 1934, Jones wrote to Dylan Thomas, after reading his poem The Woman Speaks, which had been published in Adelphi.(Ferris (1989), pg. 101) Both men were relative unknowns during this period, but the correspondence began by Jones led to a long and lasting friendship between the two poets.(Ferris (1989), pg. 102) On Whitsun 1934 the two men met up. Jones, who had a car, drove the two of them to Laugharne; and Thomas later described Jones to his girlfriend, Pamela Hansford Johnson, as a nice, handsome young man with no vices.(Ferris (1989), pg. 107) Later that year, the two men met again, this time to visit fellow poet Caradoc Evans. After the visit, while the men shared a hotel room, Jones recalled the tale of Welsh eccentric Dr. William Price, who cremated his young son without official permission after the childs death. Thomas later turned the tale into the story The Burning Baby.(Ferris (1989), pg. 114) The next year, Thomas invited Jones to London. Amongst the artists of London, Jones found that Thomas would change his viewpoint to suit the group of people he was talking to, a trait that made Jones uneasy.(Ferris (1989), pg. 140) As Thomas grew in fame, he and Jones saw less of each other, but in December 1949, Jones was to interview his old friend for a BBC radio programme, How I Write. Jones travelled to Laugharne to meet Thomas at his home, the Boathouse. Jones was shocked at how much his friend had changed, with his face bloated and pale, symptoms of Thomas years of heavy drinking. They discussed what they would they would say in the broadcast, but a few days before Christmas, the producers received a call from Thomas wife stating that he was ill with broken ribs and the interview never took place.(Ferris (1989), pg. 249)Awards and later lifeJones was seen as an important and influential writer in Welsh literary circles, and was elected as the President of the Welsh Academy and in 1985 he became the Academys first honorary member. This was proceeded in 1971, by an award from the Council of Wales for his contribution to the literature of Wales. He was also awarded an honorary Doctor of Literature by the of Wales in 1974 and an Honorary Fellowship of Trinity College, Carmarthen. In 1988 he was made an honorary member of the of Bards.()In his final years, Jones health suffered and he was forced to have his right arm amputated. He continued his correspondence with fellow writers through letters, in what he saw was a vital link in the history of Welsh literature. He died in Cardiff on 10 April 1995.(Published worksNovels*The Valley, The City, The Village (1956)*The Learning Lark (1960)*The Island of Apples (1965)Poetry*Poems (1939)*The Dream of Jake Hopkins (1944)*Selected Poems (1975)*Selected Poems: fragments and fictions (1988)*The Collected Poems of Glyn Jones (edited by Meic Stephens) (1996)Short Stories*The Blue Bed (1937)*The Water Music and other stories (1944)*Selected Short Stories (1971)*Welsh Heirs (1977)*The Collected Stories of Glyn Jones (edited and introduction by Tony Brown) (1999)Translations*The Saga of Llywarch the Old: a reconstruction by Glyn Jones with the verse and interludes (with T.J.Morgan) (1955)*When the Rose Bush brings forth Apples (1981)*Honeydew on the Wormwood: a further selection of old Welsh verses (1984)*The Story of Heledd (with T.J.Morgan, edited by Jenny Morgan) (1994)*A Peoples Poetry: hen benillion (1997)Criticism*The Dragon Has Two Tongues (1968) (2001)*Profiles: a visitors guide to writing in twentieth century Wales (with John Rowlands) (1980)NotesExternal links*The Glyn Jones CentreBiography* Brown, Tony (2001), The Ex-Centric Voice: The English-Language Short Story in Wales* Jones
12889516
Walsall_Wood
os_grid_reference        SK049033Walsall Wood is a settlement located in the Borough of Walsall, West Midlands, UK, between Aldridge and Brownhills.HistoryIn the late-18th century and early-19th century, the workers of Walsall Wood were primarily involved in the mining of limestone. In 1864, the population of the settlement expanded as Walsall Wood Colliery was opened,() as well as another colliery in near-by Shelfield. The Walsall Wood Colliery purchased the Pelsall Colliery from Pelsall Coal & Iron Co. in 1894.() The opening of the Walsall Wood Colliery saw the establishment of the first public services, including a police station and a post office. The mine was closed in 1964 when the supply of accessible coal had been exhausted: In 2010 a memorial pithead designed by Luke Perry was erected to commemorate the villages mining heritage.St Johns Church in Walsall Wood was constructed in 1837 at a cost of 1,200. The church, with its quadrangular tower, is in the Gothic style, whilst the parsonage house is in the Elizabethan style. The church is constructed out of blue brick with stone dressings and has a capacity of 400.()Local GovernmentWalsall Wood is part of the North and Walsall Wood ward, in the Aldridge-Brownhills constituency, the MP of which is presently Shepherd (Conservative). The area is represented by three Conservative councillors, Keith Sears, Anthony Harris and Mike Flower.EducationOak School is located in Walsall Wood and had the seventh best GCSE results in the borough for 2006.()Sports, recreation and entertainmentOak Park is a recreation centre in Walsall Wood consisting of two swimming pools, an astro-turf football pitch, and other sporting facilities. Wood F.C. is a football club competing in the Midland Combination Premier Division. They play their home games at their ground located at Oak Park.There is an on-site KFC restaurant located right next to the parking of the facility.Over the road from Oak Park is a First gym, and several shops including a fish and chip shop.Walsall Wood library is located in the former Neighbourhood Office building at the junction of Coppice Road and Lichfield Road. This replaces the former library building on Lichfield Road.ReferencesExternal links*Aldridge-Brownhills Conservative Association The Conservative constituency association.Wood
12902662
Ocotea_pachypoda
Ocotea pachypoda is a species of tree in the Lauraceae family. It is endemic to Ecuador.  Its natural habitat is subtropical or tropical moist montanes. It is thought that this species is most threatened by colonization, deforestation, and mining.  It is known from two collections, both of which were taken from the Cotacachi Volcano.Source* Muriel, P. & Pitman, N. 2004.  Ocotea pachypoda.   2006 IUCN Red List of Threatened Species.   Downloaded on 22 August 2007.pachypodapachypoda
12913133
Mountain_Family_Robinson
 followed_by     Mountain Family Robinson is a 1979 family movie that stars Logan, Buck Flower and Damante-Shaw.  This film is a sequel to Adventures of the Wilderness Family and Further Adventures of the Wilderness Family. This title like the previous titles was filmed in the state of Colorado. The movie is rated G in the USA.PlotIn the final sequel, the Robinsons celebrate the arrival of spring after surviving a fierce winter. Soon their happiness is quickly dashed as a Forest Service ranger informs them they must prove their mountain home is located on a legitimate mining claim or they must move out. Also, Pat finds out that her mother is ill and decides to go back to Los Angeles. Will the Robinsons lose their mountain home? Will Pat come back from the city?Main cast*Logan ...  Skip Robinson*Damante-Shaw ...  Pat Robinson*Rattray ...  Jenny Robinson*Ham Larsen ...  Toby Robinson*Buck Flower ...  Boomer*William Bryant ...  Forest RangerDVD details*Release date: January 1, 2003*Full Screen*Region: 1*Aspect Ratio: 1.33:1*Audio tracks: English*Subtitles: English, Spanish*Running time: 100 minutesExternal links***Official Site*Movie Trailer for TVmehr Abenteuer der Familie Robinson in der Wildnis
12932484
Cardiff,_Illinois
Cardiff is a town in Livingston County, Illinois, States.  Founded as a coal mining town in 1899, it boomed in its first few years.  Rapid growth ceased after accidents in the mines in 1903, and the closure of the mines in 1912 soon led to the communitys demise. It is located in Round Grove Township, between the villages of Campus and Reddick.External Links* Cardiff memorial reclaims lost communitys past* Cardiff Ghost Town on the Prairie* A post about Cardiff, Illinois on AmeriCymru
12941165
Wuhan_University_of_Science_and_Technology
Wuhan University of Science and Technology (WUST ) is a public, comprehensive, research university located in the city of Wuhan, the capital of Hubei province, China. It is a key university co-administered by the Chinese Ministry of Education and Hubei province.left|520px|thumbnail|QingShan campus of WUSTHistoryThe history of WUST dates back to the Hubei Technical Institute (), which was founded in 1898 by Zhidong , Governor of Shanxi, the Viceroy of Huguang, of Liangguang, in the late Qing Dynasty.Image:Wust2.jpg|thumb|400px|right|The statue of Zhidong in Qingshan Campus, the Founder of Wuhan University of Science and Technology.In 1958, it renamed as Wuhan Institute of Metallurgy () and began to offer four-year degree programs. At that time, it affiliated to the Ministry of Metallurgy, which was later revoked in 1998.So the university was changed to governed by the Hubei Province and co-constructed by the Ministry of Education.In 1995, two colleges are merged into Wuhan Institute of Metallurgy, which are Wuhan Advanced Construction School () and Wuhan Medical School of Metallurgy (). And Wuhan Institute of Metallurgy changed its name to Wuhan Metallurgy University of Science and Technology.().In 1999, it became known as Wuhan University of Science and Technology (WUST) with the approval of the Ministry of Education and Hubei provincial government. Now WUST is authorized to confer 51 bachelor degree programs,6 doctoral degree programs, 52 master degree programs as well as master degree programs of Engineering in 11 fields. Among those, 9 first-class master degree were ranked top 50 and 2 first-class master degrees (ie.Metallurgy Engineering and Mining Engineering) were ranked top 10 by the Degree of Ministry of Education & Postgraduate Education Development Center in 2006.Besides, the university establishes many high-level research centers, among which there are 1 national key laboratories, 12 experimental bases, long-time co-operated with the big enterprises as Wuhan Iron and Steel Group ), Panzhihua Iron and Steel Group(), Liuzhou Iron and Steel Group(), Handan Iron and Steel Group(),etc.AcademicsColleges and Schools*College of Material and Metallurgy()*College of Machinery and Automation()*College of Natural Resource and Environment Engineering()*College of Chemical Engineering and Technology() *College of Science()*College of Computer Science and Technology()*College of Information Science and Engineering() *College of Management()*College of Foreign Language()*College of Literature, Law and Economics()*College of Art and Design()*College of Urban Construction()*Medical College()*International College()*College of Vocational and Technical()*College of Adult Education()Faculty and Staff*Faculty:  2715*Member of Academician of China (double engaged): 3*Member ofChu Tian Scholar Program Professor: 8*Member of Professor and Researcher: 700Campusthumb|400px|left|Main Building of HuangJiaHu campus.HuangJiaHu Campus at Wuchang District,(),Wuhan HuangJiaHu Campus(), District, Wuhanthumb|350px|right|Main Building of QingShan campus.Qingshan Campus at Qingshan District(), Wuhan 947 Heping Dadao (Peace Avenue),District,WuhanStudent lifeStudent demographicsFull-time students: 24,764AthleticsWUST Womens basketball team has won several national championships in CUBA and won the President Cup in the fifth and sixth China University Students Sports meetings successively.ServicesHospitalsthumb|300px|right| The Wuhan Railway Center Hospital was affiliated to Wuhan University of Science and Technology.     *947 Heping Dadao (Peace Avenue), Qingshan District, Wuhan*Wuhan Railway Center Hospital (Affiliated Medical College of WUST) category: IIIA | NationalLibraries*Founded in 1958, it is one of the large libraries in the universities in Hubei Province.*The Library in Qingshan Old Campus has seven floors, occupying an area of 11,000 square meters, plus the library branch in School of Construction and School of Medicine, the total area can achieve 16,000 square meters. The library has 20 reading rooms, and 2,400 reading seat, can receive at a maximum of 4,000 readers every day. It is the orange building in the top photo.*Nowadays, the whole library stores about 1,000,000 literature, of which 880,000 books, foreign periodicals about 100,000 volumes, video literature 1,000 copies, electrical literature 8,000 kinds. Every year, 1,200 kinds of Chinese and foreign literature are subscribed, and the amount increases at the speed of 12,000 volumes per year.External links*Wuhan University of Science and Technology (English)*Wuhan University of Science and Technology (Chinese)ja:zh:
12956509
John_Murtagh_Macrossan
John Murtagh Macrossan (18321891) was an Australian politician of the late 19th Century in the of Queensland.Early and parliamentary lifeMacrossan was born in Donegal, Ireland.  He moved to the colony of Victoria at the age of 21 to work on diggings.  Twelve years later he moved to Queensland where he became well known among the miners in 1873 was elected a member of the legislative assembly for the Kennedy electoral district.  He championed the causes of regulation of the mining industry and Separatism of North Queensland as a separate colony.  From January 1879 he was secretary for public works and for mines in the first and second McIlwraith Ministries.  In January 1890 Macrossan became the Colonial Secretary in the Morehead governmentMiningIn the McIlwraith Ministry, Macrossan successfully introduced the first mining regulations in Queensland on his third attempt in 1881.  In 1889 Macrossan expanded upon this success by introducing new regulations which included provisions for a system of inspections by representatives of the miners. Self-government of northern Queensland and Australian FederationAfter advocating on the issue for many years, in October 1890 Macrossan brought forward a motion to bring about the separation of the north. Then Premier Griffith moved an amendment that it was desirable to have separate legislative authorities in southern, northern and central Queensland, which was carried.  However in the 1890s Regionalism became less of a focus as Federalism became closer to attainment.  In February 1890 Macrossan attended the conference on federation held at Melbourne with Griffith, who was then leader of the opposition, and in 1891 he was one of the Queensland representatives to the first Constitutional Convention.  Four weeks after the conference opened he died, on 30 March 1891.  References** Waterson, Duncan Bruce:Biographical Register of the Queensland Parliament 1860-1929 (second edition), Sydney 2001.* Joyce R.B. & Murphy, D.J.(Ed.): Queensland Political Portraits, St Lucia (University of Queensland Press), 1978.
12972622
Senghenydd_RFC
Senghenydd Rugby Football Club are a Welsh union club based in Senghenydd in South Wales. The club formed during the 1898/99 season built around the immigrant workers coming from port areas around Wales to find employment in the newly sunk Senghenydd mines. Early history 1904 saw the great revival(Smith (1980), pg 120.) throughout South Wales led by the preacher, Evan Roberts.  Rugby was seen as a wicked sport leading to violence and drunkenness, and Roberts managed to convert so many to his cause that Senghenydd RFC disbanded due to a lack of players. In 1907 a rugby team reformed under the name Senghenydd Bluebells RFC, before reverting back to Senghenydd RFC.On the 14th October 1913 Britains worst ever mining disaster occurred at Senghenydd Colliery, amongst the 439 victims were five members of Senghenydd RFC.During the 1914/15 season Senghenydd applied for and was successful in gaining membership of the Rugby Union. This would allow them to play the larger affiliated clubs and take part in more accepted cup competitions. This new era of rugby did not occur due to the outbreak of War I causing the cessation of competitive rugby throughout Wales.Post 1945One of Senghenydd RFCs most successful periods was during the late 1960s and early 1970s. By the time that the senior team won the County Silver Ball Trophy for the first time during the 1970/71 season they had won the Mid-District Championship four times in the previous five seasons.(Smith (1972), pg 57.) They made that five in six in 1970/71 when they finished the table with a perfect 20 wins out of 20 matches.( The only major trophy the team failed to win in the 1970/71 season was the Mid District Cup, beaten by Beddau 17-11 in the final.Club honours*1911/12 Cardiff and District League Championship, 2nd Division - Champions*1911/12 Lord Ninian Stuart Cup - Champions*1923/24 Lord Ninian Stuart Cup - Champions*1924/25 Lord Ninian Stuart Cup - Champions*1949/50 Ivor Williams Cup - Champions*1970/71 Mid-District Championship - Champions*1970/71 Glamorgan County Silver Ball Trophy - Winners*1971/72 Glamorgan County Silver Ball Trophy - Winners*1976/77 Ivor Williams Cup - Champions*2010/11 Swalec Bowl() External links * Senghenydd RFCBibliography* * *  References 
12982618
Moshe_Novomeysky
Moshe Novomeysky (, ; November 25, 1873  March 27, 1961) was an early Israeli pioneer, scientist, and developer of the Palestine Potash Company, precursor of the Sea Works. (The Building of the Israeli State Sector, Case Study: The Palestine Potash Ltd.)BiographyMikhail (Moses) Novomeysky was born in 1873 in the Siberian village of Barguzin. Following his father, he developed an interest in mining. He graduated Technical School, then studied mining engineering in Royal Prussian University, graduating in 1897 and returning to Barguzin. Unlike fellow mining scientists, Novomeysky looked towards Baikal as a source of minerals and researched ways to extract them from bodies of water, and was among the pioneers of mining in Siberia. In 1900, he built a chemical factory that supplied local glassworks with refined salts.Novomeysky came from a family tradition of political activism. His grandfather was exiled from Poland to Siberia in 1831 on the charge of aiding Polish rebels in an uprising. Initially a Social Revolutionary, he moved towards the Democrats. Upset by their views on nationalities, Novomeysky discovered Zionism and attended the 1903 Congress in Basel, Switzerland. This resulted in his 1905 imprisonment for revolutionary activity. He was released after five months. Novomeysky went on to become a prominent figure in Jewish community. He chaired National Council of Jews in Siberia and headed Siberian Zionist Center in 1914-1920.(  ) He was treasurer for Haganah in 1921-1922.( )Dead Sea developmentNovomeyskys interest in the Sea can be traced back to his meeting with fellow scientist and Zionist Warburg in 1906, who introduced him to a report about the Dead Sea by German geologist Blankenhorn. He discerned similarities between its chemical composition and those of the Siberian lakes. In 1907, he applied to the Ottoman Turkish authorities for permission to extract salts from the Dead Sea. In 1911, he visited the Dead Sea for the first time. With a climate that was the polar opposite of his birthplace, he wrote, This was something of quite a different order from anything I had known. He then set about testing the Dead Seas specific gravity, water and air temperatures, and the practicality of constructing pans. He then returned to Siberia.In 1920, Novomeysky immigrated  to Mandate Palestine and began using his Hebrew name, Moshe. He settled his family in Gedera, near Aviv, and purchased some land on the Dead Seas northern shore, near Jericho. Towards the end of 1922 he purchased rights to mine salt at Sodom and sail on the sea from a Bethlehem Arab, along with some disused huts on the northern shore. He continued  his pursuits by founding a company, Jordan, to search for oil. In 1924 he founded the Palestine Mining Syndicate, and conducted more surveys of the Dead Sea with the British geologist George Stanfield Blake.In 1925, the Commissioner for Palestine granted him permission to continue the surveys. In April, he sent the manager of his plant in Hadera, Moshe Langutzky, to conduct research on the northern shore. Langutzky spent two years observing, surveying, and running early attempts at potash exploitation, all on his own.Palestine Potash CompanyBritish Mandatory authorities subsequently issued a tender for mining the Dead Sea area. Many groups applied; Novomeyskys consortium included a Scotsman named Talluck who had sought permission to mine there as early as the beginning of the British rule in 1918. After beating fierce competition from American firms for the right to mine around the Dead Sea, the application was officially accepted by High Commissioner Herbert Plumer in 1927. This triggered a debate in the British Parliament, revealing the anti-Semitic and anti-Zionist feelings of some MPs. In this debate, the speaker of the of Lords, Islington, described Zionism as an unfortunate experiment.Gathering support among well-known Londoners, Novomeysky was eventually granted a seventy-five year concession in August 1929 to his Palestine Potash Company, but only after providing documentation of his funding and accepting that the company be run by a Briton. The companys of directors and marketing departments were located in London, their management and research laboratories in Jerusalem, the primary production facility on the northern shore of the Dead Sea, and experimental production at the Sodom site. Most of the workers were employed at the northern shore campus and commuted from Jerusalem. British authorities would not allow the Jews to establish villages on nearby government land, but Novomeysky was ultimately granted permission to build a workers neighbourhood on the basis of his concession. Marshland near the potash plant was drained, and a neighbourhood named Kalia was begun in 1934, which eventually built community institutions and was planned on the communal settlement model.Seeing potential for the Dead Sea as a vacation place, the British authorities had installed a golf course in Kalia named and Gomorrah.Potash production was based on extremely large pans, while the northern shore plot was relatively small. Novomeysky felt the limitations in 1933 when he approached kibbutz Rachel about organising a labour group to expand operations at the expansive Mount Sodom site; while the northern shore had difficult conditions, the southern site was far harsher due to its isolation from civilisation in the heart of the Desert combined with that regions arid climate. Ramat Rachel contacted the Kibbutz Movement, which organised a group of 20 who in 1934 travelled to Mount Sodom along with Palestine Potash workers to establish a work camp. Materials arrived from Jerusalem, and water was purchased from King Abdullah.The group found a good site for building residences in the nearby Zoar valley and was joined by a workers group from Raanana. However the area was now allotted to Abdullahs of Transjordan, and the group was evacuated following his protests. Despite this, on 8 October 1939, at the start of the Second World War, the group was able to set up a kibbutz near Kalia called HaArava, which facilitated successful experiments in raising crops on hypersaline soil. Novomeysky received permission despite the British Paper of 1939, which sought to restrict further Jewish immigration into Palestine and prevent new settlements from being built, because the kibbutz was a residence for his workers. By 1943, 100 Jewish families were living in Beit HaArava, which boasted fish ponds, eucalyptus, cypress, pines, and flowers.By 1940 the Palestine Potash Company was responsible for half of the countrys industrial export, and it supplied half of Britains demand during World War II. In 1946 Novomeysky founded a fertiliser and chemicals company.1948 Arab-Israeli WarBuilding a good relationship with the local Arab population was important to Novomeysky. He mastered the language and was known to locals as the doctor. Novomeysky had also maintained ties with King I of Jordan, whose Emirate, now a country, lay just across the River from the northern shore concession.Due to Novomeyskys reputation, the kibbutzim were spared from the anti-Jewish riots of 1936-39. Many of its Arab labourers hailed from nearby Jericho.From 18 April 1948, the British ceased escorting convoys from Jerusalem to the northern shore facilities. As the prospect of war between the Arabs and the Zionists increased at the close of the British Mandate, Novomeysky tried to foster peace with Adbullah, attempting to strike a deal that would spare the potash works due to their value to both sides as well as the British. Having twice flown to Amman for negotiations, on 13 May 1948 an agreement was reached with the Transjordanian delegation whereby a neutral zone would be created to protect the facilities. He travelled to Aviv on 14 May in order to share these results with Ben-Gurion, the Zionist leader and soon Minister of Israel.Ben-Gurion couldnt immediately meet him due to preparations for Israels Declaration of Independence, and when Moshe Novomeysky was injured in an automobile accident, he was unable to attend to finalising the understandings. On 17 May, representatives of the Palestine Potash Company and the Haganah signed an agreement putting both northern and southern facilities under Transjordanian custody, in contradiction to the previous agreements. The Haganah command rejected the new agreement as well, but due to his hospitalisation, Novomeysky was unable to use his Transjordanian contacts to remedy the situation.As other Jewish settlements in Arab-controlled areas were subject to massacres, the residents of Kalia grew apprehensive. After the Naharayim power plant, which straddles the River, had its Jewish employees taken prisoner by the Jordanians, the mistrust grew. Ben-Gurion ultimately ordered Kalia and Beit HaAravah evacuated, and on May 19 and May 20, 1948, hundreds of workers, kibbutz members, and the Palmach security contingent fled on a fleet of 17 small boats to the Mount Sodom complex, having sabotaged the factorys equipment to prevent the now enemy from using them. Abdullahs Legion entered the site, which had already been vandalised by locals, on May 22, and completely destroyed both the Potash facilities and the kibbutzim.After the establishment of the stateIn November 1948, Israels provisional government appointed a commission to examine the Palestine Phosphate Companys operations and determine what action, if any, the government should take. The Yishuvs attitudes towards the company were mixed, on the one hand recognising its important contributions to the economy, and on the other hostile to its British directors. The commission acted to expel the British interests and to modify the concessions terms. At the same time, Novomeysky, 75 years of age, was forced out. Following the commissions recommendations, conditions were set to allow continued operation of the company, which were not met.The Israeli government decided in December 1951 to start a new company, the Dead Sea Works Ltd. The new company acquired all the property of the Palestine Potash Company in July 1952, but was run without making use of the previous companys considerable experience. In the face of decreasing productivity, Maklef was appointed director, and he soon turned around and improved the operations. Novomeysky maintained contact with Adbullah, in hope of restoring his business. In 1957, the Technion awarded Novomeysky an doctorate in the technical sciences. He died in 1961 at the age of 87, and was buried in Avivs cemetery.ReferencesBibliography*The Dead Sea by Barbara Kreiger pgs. 141-165* http://www.chemistry.org.il/booklet/16/pdf/novomersky.pdf Weintraub, B. (2004).  Moshe A. Novomeysky: Founder of the Dead Sea Industries; Chemistry in Israel, Bull.  Isr.  Chem. Soc.,  Issue 16, Aug.2004,  p 37-40.Novomejskij 
12982880
Blairtown,_Wyoming
Blairtown is an unincorporated community in Sweetwater County, Wyoming, States, near Rock Springs.(http://wyoming.hometownlocator.com/wy/sweetwater/blairtown.cfm) This town was actually a mining area before it became a town. It was started by the Blair Brothers back in the 1860s. It has its own park and is located near a set of Union Pacific Railroad.IndustryIndustry of all types is important in the community. Many key industries are located here, including Halliburton and Schlumberger. This is a stretch of road that intersects with Route 191.Notes
12994384
Roman_Catholic_Diocese_of_Grass_Valley
The Diocese of Grass Valley () was a diocese of the Church of the Church located in northeastern California, States. The diocese also included most of Nevada,() and, early in its history, Utah and part of Colorado.() HistoryThe church that became the Diocese of Grass Valley was erected in 1860 as the Apostolic of Marysville from territory formerly belonging to the Archdiocese of San Francisco, of which it was a see.() In 1868, the city was changed to Grass Valley, and the vicariate was renamed and elevated to a diocese.()St. Joseph Church in Marysville served as the pro-cathedral of the vicarate. When the vicarate was elevated to a diocese, Bishop Eugene OConnell resisted the change of see city to Grass Valley, and continued using St. Josephs as his pro-cathedral. St. Patrick Cathedral in Grass Valley was the official cathedral approved by the Vatican.()The diocese served the large mining population in the Sierra Nevada during the Gold Rush. By 1886, commercial mining in the Country had slowed considerably, significantly reducing the population in the area, and the diocese was suppressed. Much of its territory became part of the Diocese of Sacramento. OConnell is considered the first bishop of Sacramento.(Lineage of Bishops Retrieved: 2010-03-24.)()Second diocesan bishopOn July 27, 1880 Bishop Manogue was appointed as bishop of the Grass Valley Diocese.() On May 24, 1884, Manogue succeeded OConnell as the second and last diocesan bishop of Grass Valley.( Manogue served two years as the final diocesan bishop.(Suppression of dioceseOn May 28, 1888 this diocese was suppressed( when the Diocese of Sacramento was erected.() Manogue became its founding bishop and in effect the second bishop of the Sacramento diocese.((Lineage of Bishops Retrieved: 2010-03-24.)(RestorationIn 1997, John Paul II restored the see as a see. The current bishop of Grass Valley is Macaluso, an bishop of the Archdiocese of Hartford.()Ordinaries;Vicar Apostolic of Marysville(#OConnell (1860&ndash;1868);Bishop of Grass Valley(#Eugene OConnell (1868&ndash;1884)#Manogue (1884&ndash;1886);Titular Bishop of Grass Valley(#Macaluso (1997&ndash;present)Further reading*Dwyer, John T. (1976); Condemned to the mines: The life of Eugene OConnell, 1815-1891, pioneer bishop of Northern California and Nevada; ISBN 0-533-02130-8See Also* of titular seesReferences(Valley (Titularbistum)di Grass Valley
13009217
Alterklz
Alterklz is an Ortsgemeinde  a municipality belonging to a Verbandsgemeinde, a kind of collective municipality  in the Rhein-Hunsrck-Kreis (district) in Rhineland-Palatinate, Germany. It is also a tourism community (Fremdenverkehrsgemeinde).GeographyLocationThe municipality lies in the Klzbach valley, stretching strikingly along Landesstrae (State Road) 108, which is known locally as Hauptstrae (Main Street) where it actually passes through the village. Its length along this road has led to Alterklz being called the Longest Village in the Hunsrck. Also belonging to the municipality is the outlying centre of Osterklzmhle in the Osterklz valley, southeast of the main centre.Neighbouring municipalitiesAlterklzs neighbours, by compass direction, are as follows:HistoryAlterklz belonged until 1417 to the Further of Sponheim, and locally to the Amt of Kastellaun. After this line of the Sponheims died out, the village went with Kastellaun to the Hinder part of the County.Over the centuries, Alterklz grew together from several villages: Unterdorf (Lower Village), Mitteldorf (Middle Village), berbach and Wehr. As late as 1865, the now Ortsteil of Wehr was mentioned as a hamlet in its own right.On the way out of the village to the south, near the Klzbach, the local river, are found remnants of a mediaeval iron smelter and what is left of the mine whence the ore came, the Grube Eid. Also found there is a slope on which once stood a Roman estate, a rustica.From 1901 to 1983, the village was a stop on the old SimmernKastellaunBoppard Hunsrckbahn (railway). At the beginning of the 21st century, the former railway right-of-way was converted into an asphalt-paved cycle and hiking path, the Schinderhannes-Radweg, named after a famous German outlaw.In 2005, the municipality reached fifth place in the area in the state contest Unser Dorf hat Zukunft (Our village has a future).PoliticsMunicipal councilThe council is made up of 8 council members, who were elected at the municipal election held on 7 June 2009, and the honorary mayor as chairman.MayorAlterklzs mayor is Klaus Hfner.(Alterklzs mayor)Coat of armsThe German blazon reads: Im geteilten Schild oben in Schwarz ein aufspringender goldener Ziegenbock, beseitet von zwei goldenen hren, unten von Rot und Silber geschachtet, belegt mit schrggekreuzten schwarzen Schlgel und Hammer.The municipalitys arms might in English heraldic language be described thus: Per fess sable a billygoat springing between two ears of wheat couped in base Or and chequy of twenty-four gules and argent a hammer and a sledge per saltire of the first.The red and silver checkerboard pattern in the lower half of the escutcheon refers to the villages former allegiance to the Hinder of Sponheim and the Amt of Kastellaun. As early as 1283, Alterklz was being mentioned in a few Sponheim documents (cule, kultze). The charge here, the hammer and sledge, recall the iron ore mining that was undertaken at the Grube Eid (mine) from 1780 (as it is established in historical records) until the World War. The ears of wheat stand for agriculture, once every villagers occupation. Many lordships were enfeoffed here, the Sponheims, the Koppensteins, the Hunolsteins and the Bourscheids. The springing billygoat represents the outlying centre of Wehr, where the Wehrer Bick live, Bick being a local form of the German Bcke (bucks, male animals, and thus in this case, billygoats). The billygoat also graces the new town halls roof.The arms have been borne since 23 February 1981.(Description and explanation of Alterklzs arms)Culture and sightseeingBuildingsThe following are listed buildings or sites in Rhineland-Palatinates Directory of Cultural Monuments:* Evangelical church, Hauptstrae 12  bipolar church, marked 1759; whole complex of buildings with graveyard* Josephs Catholic Chapel (Kapelle St. Josef), Dorfstrae 79  slate quarrystone aisleless church, 1920/1921, architect Marx, Trier; whole complex of buildings with graveyard* Hauptstrae 11  Evangelical rectory; building with half-hipped roof, partly slated framing, marked 1786, barn* Hauptstrae 28  building with hipped roof, partly slated timber framing, marked 1816, barn; whole complex of buildings* Hauptstrae 30  building with hipped mansard roof, partly slated timber framing, marked 1811, barn; whole complex of buildings* Hauptstrae 31  estate complex; timber-frame house, partly solid, hipped mansard roof, about 1900, timber-frame barn* Hauptstrae 46  building with hipped mansard roof, partly slated timber framing, early 19th century, barn, partly timber-frame; whole complex of buildings* Near Hauptstrae 48  warriors memorial 1914-1918; complex with sandstone relief slab, 1926* Hauptstrae 109  building with hipped mansard roof, partly slated, chalet style, 1922* Laubacher Strae 10  L-shaped estate; timber-frame house, plastered, 18th century, commercial wing(Directory of Cultural Monuments in Rhein-Hunsrck district)File:Kirche-Alterklz01.jpg|Hauptstrae 12: Evangelical churchFile:Alterklz08.jpg|Hauptstrae 31: estate complexFile:Kriegerdenkmal-Alterklz01.jpg| Near Hauptstrae 48: warriors memorial 1914-1918ClubsEconomy and infrastructureEstablished businessesAmong others, there are a large steel building firm, a carpentry company specializing in building conservatories, a masonry business, an inn and several agricultural businesses. On a hill east of the village stands a farm with seven turbines made by Vestas.Famous people* Sebastian Furck (about 1600-1655), 17th-century copper engraver born in AlterklzReferencesExternal links* http://www.swr.de/landesschau-rp/hierzuland/-/id100766/nid100766/did4586402/1lt509h/index.html Alterklz in the SWR programme Hierzuland de:Alterklzeo:Alterklzfr:Alterklzit:Alterklznl:Alterklzpl:Alterklzpt:Alterklzro:Alterklzru:sr:vi:Alterklzvo:Alterklzwar:Alterklz
13016280
Hahn,_Rhineland-Palatinate
Hahn is an Ortsgemeinde  a municipality belonging to a Verbandsgemeinde, a kind of collective municipality  in the Rhein-Hunsrck-Kreis (district) in Rhineland-Palatinate, Germany. It belongs to the Verbandsgemeinde of Kirchberg, whose seat is in the like-named town. The name Hahn is well known as being the name shared with Airport, which arose after 1993 from the States Air Forces Air Base once the Americans had withdrawn.GeographyLocationThe municipality lies on a ridge in the part of the Hunsrck facing the Moselle on the watershed between the Nahe and the Moselle, and also on the Hunsrckhhenstrae (Hunsrck Heights Road, a scenic road across the Hunsrck built originally as a military road on Grings orders). The Wilwersbach rises in Hahn.Neighbouring municipalitiesHistoryWithin Hahns municipal limits are traces of Roman and Frankish settlement. The placename Hahn, originally written Hagene (1120), and later also Haan, Han, Hane, and Hain, originally meant, according to the Rhenish toponym researcher Heinrich Dittmaier, wattled fence, then later enclosed dwelling place(Hagen (in Suchmaske eingeben) bei Ditmeier). In 1120, Hagene had its first documentary mention in connection with Ltzbeuren, Pnderich and Karden in a donation document made out to Mettlach Abbey(Urkundenbuch zur Geschichte der jetzt die preuischen Regierungsbezirke Trier und Koblenz bildenden mittelrheinischen Territorien, 3 Bnde; Bearb. von Heinrich Beyer, Leopold Eltester und Adam Grz; Bd. 2: 11691212, Koblenz 1865, MRUB II Nachtrag Nr. 10, ab Seite 338 auf S. 348 (ad hagene dedit pratum) (digitalisiert s. Beyer)). It was mentioned a second time about 1330 or 1335 in the Sponheim taxation register(SRegesten des Archivs der Grafen von Sponheim 10651437, Teil 15; bearbeitet von Johannes Mtsch, Landesarchivverwaltung Rheinland-Pfalz, 19871991, Teil 3, Nr. 4750). Beginning in 1794, Hahn lay under French rule. In 1815 it was assigned to the Kingdom of Prussia at the of Vienna. Since 1946, it has been part of the then newly founded state of Rhineland-Palatinate. After the World War, an air base was built on parts of the municipal area. This was converted for aviation in 1993 after the States Air Force withdrew from the base. It is now called Airport (or Flughafen Frankfurt-Hahn in German).Hahn and the airportHahn suffered for many years under the noise from military jets taking off and landing, but also benefitted from jobs at the air base and from opportunities to let properties in the surrounding area out. The latter benefit shrank sharply after the Americans withdrew from Hahn. Although civil aircraft are not quite as noisy as the air force jets were, Hahn still lies within the noise protection zone because of the 24-hour-a-day air traffic overhead, which has hindered plans to expand the village with new building developments.ReligionHahns Evangelical parish, to which the Briedeler Heck also belonged, merged on 1 January 1978 with the Evangelical parish of Wrrich, and today this is also tied administratively with the parish of Zell-Bertrich-Blankenrath and belongs to the church district of Simmern-Trarbach. Saint Michaels in Sohren tends to the Catholic communitys needs in Hahn.PoliticsMunicipal councilThe council is made up of 6 council members, who were elected by majority vote at the municipal election held on 7 June 2009, and the honorary mayor as chairman(Hahns council).MayorHahns mayor is Wolfgang Schmidt, and his deputy is Georg Kleinert(Hahns council).Coat of armsThe German blazon reads: In Blau ein goldener Schrgrechtbalken, belegt mit einem schwarzen aufsteigenden Dsenjger. Vorn drei goldene Getreidehalme mit hren und Blttern, hinten gekreuzt ein goldener Hammer und ein goldener Schlgel.The municipalitys arms might in English heraldic language be described thus: Azure a bend Or charged with a fighter jet sable, the whole between three ears of wheat with stems conjoined, leafed and couped, one stem each bendwise, palewise and bendwise sinister, and a hammer and sledge per saltire, all of the second.The field tinctures azure and Or (blue and gold) refer to the villages former allegiance to the Further of Sponheim, which between 1248 and 1437 held the lordship here, and which bore these tinctures in its arms. The fighter jet on the bend (diagonal stripe) refers to the former NATO air base at Hahn, built in 1951, but now given over to civilian use. The three ears of wheat stand for the centuries-old practice of agriculture in the municipality. The crossed mining tools stand for slate mining, which for a time was historical, but it is now once more undertaken.The arms have been borne since 4 December 1986, and were designed by Harald Kaspar, a glass artist who lived in Hahn at the time, but who has since moved to Kappel(Description and explanation of Hahns arms)(Description and explanation of Hahns arms).Culture and sightseeingBuildingsThe following are listed buildings or sites in Rhineland-Palatinates Directory of Cultural Monuments:(Directory of Cultural Monuments in Rhein-Hunsrck district)* Saint Anthonys Simultaneous Church (Simultankirche St. Antonius), An der Gass  quire, west tower, parts of the once three-naved main hall, late 13th century, Late Gothic tracery windows, spire (wooden tub), 18th century; whole complex with graveyard (see also below)* An der Gass 15  timber-frame house, hipped roof, about 1800The churchThe building worthiest of note is the little village church. Saint Anthonys Simultaneous Church has a churchtower that looks rather like a defensive structure, reckoned by dendrochronological dating to come from the time between 1350 and 1370. The nave and quire date from 1470. Two bronze bells come from 1489, according to the inscription (one bell was recast because it had cracked). In a 1508 document, the church is called a rectorate at Hahn. Before the Reformation, the church was in Sohrens care in the rural chapter of Glan in the of Mainz. Today Hahn belongs once again as a branch church to Sohren and the Diocese of Trier. The church has been since 17 May 1689 a simultaneous church and is used by both Catholics and Evangelicals. It is the second oldest simultaneous church in the Church in the Rhineland.The Evangelical territory of Palatinate-Simmern had passed after Charles IIs death without a direct heir to the Palatinate-Neuburg line, which had only a short time earlier become Catholic. The designated successor, Philip William had nevertheless promised religious freedom. After the promotion of the Catholic Church and in many cases the abolition of Evangelical parishes in the time of the Years War (known in Germany as the Pflzischer Erbfolgekrieg, or War of the Palatine Succession) with France, a settlement was reached in the 1697 of Ryswick whereby the Catholic side enjoyed support from Wilhelm, Elector Palatine. In many municipalities in the Palatinate, simultaneous churches were built. So many of them were later abolished in the course of industrialization between 1880 and 1910 that the smaller denomination in each case built its own church. This happened in neighbouring Kappel. In the little village of Hahn, however, there was no need. On the information display board before the church, there is a reference to the Gospel According to John: Damit sie alle eins seien  That they all may be one (John 17:21).Since 1980, the church has been under monumental protection. Since 1998, the municipality has been floodlighting the church at night so that it can be seen even by passing motorists on the Hunsrckhhenstrae.Regular eventsThe kermis (church consecration festival) in church patron Anthony the Greats honour is celebrated on 17 January by all Hahners as a village festival.Further reading* Landeshauptarchiv KoblenzReferencesExternal links* Municipalitys official webpage (Hunsrck)(Hunsrck)(Rhnanie-Palatinat)it:Hahn(Hunsrck)(Nadrenia-Palatynat)(Rennia-Palatinado)(Hunsrck)()()(Hunsrck)Rhein-Hunsrckvo:HahnRhineland-Palatinate
13017760
Hulluch
Hulluch is a commune in the Pas-de-Calais department in the Nord-Pas-de-Calais region of France.GeographyAn ex-coalmining town, now a farming commune, situated some  north of Lens, at the junction of the D947 and the D39 roads.HistoryThe chapter of Lens mentions Huluce in 1070 in a charter of Eustache de Boulogne.St Vaast called it Huluz in 1098, by 1136 it was written Hulut and Hullut 1180.in 1202 Huluch and Huluc. In 1303, Hulus on a seal affixed to a document and finally Hulluch from 1388, (confirmed again in 1429 by archives of Artois. It is pronounced Ooloo, as the final ch is not pronounced. The town already existed in the Gallo-Roman era. Some pottery from this period has been found while digging the basement of a house near the old Roman road. Originally inhabited by the Morins, the enemy of Caesar, it was occupied by the Franks well before the 10th century. The village was chosen as a Christian mission during the 4th and 5th centuries.  An early seigneur built a simple castle with a donjon and outbuildings surrounded by fences and ditches. Around the year 1300, it is surrounded by stone walls, battlements, towers and a drawbridge. This medieval castle was burned, along with the village, by the Flemish in 1303, then bombarded by the Spanish. The succession of battles and invasions led to its demise, unable to withstand the tests of time andwars.Rebuilt as a chateau by Baron de Bertoult, during the reign of XIV, the chateau was richly decorated and surrounded by a beautiful park.Unfortunately, the chateau was blown up by the Germans at the outset of War I, but afterwards replaced by a residential district, called Clos du Chateau to perpetuate the memory of the chateau. Hulluch was on a part of the Nord-Pas-de-Calais seam and coalmining began here in 1902 and stopped in 1978. The heaps from mining are now used to produce building materials.  Hulluch has suffered two world wars and has few ancient monuments. One can find some old buildings representing the style of the region, with bricks and clay tiles and sloping roofs. There are some farms that escaped the destruction. Some bunkers remain in peoples gardens, remnants of War I.PopulationPlaces of interest* The church of St.Laurent, rebuilt, as was most of the village, after the World War.* The War Graves Commission cemetery.See also*of the Pas-de-Calais departmentReferences* INSEE commune fileExternal links* The CWGC ST.Marys ADS cemetery* The website of the Communaupole de Lens-Livin * Hulluch on the Quid website br:Hulluchca:Hulluchceb:Hulluchde:Hulluches:Hullucheu:Hulluchfr:Hulluchit:Hulluchmg:Hulluchnl:Hulluchoc:Hulluchpms:Hulluchpl:Hulluchpt:Hulluchsimple:Hulluchuk:vi:Hulluchvo:Hulluchwar:Hulluch
13030228
Torrington,_New_South_Wales
Glen Innesthumb|Goat Rock, Torringtonthumb|Torrington Memorial HallTorrington (formerly Torington) is a small village in northern South Wales in Shire. It is 29 kilometres north west of Deepwater and south west of Tenterfield and 61 kilometres from Glen Innes (South-East). It is situated on a plateau known as the Mole Tableland in close proximity to the Queensland border on the Tablelands. A feature of Torrington is its abundance of boulders and rocky outcrops. The most notable boulder outcrop located in the village being Goat Rock. HistoryTorrington was named after its English counterpart in Devon.(Geographical Names Board of New South Wales Retrieved on 2009) The discovery of the extremely rich Torrington tin lode in 1881 created much excitement but in a very short time the small prospectors had lost control to overseas mining companies, the precursors of todays multi-nationals. In the 1920s, 500 men were employed at the mines. There were sixteen batteries working, and the community enjoyed the convenience of five general stores, butcher shop, cafes, bakery, billiard rooms, police station, post office, churches, hotel and many sporting facilities in Torrington and the two now defunct satellite villages of Tungsten and Bismuth which were both approximately 7 kilometres north and west of Torrington respectively. Today, there is scarcely any indication that either of the satellite villages ever existed.The Mole Post Office opened on 1 August 1882 and was renamed Torington in 1883 and Torrington in 1970. Bismuth Post Office was open between 1912 and 1931.()The first rural land release for grazing occurred in 1931 when a block of  north of Torrington was granted by the South Wales Department of Lands. This was followed by the general granting of further lands both north, south and west of Torrington over the next 50 years, for grazing purposes, but primarily most of the Torrington district remains in its natural state. When the government ended its tin subsidy after War II the mining industry virtually shut down.Torrington also had a saw mill which used stringybark trees taken from the surrounding heavily timbered pendant but this mill closed in the 1960s. There is still a small timber mill operating not far from Torrington on the Deepwater Road which produces hardwood timber to order. There is still intermittent commercial mining dependant upon the current prices for tin. The area has large deposits of massive topaz (silexite) which is of interest to the mining industry and to fossickers. In 1981 Torrington celebrated its centenary, and was officially classified as a village. There was a hotel in Torrington, but it shut down in January 1999 when the license was to be transferred to Sydney for the games, but with objections to the Liquor Board the Hotel was re-opened in December 2000 with a restaurant license and the original license was allowed to be transferred to Sydney. However, there was difficulty with the holding company of the freehold and the pub was permanently closed in October 2003. A Cornish Buddle and Five-Head Stamper which are relics of the old mining days can be seen at the caravan park.(Readers Digest Guide to Australian Places, Readers Digest, Sydney) The population of Torrington is approximately 85 people.DroughtsThe average rainfall over the ten years to 2000 was . After the short sharp drought of 198283, in the twenty-two-year period 1983 to 2005 there were many short droughts. For instance in October 1991 all northern New South Wales and southern Queensland were in extreme drought conditions. Again in 1994 a bad drought continued until January 1996, but worse was to come. In 2002 Torrington received  and again in 2005 it had  for the year. This drought broke in 2006.Fossicking and tourismMining has given way to fossicking and tourism and now visitors enjoy the spectacular scenery of rocky granite outcrops, steep gorges, gently flowing streams as well as fossicking for topaz, quartz and the many minerals found in the area. Unfortunately the last general store was closed some years ago but Torrington has a caravan park with caravans to rent which caters for the tourists and fossickers. Torrington State Recreation Area has more than 30,000 ha of wildlife featuring the famous Mystery Face, Thunderbolts Lookout and many other spectacular rock formations, streams and waterfalls.  The Reserve is recognized as being of State significance for conservation, mining, honey production, recreation and cultural heritage. The endangered plant, Torrington Pea (Almaleea cambagei) can be found in this area.(Torrington Pea: http://threatenedspecies.environment.nsw.gov.au/tsprofile/profile.aspx?id10041)CitationsReferences* Northern New England, Examiner, Glen Innes, n.d.* Readers Digest Guide to Australian Places, Readers Digest, Sydney
13047516
Bronze_Age_Britain
Bronze Age Britain refers to the period of history that spanned from c. 2,500 until c. 800 BC.(Adkins, Adkins and Leitch 2008. p. 64.) Lasting for approximately 1700 years, it was preceded by the era of Britain and was in turn followed by the era of Age Britain.  Being categorised as a Age, it was marked by the use of copper and then bronze by the prehistoric Britons, who used such metals to fashion tools. Britain in the Bronze Age also saw the widespread adoption of agriculture.During the British Bronze Age, large megalithic monuments similar to those from the Late Neolithic continued to be constructed or modified, including such sites as Avebury, Stonehenge and Hill. This has been described as a time when elaborate ceremonial practices emerged among some communities of subsistence agriculturalists of western Europe.(Barrett 1994. p. 05.)HistoryEarly Bronze Age (EBA), 2700-1500 BC*2700 - 2000 BC: Pleasant Phase, Early culture: ; Britain: copper+tin.*2100-1900 BC: Late Beaker: knives, tanged spearheads (Barrow; Period).*1900-1500 BC: Branwen Period; copper+tin.Middle Bronze Age (MBA), 1500-1000 BC*1500-1300 BC: Acton Park Phase: palstaves, socketed spearheads; copper+tin, also lead.*1300-1200 BC: Heath Period; rapiers.*1200-1000 BC: Early Urnfield; Phase.Late Bronze Age (LBA), 1000-700 BC*1000-900 BC: Late Urnfield: socketed axes, palstaves (also lead).*800-700 BC: Park Phase, Fawr Phase: leaf-shaped swords.DevelopmentThe Beaker culturethumb|200px|left|Extent of the Beaker cultureIn around 2700 BC a new pottery style arrived in Britain, often referred to as the culture. Beaker pottery appears in the Pleasant Phase (2700 - 2000 BC), along with flat axes and burial practices of inhumation. People of this period were also largely responsible for building many famous prehistoric sites, such as the later phases of Stonehenge along with Seahenge.Immigration brought new people to the islands from the continent. Recent tooth enamel isotope research on bodies found in early Bronze Age graves around Stonehenge indicates that at least some of the immigrants came from the area of modern Switzerland. The Beaker culture displayed different behaviours from the earlier Neolithic people and cultural change was significant. Integration is thought to have been peaceful, as many of the early henge sites were seemingly adopted by the newcomers.Also, the burial of dead (which until this period had usually been communal) became more individual. For example, whereas in the Neolithic a large cairn or barrow was used to house the dead, the Early Bronze Age saw people buried in individual barrows (also commonly known and marked on modern British Survey maps as Tumuli) or sometimes in cists covered with cairns. They were often buried with a beaker alongside the body. There is some debate amongst archaeologists as to whether the Beaker people were a race of people who migrated to Britain en masse from the continent, or whether a prestigious Beaker cultural package of goods and behaviours (which eventually spread across most of western Europe) diffused to Britains existing inhabitants through trade across tribal boundaries. Modern thinking tends towards the latter view. Alternatively, a Beaker elite may have made the migration and come to influence the native population at some level.BronzeBelieved to be of Iberian origin (modern day Spain and Portugal), part of the Beaker culture brought to Britain the skill of refining metal. At first they made items from copper, but from around 2150 BC smiths had discovered how to make bronze (which is much harder than copper) by mixing copper with a small amount of tin. With this discovery, the Age began in Britain. Over the next thousand years, bronze gradually replaced stone as the main material for tool and weapon making.Britain had large reserves of tin in the areas of Cornwall and Devon in what is now Southwest England, and thus tin mining began. By around 1600 BC, the Southwest of Britain was experiencing a trade boom as British tin was exported across Europe.Bronze-age Britons were also skilled at making ornaments from gold, and examples of these have been found in graves of the wealthy culture of Southern Britain.The greatest quantities of bronze objects found in what is now England were discovered in Cambridgeshire, where the most important finds were recovered in Isleham (more than 6500 pieces).(Hall and Coles, p. 81&ndash;88.)The earliest known metalworking building was found at Sigwells, Somerset, England. Several casting mould fragments were fitted to a Wilburton type sword held in Somerset County Museum(). They were found in association with cereal grain dated to the 12th century BC by dating.The Wessex cultureThe rich culture developed in Southern Britain at this time. The weather, previously warm and dry, became much wetter as the Bronze Age continued, forcing the population away from easily-defended sites in the hills and into the fertile valleys. Large livestock farms developed in the lowlands which appear to have contributed to economic growth and inspired increasing forest clearances.The Deverel-Rimbury cultureThe culture began to emerge in the second half of the Middle Bronze Age (c. 1400-1100 BC) to exploit the wetter conditions. Cornwall was a major source of tin for much of western Europe and copper was extracted from sites such as the Orme mine in Northern Wales.  Social groups appear to have been tribal but with growing complexity and hierarchies becoming apparent.Disruption of cultural patternsThere is evidence of a relatively large scale disruption of cultural patterns which some scholars think may indicate an invasion (or at least a migration) into Southern Great Britain around the 12th century BC. This disruption was felt far beyond Britain, even beyond Europe, as most of the great Eastern empires collapsed (or experienced severe difficulties) and the Peoples harried the entire Mediterranean basin around this time. Cremation was adopted as a burial practice, with cemeteries of urns containing cremated individuals appearing in the archaeological record. According to T. Koch and others, the Celtic languages developed during this Late Bronze Age period in an intensely trading-networked culture called the Bronze Age that included  Britain, Ireland, France, Spain and Portugal.(http://www.aber.ac.uk/aberonline/en/archive/2008/05/au7608/)()()()()()Bronze Age seafaring*Boats*Bay hoard - see also Museum*Divers unearth Bronze Age hoard off the coast of Devon*Moor Sands finds, including a remarkably well preserved and complete sword which has parallels with material from the Seine basin of northern France*3000 year old shipwreck shows European trade was thriving in Bronze AgeReferences;Notes;Footnotes;Bibliography* * * *R.F. Tylecote,  The early history of metallurgy in Europe (1987) http://www.angelfire.com/me/ik/britishBA.htmlExternal links*From Rapier to Langsax: Sword Structure in the British Isles in the Bronze and Iron Ages by Niko Silvester (1995) th:
13067848
The_Woofits
The Woofits were a series of childrens books written in the 1980s by the British television and radio personality Parkinson, best known for his TV chat shows.The stories featured the Woofits a family of anthropomorphic dog-like creatures who lived in the fictional Yorkshire mining village of Grimeworth (based on the real life Cudworth where Parkinson was born and nearby village of Grimethorpe).BooksThe four original books published in 1980 were*The Woofits Day Out*The Woofits Play Cricket*The Woofits Play Football*The Daily WoofitIn addition there were Woofit Annuals for the years 1980, 1981, 1982 and 1983.In some of the annuals the setting for the stories was moved from Grimeworth to Batley in Yorkshire where the Woofits worked at a woollen mill and were of Scottish origin.TelevisionIn 1981 Television made two series of Woofits cartoons to be shown on ITVs lunchtime slot for young children based on the original stories and new stories with Michael Parkinson narrating them.*Series 1: 6 episodes - 30 April 1981 - 04 June 1981*Series 2: 12 episodes -11 February 1982 - 29 April 1982CharactersThe main members of the Woofit family lived in 3 terraced houses along Grimeworth Street, Grimeworth these were -Number 8*Grandpa Ironside and Grandma Emily, the heads of the familyNumber 10*Uncle Athelstone, miner, gardener and bandleader of Grimeworth Colliery band*Uncle Gaylord, Athelstones brother a pools winner who considered himself posh.Number 12*John Willy Woofit, son of Ironside and coal miner and played the trombone in the brass band*Lavina, wife of John Willy*Elton, son of Lavinia and John Willy, dreamed of being a star.*Angela, sister of Elton who had ambitions to be a TV newsreader*Eltons pet dog GershwinOther characters included Baskerville Woofit (editor of the Daily Woofit), Cluff Woofit (manager of the local football team) and local policeman Sargeant Cox. Royal Institute for Deaf and Blind Children Michael Parkinson, and his wife Mary recently paid a visit to their favourite charity in Sydney, Australia, the Institute for Deaf and Blind Children (RIDBC)(RIDBC Media Release.).Parkinson has a great affection for Australia - and cricket - but many people may not realise his generous regard and support for the Institute.  Michael began supporting the Institute during his visits to Australia in the early 1980s.In 1983, he created a mascot for the Institute known as Rockie Woofit, an Australian version of his successful UK characters, The Woofits, which featured in his childrens television series and books.Rockie was an instant hit, and made numerous appearances on behalf of the Institute at public functions.Although Rockie has now retired from public appearances, his spirit lives on at the Rockie Woofit Preschool - where Michael and Mary met children with hearing impairment, and their teachers.Michael Parkinson has continued his relationship with the Institute over many years, and remains a very generous supporter of its services.(
13082098
Chloride,_Arizona
blank1_info               Chloride is a onetime silver mining camp in Mohave County, Arizona, and is considered the oldest continuously inhabited mining town in the state.() Chloride has a Code of 86431; in 2000, the population of the 86431 ZCTA was 352.() History Prospectors first located mineral resources in the area in the 1840s, including silver, gold, lead, zinc, and turquoise. Chloride was founded about 1863, but mining was not widespread until the 1870s after a treaty was signed with the Hualapai Indians. The railway from Kingman, called the and Utah Railway, was inaugurated on August 16, 1899 - the last silver spike was driven by Miss May Krider.(Arizona: Weekly Republican, Aug 17, 1899; Mohave County Miner, Kingman, Aug 19, 1899.) The town eventually grew to a peak of around 5,000 inhabitants, and at one time Chloride was the seat. By 1917 the population had fallen to 2,000, and by 1944 it was nearly a town.In the 1960s the community was briefly a counterculture magnet, with Roy Purcell, once a hippie artist, leaving behind the Chloride Murals (Roy Purcell opened his Purcell Galleries of Fine Art in 2004 in Tubac AZ and restored the Chloride Murals in 2006.) outside of town.  The Chloride Murals were restored from their 1960s condition in 2006 by the same artist, now widely known for his western etchings and other art which he refined while working as a curator for the Nevada Museum in Nevada and which were sold worldwide from nearby Vegas, Nevada casinos and shops. References  External links * Chloride Chamber of Commerce* Community website* Chloride entry from Desert USA* Photo gallery from Western Mining History(Arizona)fr:ChlorideArizona
13098539
Durham_Miners_Heritage_Centre
thumb|A pit pony pulling a coal cartThe Durham Miners Heritage Centre was a museum, now closed, run by the Durham Miners Heritage Group at Cross, Durham, England. It had a display of mining memorabilia and an exhibition of art.One of the main reasons for the display was to educate the next generation of children about the mining past of Durham and to give opportunities to research coal mining history, especially local school groups in the area and visitors to the city.The displays included mining pit lamps such as the famous lamp, tools used in the mining trade and a selection of art by former miners. A computer facility showed photographs and there was also a section of books on mining.See also* East England Mining Archive and Resource Centre* Heritage Park in the old Wales coalfieldExternal links* Durham Miners Heritage Group website
13108370
Natural_Reserve_Schlangenberg
800px|thumb|center|360 View from the Schlangenbergthumb| Schlangenberg in JanuaryThe natural reserve Schlangenberg which means snake-mountain is located in the west of Germany close to the Dutch and Belgian border. The reserve is near the village Breinigerberg, 15 kilometres from Aachen or 7 kilometres distant from the city of (Rhineland). Schlangenberg itself is a small hill peaking 276 m above sea level. The 108 hectares large area is famous for its calamine flora.   Geology The soil of the natural reserve is basically limestone which was precipitated about 400 million years ago by an ancient ocean. In the following million years geological movements carried it to the surface where erosion removed large amounts. About 200 million years ago aqueous metal solutions filled the cavernous rocks. Primary ores were created mostly consisting of Sphalerite, Marcasite and Galena. The process continued and the ore close to the surface decomposed due to the influence of dioxide and water. In this process as a secondary ore calamine ZnCO3 which is known as calamine developed. History Presumably the celts had been the first digging for the calamine in the region. Ancient celtic and roman coins dated between 100 BC and 92/93 AD as well as remains of a roman settlement proved the interest in the ore which was mostly used for weapons and vessels.The greatest interest in calamine had been in the 18. century when brass manufactures settled in (Rhineland). For the production of the alloy they needed large amounts of calamine which was melted together with copper. Before 1800 digging small reaching only surface based ore was the only technique available to the miners. In the 19. century mining changed and more than 20 adits enabled the workers to reach calamine up to 105 m below the surface. During this time the Schlangenberg-area was perforated like a Swiss cheese.  More than 700 miners worked at the mining shafts. During this time calamine was spread in the whole area and the poisonous metals zinc and lead contaminated large areas.  In 1871 the franco-prussian war stopped working on the ore fields and after an attempted restart mining was given up 1883. A renaturation of the Schlangenberg was never attempted. For many years it was even used by the military for their maneuvers.Nature regained control of the Schlangenberg and in 1990 the natural reserve Schlangenberg was founded protecting the unique calamine flora and fauna for destruction. Flora thumb| Viola calaminariaThe soil of the natural reserve contains large amounts of calamine, poisonous for most plants. Only specialist plants are able to grow under these conditions. Therefore the flora is unique to calamine and can only be found in a few other areas worldwide.The most typical plants are Viola calaminaria and Thlaspi calaminare. Many tourists visit the reserve for these flowers each year. Beside these plants other specialists found on the toxic floor are: Armeria maritima ssp. elongata, Festuca aquisgranensis, Silene vulgaris ssp. humilis or Minuartia verna ssp. hercynica. On some hidden parts of the reserve orchids like the Red Helleborine (Epipactis atrorubens) the orchid (Ophrys insectifera) and many others grow year by year.  Fauna The Schlangenberg reserve is famous for it butterflies. More the 300 different kinds had been found there. Some had specialist on calamine resistant plants Endangered locusts like e.g. the Wart-biters belong to the important animals.The austriaca which gave the Schlangenberg its name (snake-mountain) can occasionally be found in the reserve.The Woodlark, an endangered species in Germany as well as the Shrike live in the reserve in large quantities. The Biologischen Station im Kreis Aachen e. V. a governmental group of environmental specialists tries to resettle the toad.  Threats to the natural reserve Although the toxic ground prevents most plants from growing in this area some seems to be resistant to the poison. Pines would destroy most of the natural reserve within a short time and the Biologischen Station im Kreis Aachen e. V. together with volunteers spent a lot of time cutting pines and reducing their numbers.The attractive flora and fauna also causes problems as the visitors of the natural reserve destroy al lot by leaving the hiking trails.To deliver further information to the interested visitors a local group had founded a museum presenting detailed information about the Schlangenberg, its past as a mining area, exhibits of animals and flowers as well as plenty of photos. External links * Informationszentrum Schlangenberg - Natur auf Halde (in German)* Naturschutzgebiet Schlangenberg (in German)SchlangenbergserpentiumSchlangeberch
13127884
Plaza_Theatre_(Bangalore)
Plaza was a theatre located in the city of Bangalore, India. It used to be on M. G. Road in the Cantonment area. It was built in 1936 and mostly screened Hollywood movies.HistoryArcot Narrain Swamy Mudaliar was a contractor who built many buildings in Bangalore including the Attara Kacheri (the present premises of the High Court).(Now its curtains on Plaza theatre, Print edition of The Times of India, Bangalore edition, Page 3, dated 2005-03-11) From the money he earned out of it, he purchased a number of properties on M. G. Road including a . property over which the Plaza theatre was eventually built. His grandsons, A S Krishnamoorthy and Rajamanickam Velu wanted to construct a film theatre on this property, where they were formerly running a furniture business and went to Britain to understand how a great film theatre should look like.() They came back and constructed Plaza theatre in the year 1936 modeling it after the Circus in London.() The first film to be screened here was Broadway Melody in April 1936.( The theatre also had a wooden dance floor which was used by English soldiers for ball dancing.() Initial ticket prices ranged from eight annas for the front seats to 1 rupee and 12 annas for the balconys highest seat, called The Dress Circle.() The theatre also had a bar which served drinks to patrons who came to watch movies.MoviesMovies that have been screened here include Hans Christian Andersen, Court Jester, and Models and Ten Commandments. The latter ran for 44 straight weeks making it the longest running movie in the theatre.() Loads of school children were brought to the theatre to watch this movie and a special personal screening of the movie was arranged in the year 1959 for the Maharaja of Mysore, Wodeyar and his entourage.( Initially, the theatre was associated with Studios screening movies like with the wind before moving on to pictures to screen movies like Holiday, Officer and a Gentleman and the Bond movies.(ClosureThe last film that was screened here was the Fockers on March 17, 2005. The Narrain family sold the theatre since their children, all professionals,did not wish to carry on the family business. A mining investor from Bellary purchased this property and wanted to build a shopping mall in its place. However, the City Corporation refused permission to build a shopping mall. The land has since been acquired for the Metro project and will house the Plaza theatre station on the East-West Corridor route.()Notes
13147457
102.1_FM
102.1 FM may refer to:In Australia* 4ZZZ in Brisbane, Queensland* 8CCC in Springs, Northern Territory* Classic FM in Longreach, Queensland* Mildura Swan Hill in Swan Hill, Victoria* CAAMA in Yulara, Northern Territory* FM in Wangaratta, Victoria* Radio in Moree, New South Wales* J in Broken Hill, New South Wales* J in Newcastle, New South WalesIn Canada* CBGA-FM in Matane, Quebec* CBOF-FM-7 in Brockville, Ontario*  in Calgary, Alberta* CBUF-FM-1 in Chilliwack, British Columbia* CBUR-FM in Houston, British Columbia* CFEL-FM in Levis, Quebec*  in Brampton, Ontario* CFWY-FM in Whitehorse, Yukon* CHPR-FM in Hawkesbury, Ontario* CHWA-FM in Watson Lake, Yukon*  in Whistler, British Columbia* CJCY-FM in Medicine Hat, Alberta* CJDJ-FM in Saskatoon, Saskatchewan* CJGO-FM in La Sarre, Quebec* CJRW-FM in Summerside, Prince Edward Island* CJTK-FM-2 in Little Current, Ontario* CKHL-FM in High Level, Alberta* CKXR-FM-1 in Sorrento, British Columbia* CKXR-FM-3 in Sicamous, British Columbia* VF2291 in Carol Lake Mining, Newfoundland and Labrador* VOAR-5-FM in Deer Lake, Newfoundland and LabradorIn Mexico*  in Monterrey, NLIn United States*  in Prescott, Arizona* (FM) in Bozeman, Montana*  in Raymondville, Texas*  in Sardis, Mississippi*  in Roseau, Minnesota*  in Los Molinos, California*  in Driggs, Idaho* KCKC in Kansas City, Missouri*  in Oro Valley, Arizona* KCTP-LP in Pablo, Montana*  in Anchorage, Alaska*  in San Francisco, California* KDGE in Fort Worth-Dallas, Texas*  in Blanchard, Louisiana*  in Saint Paul, Minnesota* KEMR in Castle Dale, Utah* KENA-FM in Mena, Arkansas*  in Tahlequah, Oklahoma* KFZX in Gardendale, Texas* KHKC-FM in Atoka, Oklahoma*  in Twin Falls, Idaho*  in Louisiana, Missouri* KMJQ in Houston, Texas* KODC-LP in Dodge City, Kansas* KOKY in Sherwood, Arkansas*  in Alliance, Nebraska*  in Wenatchee, Washington* KPRI in Encinitas, California* KPRR in El Paso, Texas*  in Brookline, Missouri* KRKC-FM in King City, California*  in Estes Park, Colorado*  in Reno, Nevada*  in Breckenridge, Colorado*  in Elma, Washington* KTBH-FM in Kurtistown, Hawaii*  in Farmington, New Mexico* KTUI-FM in Sullivan, Missouri*  in Milford, Iowa*  in Basile, Louisiana*  in McCook, Nebraska* KZSN in Hutchinson, Kansas*  in Oglesby, Illinois*  in Meridian, Mississippi*  in Springfield, Massachusetts*  in Waverly, New York* WCRS-LP in Columbus, Ohio* WCRX-LP in Columbus, Ohio*  in Jeffersonville, New York*  in Danville, Illinois* WDOK in Cleveland, Ohio*  in Decatur, Alabama*  in Crawford, Georgia*  in Mount Vernon, Illinois*  in Lima, Ohio* WIOQ in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania*  in Albion, New York* WJMH in Reidsville, North Carolina*  in Rock Harbor, Florida* WKVZ in Dexter, Maine*  in Lawrenceburg, Kentucky* WLCT in Lafayette, Tennessee*  in Bad Axe, Michigan*  in Beattyville, Kentucky*  in Mayfield, Kentucky*  in Milwaukee, Wisconsin* WMJS-LP in Prince Frederick, Maryland* WMUK in Kalamazoo, Michigan*  in Pamplico, South Carolina*  in Sylvester, Georgia*  in Du Bois, Pennsylvania*  in Watertown, Florida*  in Lena, Illinois*  in Citronelle, Alabama* WRGR in Tupper Lake, New York*  in Forestville, Wisconsin*  in Monticello, Mississippi*  in Marietta, Ohio*  in Richmond, Virginia*  in Hampton, New Hampshire* WVXR in Randolph, Vermont*  in Santa Rosa Beach, Florida*  in Sevierville, Tennessee*  in Bolingbroke, Georgia*  in Virginia Beach, Virginia* WZAT in Savannah, Georgia*  in Phoenix, New York
13179109
TREX_search_engine
TREX is a search engine in the SAP NetWeaver integrated technology platform produced by AG. The TREX engine is a standalone component that can be used in a range of system environments but is used primarily as an integral part of such SAP products as Enterprise Portal, Knowledge Warehouse, and Business Intelligence (BI, formerly Business Information Warehouse). In SAP NetWeaver BI, the TREX engine powers the BI Accelerator, which is a plug-in appliance for enhancing the performance of analytical processing. The name TREX stands for Text Retrieval and information EXtraction, but it is not a registered trade mark of SAP and is not used in marketing collateral.Search functionsTREX supports various kinds of text search, including exact search, boolean search, wildcard search, linguistic search (grammatical variants are normalized for the index search) and fuzzy search (input strings that differ by a few letters from an index term are normalized for the index search). Result sets are ranked using term frequency-inverse document frequency (tf-idf) weighting, and results can include snippets with the search terms highlighted.TREX supports text mining and classification using a space model. Groups of documents can be classified using query based classification, example based classification, or a combination of these plus keyword management.TREX supports structured data search not only for document metadata but also for mass business data and data in SAP business objects. Indexes for structured data are implemented compactly using compression and the data can be aggregated in linear time, to enable large volumes of data to be processed entirely in memory. Recent developments include:* A join engine to join structured data from different fields in business objects* A fast update capability to write a delta index beside a main index and to merge them offline while a second delta index takes updates* A mining feature pack for advanced mathematical analysisHistoryThe first code for the engine was written in 1998 and TREX became an SAP component in 2000. The SAP NetWeaver BI Accelerator was first rolled out in 2005. As of summer 2007, the current release of TREX is SAP NW 7.01External links* SAP NetWeaver* SAP NetWeaver Business Intelligence* SAP NetWeaver Business Information Management
13208276
French_Corral,_California
footnotes                 French Corral is an unincorporated community in Nevada County, California, States,  off State Route 49 via Pleasant Valley Road, and  northwest of Nevada City. It was one of the first of several historic gold rush mining camps along the Juan Ridge.  The name was literal as the town grew around a mule corral built by the first settler in the area, a Frenchman, in 1849.()  It had a post office during the period of 1859 through 1945.()Few original structures remain besides an old Fargo Bank building.()GeographyFrench Corral is located at , and the elevation is  above level.()DemographicsIn 1880, the population was 527.()Historical landmarks* In 1877, it was the terminus of the worlds long-distance telephone line.() * The Covered Bridge is reputed by some to be the longest single-span wooden covered bridge in the world; the other leading contender is Blenheim Bridge in New York State.ReferencesExternal links* French Corral at museumca.org* French Corral at malakoff.com* Photos at of California Libraries
13220888
Robert_Livingston_Ireland,_Jr.
Robert Livingston Ireland, Jr. (February 1, 1895, died April 21, 1981) (nicknamed Liv) was a businessman from Cleveland, Ohio, States. Education Ireland was born in Cleveland and attended School in Heights, Ohio and went on to prepare for college at Taft School in Connecticut. Ireland graduated from School in Carolina in 1914. From 1914-1915 he also attended Andover Academy followed by studying mining engineering at University. Ireland left Yale during World War I and enlisted in the Naval Reserve Flying Corps.BusinessIreland had a long career with the Hanna Company founded by his father-in-law, Melville Hanna. He also had a long run with Coal Company. From 1920-1924, Ireland worked for Collieries Company, a subsidiary of Hanna Coal Company in Pennsylvania. In 1924, Ireland returned to Cleveland in and became an assistant to the general manager of SCC. He worked his way up in Hanna Coal and became manager in 1929 followed by president in 1931. When Coal Company purchased Hanna Coal, Ireland became chairman of the executive committee followed by vice-chairman of the of directors. Ireland then retired in 1966.Private lifeHe was an active civic leader and active in politics serving on the of directors of several organizations. He financially supported all the arts but disliked opera and music. His first wife and daughter Louise were great Opera enthusiasts.  They promoted and supported the Metropolitan Operas annual tour visit to Cleveland where Liv played to role of announcer bouncer at a high society reception before the opera.  A few minute prior to the start of the opera he would proceed through the reception with a loud noise maker telling everyone to head up to the auditorium.  When the group had departed, he would retreat to a small office and work.  He was a prominent figure in the local and state Republican Party and through his friend, Governor Rhodes, funding was approved for The Ireland Cancer Center at University Hospitals in his memory.(Case Western Reserve: Encyclopedia of Cleveland History)Active in civic affairs, Mr. Ireland served as president of the board of trustees of the Hawken School, Cleveland, and as a trustee of St. Timothys School, Baltimore, Md.  He was a member of the finance committee of the Day Nursery Association, chairman of the investment committee of the Visiting Nurse Association, and a member of the advisory committee on investments of the Benjamin Rose Institute, all in Cleveland. Additionally, he was a member of the board of governors of Western Reserve University, a trustee of the Cleveland Zoological Society, and chairman of the finance committee of the University Hospitals in Cleveland.  Ireland was an avid sportsman and with close friend S. Ingalls and the two co-owned two hunting plantations, Oak Plantation and Plantation in Leon County, Florida north of Tallahassee.  Ireland and Ingalls later divided the plantations with Ireland taking full ownership of Foshallee.(Paisley, Clifton, From Cotton To Quail: An Agricultural Chronicle of Leon County, Florida, 1860-1967, University of Florida Press, 1968. ISBN 13: 978-0-8130-0718-2 pp. 91-92)Ireland was a sailing enthusiast with a series of boats named Pandora (I - IV) in which he cruised the east coast of the United States and the Bahamas from his residence in Pemaquid Harbor, Maine, and Nassau Harbor Club, Bahamas.  He was a member of the Cruising Club of America and competed in the Bermuda Race many times.  While in the Bahamas his local guide was Vivian Alvin (Old Pot)Pinder of Spanish Wells, reputed to be the greatest spear fisherman in the Bahamas.Ireland married Margaret Allen Hanna in 1918 and together had four children: Mrs. Louise Humphrey, R. Livingston III, Melville H., and Kate Ireland. Margaret died October 22, 1961. He then married, Mrs. Louise Ireland Grimes in 1967. They had no children. Ireland died April 21, 1981, and is buried in View Cemetery.References(
13232596
Sentient_Information_Systems
Sentient Information Systems BV is a Dutch software provider specialized in mining. The company was founded in 2001 out of the former Sentient Machine Research (SMR) and is located in Amsterdam. Sentients flagship product is DataDetective, a data mining platform capable of analyzing information from various domains. Users of this tool include several Dutch police departments, hospitals, insurance and media companies. External links* Sentient.nl* DoelgroepDetector.nl
13242733
George_Lorenzo_Noyes
George Shavey Lorenzo Noyes (August 30, 1863  1945) was an American mineralogist, naturalist, development critic, writer and artist.BiographyNoyes was born in Maine, and was the son of Amos Oscar Noyes and Anna Chase Noyes. Since A. Oscar Noyes neglected the family as he was away much of the time attending to his business interests and civic commitments, Georges mother Anna had the most influence on him.  As a result, young George spent extended periods with his Grandfather Chase in the western mountains of Maine where he came to embrace the solitude of the Maine wilderness, rejecting formal education and organized religion.George Shavey Noyes was known as the thoreauvian of Maine. In the summer of 1890, while in Maine, George went to the nearby White Mountain artist colony in Conway, New Hampshire to pursue his interest in art and talked with some of the many artists who came there every summer. It is not known how many artists he met, but its on record that George spent the day and night at the home of Champney, the famous landscape artist.   George kept an undated journal in which he wrote his thoughts on life, God, religion, children, war, pitfalls of modern life and the spiritual beauty of nature. The writing style addressed the presence of a future reader and makes frequent use of colloquial spellings to make points. Much of his writing takes the form of allegories in which he comments on the absurdity of social norms and human folly. The 1,500-page journal was profusely illustrated with some 300 monochrome ink wash landscapes and pencil sketches, many in a chiaroscuro style, capturing atmospheric lighting conditions. These paintings, influenced by the Mountain art style, were masterfully done with confident bold strokes and surprising textural details as captured only by someone who lived close to nature. His creative work expresses his lifelong optimism and belief that nature was the divine expression of God.In the 1920s the Print Gallery of New York city had an exhibition of a number of his paintings and sketches. Although a well-known artist, due to his particular solitary wilderness life, he never pursued art as a livelihood but as a private expression of his spiritual reverence for nature. During his life he worked as a collector and operated the Noyes Mountain Quarry in Maine, known today as the Harvard Quarry. Many of the finds made there are in museums, including the Museum of Natural History Chicago. George counted among his friends and associates George R. and Howe, Bickford, Akers, Heath, Frederick Kunz, and others. In 1884 George married Belle H. Smith, they suffered the death of an infant son and had one surviving child Max. It appears that before or about 1905 George and Belle were separated. With their only child, Max serving in War I, George by his own admission writes he is again alone and orphaned to the world.    After his death in 1945, his journal and paintings were discovered and remained in a private family collection until 2007 when nearly all of the paintings and much of the manuscript was auctioned off to collectors. Sources * History of Mining in Oxford County, Maine Vol. 2 (2000) by Van King* Norway Maine Historical Society* George L. Noyes 1863-1945 Vol. 1 (1989) by Bruce B. Richards * Maines Treasure Chest (1987) by Jane Perham * American Boy (1904) by Vivian Akers * www.geocities.com/mainemininghistory/index by Van King* Pegmatite to Perhamite* Noyes Family History* photo of NoyesSee also*living
13261613
Foxdale_Railway
The Foxdale Railway was a branch line which ran from St. Johns to Foxdale() on the of Man.HistoryThe line was officially opened by the Foxdale Railway Company Ltd. (registered on ) on  allowing rail access to the lead mining workings around the village of Foxdale.  The company had close ties to the Northern Railway (MNR), many of whose directors were also on the board of the smaller company. The line was leased from the outset by the MNR.Shortly after the line had opened, the lead mining industry started to decline and in  the Foxdale company went into liquidation. The fortunes of the MNR were closely tied to the Foxdale line due to the terms of the lease being favourable to the smaller concern. Much of the MNRs freight revenue originated in Foxdale, with loaded wagons of lead being transported to the harbour in Ramsey and coal and mine supplies ferried back to the mines.The MNR operated the line on behalf of the liquidators until, following an investigation by a  Tynwald committee, the of Man Railway (IMR) took over all operations on the MNR including the Foxdale line on . The IMR was then authorised to purchase both the MNR and the Foxdale line a few months later on . Decline and closure The last lead mine in the area closed in 1911 and from then on only spoil trains and the infrequent passenger and general goods services used the line. From , tickets were no longer sold at Foxdale station, the station building being converted into a private dwelling during the 1920s. The last regular passenger train worked the branch in 1940, after which the service was replaced by buses. The line saw some troop specials during the World War as well as spoil trains and the occasional passenger service, run due to bus shortages. The last train reported to have used the branch was an engineering working in  which removed rails and other material from Foxdale to be used elsewhere on the system. The rails were finally removed during the mid-1970s and much of the route is now a designated public walkway.Today, the station building at St. Johns is still in place but now a private dwelling, similarly at the other end of the line the station is extant, but now forms part of a youth club for local children.  The stanchions of the former viaduct also remain in place and there are still some rails visible in the road at the outer terminus.The route and servicesThe line ran from an end-on junction with the MNR west of St. Johns, then passed to the north of the IMR station before curving south and crossing the IMRs line from Douglas via an overbridge (the only place where railway crossed railway on the Isle of Man) to the east of the station. The line had a fairly constant incline through Waterfall Halt, the only intermediate station, to the terminus in Upper Foxdale. The tracks extended beyond Foxdale into the mine workings area. There were at one time plans to extend the line to join with the IMRs Port Erin line at Ballasalla, but these came to nothing.The railway initially used the MNR station at St. Johns, situated to the west of the IMR station. Later, in 1886, the MNR abandoned this and built a new platform and station building on the alignment of the Foxdale Railway more closely adjacent to the IMR station. Foxdale line trains used this facility until 1927, after which trains reversed in and out of the IMR station.Upon the opening of the railway, the MNR ran some services from Ramsey to Foxdale, but passenger traffic on the line was always light and these services gave way to local shuttles between St. Johns and Foxdale. Latterly, passenger services consisted of a loco and one coach. The coach used was specifically made for the branch and survives today (see The Foxdale Coach).The MNR purchased a more powerful locomotive to work goods services over the branch and its steep gradients (see Caledonia).See also*Foxdale*Northern RailwayReferences**
13288230
Tourism_in_New_Caledonia
thumb|rightCaledonia was largely indifferent to tourists ... as long as nickel mining remained economically dominant ( Douglas, N. and Douglas, N. (1996) Tourism in the Pacific: Historical factors in Hall, C.M. and Page, S.J. (eds.) Tourism in the Pacific: Issues and Cases, London p. 31).  After the War and War, world prices for nickel collapsed (1970s) and aggressive marketing campaigns were initiated for the territory.( Douglas, N. and Douglas, N. (1996) Tourism in the Pacific: Historical factors in Hall, C.M. and Page, S.J. (eds.) Tourism in the Pacific: Issues and Cases, London pp. 65-80)Paris of the PacificCheap tourist packages were offered to Australians promising the Paris of the Pacific and visitor numbers increased from less than 5000 to 20,000 in just 5 years. (Lyons, M. (1986) The Totem and the Tricolour: A Short History of New Caledonia since 1774, New South Wales University Press: Kensington).  37,000 tourists annually took cruises (mostly from Australia) and this allowed more hotels to be built in the 1970s and, in 1979, Mediterranee arrived. (Carter, J. (ed.) (1981) Pacific Islands Yearbook, Fourteenth Edition, Pacific Publications: Sydney) The tourist market had shifted by the 1980s from Australia to Japan which became the target of many tourism campaigns. ( Douglas, N. and Douglas, N. (1996) Tourism in the Pacific: Historical factors in Hall, C.M. and Page, S.J. (eds.) Tourism in the Pacific: Issues and Cases, London pp. 65-80).By 2007,about 100 000 tourists visits each year.Notes
13308694
Isle_of_Man_Railway_stations
This article details each of the lines operated by the Isle of Man Railway, including the original line to Peel in the west, opened in 1873, followed by the Port Erin line the following year (which is still fully operational today), as well as the Manx Northern Railways line between St Johns and Ramsey and the Foxdale Railways line between St Johns and Foxdale (the latter two of which were independent companies bought out in 1905 by the Isle Of Man Railway Company.The South Line (open)The line to Erin was the second to be opened by the railway company, in 1874 one year after the shorter line to Peel had been opened.  This lines construction involved considerably more engineering work than the relatively straightforward westerly line, including two major rock cuttings on the climb out of railway station at The Nunnery and Keristal.  The story goes that the work nearly bankrupted the contractors and the second cutting was completed on a much smaller budget, resulting in it being far narrower than the first, something that is apparent when travelling today.  On the approach to Santon the line reaches its summit and the remaining outward leg of the journey is spent descending or on the flat.  The southern section runs through farmland and is dotted with several farm crossings, some of which were manned.  These are denoted by stone structures for crossing keepers which were all made redundant in 2001 with the introduction of automated barriers.  There are many smaller crossings also giving local farmers access to fields.  The principal stations on the south line which remain open today are as listed to the right; of these, Santon, Ronaldsway Halt, Ballabeg and Colby Level remain as request stops only, whilst all service trains stop at the other stations listed.  In the past there have been other request stops at Ballacostain between Soderick and Santon, which served the range utilised by pupils at the local Williams College in Castletown.  In recent years a new overbridge was installed at Meary Veg in 2001 as part of an island-wide sewerage system.  On the climb out of Douglas a farm named Lough Ned operated for a short time in the 1980s as a small wild life park and the railway served this via a ground-level platformThe Peel Line (closed)This was the first railway line to be opened on the island in 1873 and was operational continually until September 1968, with the exception of 1966 when the entire network was closed. The line is today retained as a footpath and bridleway and is 11.5 miles long. Since the rails were lifted in 1975, there has often been talk of resurrecting this line, which out of the closed lines would be the most viable.  Since closure there have been several service mains buried under the trackbed, including gas and telephone mains, but pains are always taken to ensure that the trackbed is returned in such a way that the railway could be reinstated.  There are two notable examples of this, firstly at Quarterbridge where the railway ran parallel to the T.T. course where an road was built on the trackbed in 1991, and secondly at the station of St Johns where a primary school and housing complex have been developed since 2001.  Both of these developments have been built in such a way to ensure the line could be reinstated, albeit that any station at St Johns would have to be significantly relocated.  During the First World War there was a branch extending from a mid-way point between Peel and St Johns stations to the farm of Knockaloe in connection with of war who were interned there.  The stations are listed to the right.  At the terminus of Peel a large heritage centre has been built, partly using the old goods shed and station building.  The brickworks office and water tower remain in place at the mouth of the yard and are occupied by the Manx Transport Museum Group, and the station site itself is now a car park for the heritage centre.  It would not be unfeasible however to reinstate some form of station here in the future as needs required.The North Line (closed)The line from Ramsey to St Johns was opened by the Northern Railway in 1879 and operated until 1968 when passenger operations ceased on the same day as those on the Peel line. By far the most scenic and spectacular route operated by the railway, it featured two viaducts at Wyllin and Glen Mooar and was nearly 17 miles in length.  The railway ran independently until 1905 when the of Man Railway took over operations, together with the operation of the Railway, thereby controlling the entire network on the island.  Sections of this line along the Sea coast suffered some cruel weather and a turntable was installed at St Johns to turn coaching stock to ensure even weathering on the most exposed section at the Donkey Bank which caused trouble to the operators throughout its lifetime.  Trains were often dispatched with wagonloads of ash to deposit over the side to shore up the line, and it has dropped considerably since the departure of the railway.  Further along the line at Glen Wyllin were pleasure gardens owned and operated by the railway company and these became a popular destination for Sunday School picnics in the railways heyday, this providing a large source of income for the railway.  The nearest station at Michael was the drop off point for holidaymakers who walked along a track to the side of the line.  At Ballavolley a halt was created in 1967 to serve the newly-opened Wildlife Park, which remains in place today.  The line also boasted a wayside halt for the exclusive use of the of Sodor and Mann at Bishopscourt, which comprised a simple bench seat and hand-operated signal for the stopping of the passing train.  The station at Ramsey was on the site of todays Bakery on the outskirts of the town, a disadvantage when compared with the station of the Electric Railway which is in the heart of the town.  The station did however boast an extension along the quayside for a time, ideally situated to load and unload goods to and from the vessels in this busy port.  Also, as part of an initiative to encourage the railways use for freight and cargo, a small sharply curved siding was laid to Milntown Power Station in 1968 and three wagons converted to oil carrying wagons for this purpose.  The venture was however short-lived, but trains serving this siding were some of the very last recorded trains to travel over the line, in 1969 as part of a rolling stock collection.  Today, it is difficult to visualise the station as the site has been modernised and developed beyond recognition.The Foxdale Line (closed)Opened in 1886 this was the shortest branch of the of Man Railway and the shortest-lived, closing as early as 1940 to all traffic.  It was originally a separate affair to the other railways, but was taken over as part of the merger in 1905 together with the Northern Railway to Ramsey.  The tracks remained in situ for many years and reports that trains, or light engines, travelled along its length as late as 1974 (just prior to lifting) are known.  The line was only 3 miles in length but was on a steady climb of 1 in 49 for its entirety and it served the small mining community with limited passenger services (only one passenger coach was ever acquired and this remains in service on the preserved south line today, as F.39).  The station at Foxdale itself was also the site of the iron ore deads which gave rise to the station acquiring the nickname the back of the moon owing to its lunar appearance.  Today the station building remains in place in private ownership but the removal of two vital bridges in the 1970s has rendered it extremely unlikely that any proposal to restore the line would ever be successful.See also* Isle of Man: Closed Stations on Subterraneatraenagh Raad Yiarn Vannin
13332537
DatongQinhuangdao_Railway
Daqin Railway (), also known as the Daqin Line (), is a 653 km coal-transport railway in north China.  Its name is derived from its two terminal cities, Datong, a coal mining center in Shanxi province, and Qinhuangdao, of Hebei province, on the Sea.  The railway also passes through the municipalities of Beijing and Tianjin.  Unlike most other railways in China, which are run by the Ministry of Railways, the Daqin Railway is operated by Railway Company Limited, a publicly-traded stock company. The electrified track line serves as a major conduit for moving coal produced in Shanxi, Shaanxi and Mongolia to Qinhuangdao, Chinas largest coal-exporting seaport, from there coal is shipped to south China and other countries in Asia.  The line was constructed in two phases between December 1984 and December 1992, with specifications changed from single-track to double-track during construction.(Dadong-Qinhuangdao Railway Construction Project) Design capacity was 100 million tons a year, which it reached after ten years, but continuous upgrades (wider subgrade, 75 kg/m rails, wagons with higher capacity and top speed, longer trains and stronger locomotives, radio operation and centralised traffic control, automatic train inspection) quadrupled capacity.( It carries more coal than any other railway line in China and the world.  Freight trains operating on the Daqin Line can carry up to 20,000 metric tons, the largest carrying capacity in China.( Daqin Railway starts running heavy-loading train http://tech.hebei.com.cn/node2/english/hbxw/userobject1ai425901.html)See also*energy in China*of railways in China*transport in the Peoples Republic of ChinaReferencesExternal links*Daqin Railway Company LimitedRailwayRailwayzh:
13343892
IEEE_MultiMedia
IEEE MultiMedia is a quarterly journal, published by the Computer Society and concerned with multimedia technologies. Topics of interest include image processing, video processing, audio analysis, text retrieval and understanding, data mining and analysis, and data fusion. External links * IEEE Communications Societys Digital Library* IEEE Communications Society Website* IEEE MultiMedia* IEEE Xplore information (OPAC link)* IEEE MultiMedia RSS feedMultiMedia
13364298
Milton_H._Welling
religion         Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day SaintsMilton Holmes Welling (January 25, 1876  May 28, 1947) was a U.S. Representative from Utah.Born in Farmington, Territory, Welling attended the common schools, the Saints University, and the of Utah, the last of which he received a degree from.  From 1896-1898 Welling served as a missionary for Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints (LDS Church) in the churchs Southern States Mission.(Jenson. LDS Biographical Encyclopedia, Vol. 1, p. 770)  He engaged in agricultural and mercantile pursuits and also in banking.  Starting in 1902, Welling was the president of the LDS Churchs Malad Stake headquartered in Idaho.(He was elected a member of the board of trustees of Brigham Young College, Utah, in 1906.When the Bear River Stake of the LDS Church, based in Utah was organized in 1908, Welling became its first president.(LDS Church Almanac, 2008 Edition, p. 276)  He served in this calling until 1917.(Jenson. Encyclopedic History of the Church, (Salt Lake City: Deseret News Press, 1941) p. 49)Welling served in the House of Representatives from 1911 to 1915.Welling was elected as a Democrat to the Sixty-fifth and Sixty-sixth Congresses (March 4, 1917-March 3, 1921).He did not seek renomination, but was an unsuccessful Democratic candidate for the States Senate in 1920.Welling served as director of registration for the State of Utah 1925-1928.  Welling also served as president of the Bear River Stake again from 1925-1929.(Jenson. Encyclopedic History, p. 49)Welling was elected secretary of state of Utah in 1928. He was reelected in 1932 and served until January 1, 1937. Meanwhile, he served on the Board of Trustees of State Agricultural College from 1926 to 1936 and as a Regent over the of Utah from 1928 to 1936. After fulfilling these responsibilities, Welling was appointed by Secretary of Interior Harold L. Ickes to make a survey of public grazing lands in 1937 and 1938. Later, he resumed agricultural and mining operations.In January 1943, Welling accepted war service appointment as auditor with Army Air Forces and also served with the War Assets Administration at Lake City, Utah, until his death May 28, 1947.He was interred in Fielding Cemetery, Utah.SourceReferencesH. Welling
13382428
Searles_Valley_Minerals
Searles Valley Minerals Inc. is a raw materials mining and production company based in Park, Kansas. It is owned by the Indian company Nirma.()()  It has major operations in the Valley and in Trona, California where it is the towns largest employer.()( )  The company produces borax, acid, ash, cake and salt. It also owns the Railway.(()The Trona facility extracts and ships 1.75 million tons of chemicals per year.(Searles Valley Minerals Inc. is part of Climate VISION (Voluntary Innovative Sector Initiatives: Opportunities Now), a public/private partnership which is seeking to reduce US industry gas emissions by 18 percent between 2002 and 2012.(  As it operates on government owned land, Searles Valley Minerals Inc. pays royalties of millions of dollars each year to both the federal and state governments.  Much of those royalties cover the expenses of local school districts. ().  History  The assets of what eventually became Searles Valley Minerals Inc. have a long and varied history.  Founded in 1914 as the American Trona Corporation, it began the production of potash in 1916.  After becoming the American Potash & Chemical Corporation in 1926, it began producing borax, soda ash and sodium sulfate.  Productions of these chemicals continued to expand throughout the 20th century.  In 1962 the company received nationwide recognition and an award for its innovative solvent extraction process to recover boric acidand potassium sulfate from weak brines.(After War II, the company has endured frictional labor relations with allegations that Latino workers were paid lower wages than Whites.  Since then, Latinos have been able to find equal footing and have risen to managerial positions.(In 1967, Corporation (now a subsidiary of Petroleum Corporation) acquired American Potash and Chemical Corporation and they held operations of the Searles Valley facilities until 1990.  That year the operations were purchased from capital investors D. George Harris and Associates which formed the North American Chemical Company. (Ownership changed yet again in 1998 when  IMC Global Incorporation acquired North American Chemical Company.(   The companys current incarnation was set up in 2004 when Capital Partners purchased IMC Global Incorporation and renamed it Searles Valley Minerals, Inc.((()  In November 2007, Nirma, based in Ahmedabad, India purchased the company from Sun Capital Partners.((Environmental Problems  The California Department of Fish and Game (DFG) has noted that salt toxicosis has killed over 4,000 birds in brine ponds produced by the Trona plant.  The DFG made an agreement with the company in 2005 to allow a certain number of bird deaths, if the company to paid $300,000 for a new wetlands area in the southern Owens Valley on the main migratory bird route.  ()()  There are allegations of arsenic poisoning of plant workers.()  SVM argued in a  letter to the State Water Resources Control Board, that concentration of total dissolved solids, chlorides, sodium and other minerals are higher in natural ephemeral pools than in the companys depleted brine ponds.  The Searles Lake brine is rich in arsenic, and a unique anaerobic, extremely haloalkaliphilic bacterium which uses arsenic for respiration has been isolated from the mud.(Oremland, R.,  et. al., A Microbial Arsenic Cycle in a Salt-Saturated, Extreme Environment, Science, Vol. 308. no. 5726, pp. 1305 - 1308, 27 May 2005..)References(External links*Official website
13401091
Fred_Raymond
Fred Raymond, actually Raimund Friedrich Vesely (20 April 1900 &ndash; 10 January 1954) was an Austrian composer.Raymond, born in Vienna, was the third child (after two daughters) of Vinzenz Vesely, an employee of the Austrian state railway system, and his wife Henriette, ne Dluhos. Both parents were of Czech descent. They intended their son to study mining after high school, and pursure a career in the civil service. After the premature death of both his parents, Raymond studied at a commercial academy and trained as a banker.Raymond composed operetta music as well as copious pieces for films and Schlager, which were very successful in the 1920s and 1930s and were commonly heard being sung and whistled in the streets. He became world-famous with his 1925 composition Ich hab mein Herz in Heidelberg verloren (I lost my Heart in Heidelberg), and his pieces were considered to be very much in the typical style of the 1920s, especially Ich hab das Frulein Helen baden sehn (I Saw Miss Helen Bathing) or Ich rei mir eine Wimper aus (I Lost An Eyelash). Due to a weak heart, he spent his military service with a propaganda company which served the Belgrade military transmitter. After the war, he took a short break from the Salzburg Radio Orchestra to go to Hamburg, were he finished his last two operettas, Geliebte Manuela (Beloved Manuela) and Flieder aus Wien (Lilacs from Vienna).In 1951, he moved to a new home in berlingen, where he spent three years with his young wife Eva-Maria before dying of a heart failure shortly before the birth of their son, Thomas. His marble grave is located in berlingen, on the shore of Constance, and is decorated with a lyre. To commemorate the eightieth year of his birth, a street was named after him in the Donaustadt district. Operettas * Lauf ins Glck (Run into Happiness) (1934)* Ball der Nationen (Ball of the Nations) (1935)* Fahrt ins Abenteuer (A Trip into Adventure) (1935)* Auf groer Fahrt (On a Great Voyage) (1936)* Marielu (1936)* in Blau (Blue Mask), book by Heinz Hentschke, lyrics by Gnther Schwenn (1937)* Saison in Salzburg (Salzburger Nockerln) (Season in Salzburg  Salzburg dumplings) (1938)* Die Perle von Tokaj (The Tokay Pearls) (1941)* Konfetti (Confetti) (1948)* Flieder aus Wien (Lilacs from Vienna) (1949)* Geliebte Manuela (Beloved Manuela) (1951)Films Based on Raymonds WorksWith year and director(The Complete Index To World Film since 1895):* Ich Hab mein Herz in Heidelberg verloren (1952, Neubach)* Saison in Salzburg (1961, Josef Gottlieb)* Ball der Nationen (1954, Ritter)* Una Notte con te (1932, Biancini)* Staatsanwaltin Corda (1954, Ritter)* Die Perle von Tokay (1954, Marischka)* Nur am Rhein (1930, Mack)* Mein Heidelberg, Ich kann dich nicht vergessen (1927, Bauer)* Saison in Salzburg (1952, Marischka)* Maske in Blau (1942, Martin)* Maske in Blau (1953, Jacoby)* Das Glck wohnt nebenan (1939, Marischka) Notes SourcesMuch of the content of this article comes from the corresponding German language Wikipedia article.*Lamb, Andrew. 2001. Raymond, Fred. New Grove Dictionary of Music and Musicians, ed. S. Sadie and J. Tyrrell. London: Macmillan.External links (German)* Zum 100. Geburtstag: Fred Raymond und die Operette (Happy 100th Birthday: Fred Raymond and Operetta)* Biography* List of stage works* RaymondRaymondRaymondRaymond
13430765
Distributed_search_engine
A distributed search engine is a engine where there is no central server. Unlike traditional centralized search engines, work such as crawling, data mining, indexing, and query processing is distributed among several peers in decentralized manner where there is no single point of control. History  InfraSearch In April 2000 three programmers built a prototype P2P web search engine based on Gnutella called InfraSearch.() It was meant to run inside the participating websites databases creating a P2P network that could be accessed through the InfraSearch website.()()() Opencola On May 31, 2000 Steelbridge Inc. announced development of OpenCOLA a collaborative distributive open source search engine.() It runs on the users computer and crawls the web pages and links the user puts in their opencola folder and shares resulting index over its P2P network.() YaCy On December 15, 2003 Michael Christen announced development of a P2P-based search engine, eventually named YaCy, on the online forums.()() FAROO In February 2001 Wolf Garbe published an idea of a peer-to-peer search engine,()started the Faroo prototype in 2004,() and released it in 2005.()() Wowd Some time in 2006 Borislav Agapiev started thinking about a distributed search engine.() Then on OCTOBER 20, 2009 he publicly launched Wowd.() Majestic-12 In August 2005, Majestic-12 hit version 0.1.5, with 1 billion URLs searched ()As of August 2011, Majestic-12 is at version 1.7.5, with 547 billion URLs searched () Seeks In March 2010 Emmanuel Benazera released the first implementation of the Seeks collaborative distributed search engine.()()References
13449957
Haximu_massacre
The Haximu Massacre, also known as the Yanomami Massacre, was an armed conflict in Brazil in 1993.  The conflict occurred just outside of Haximu, Brazil, near the Venezuela border, beginning in mid-June(Ferguson, R. Brian, Yanomami Warfare (USA: School of American Research, 1995), 375.) or July(Tierney, Patrick, Darkness in El Dorado (New York: W.W Norton & Company, 2000), 195.) of 1993. Approximately 16(Ferguson, R. Brian, Yanomami Warfare, 375.) Yanomami people were killed by a group of garimpeiros (gold miners who were mining the land illegally).  But, inaccurate numbers reported by various newspapers such as Globe and Mail and New York Times claimed the Yanomami death count was 73.(Vincent, Isabel. Was there a massacre in the Amazon?, The Globe and Mail, August 28, 1993, front page.)(Death in the Rain Forest, The New York Times, August 27, 1993, sec. A28.)In the first attack, the garimpeiros killed four or five young men of the Yanomami Haximu-teri. In response, the natives made two raids against the miners, killing at least two of them and wounding two more.(Ferguson, R. Brian, Yanomami Warfare, 375.) Following this raid, the garimpeiros attacked again, killing about 12 Yanomami (almost all of them were elderly, youths or infants)(Ibid., 375.) and burned down the Haximu village.(Tierney, Patrick, Darkness in El Dorado, 195.)BackgroundThis massacre was the result of tensions surrounding the 1987 rush in Brazil, with conflict between Brazilian miners and the Yanomami people. Yanomami tribe remained isolated until sometime in the 1960s when anthropologists found and studied the people.  Between 1973 and 1976 the Brazilians built the Perimetral Norte through the southern area of the natives territory.(Victor Engelbert, A Once Hidden People: The Yanomami of Brazils Amazon, World and I, May 2004, 186.) This road initiated the arrival of gold miners, which includes those that came during a gold rush beginning in 1987. Scholars studying the history of the gold rushes in Haximu noticed a recurring pattern of activities between the miners and the Yanomami, which Bruce Albert referred to as the gold mining trap.(Ferguson, R. Brian, Yanomami Warfare, 375.)  When the first few garimpeiros arrived, they provided the Yanomami with charitable gifts.  Once the number of miners increased, the balance of power was altered, and they began to consider the Yanomami nuisances.  Tensions arose when the Yanomami wanted more Western goods, such as medicine, clothes and food, which they had come to rely on after the miners arrived.  As a result, violence often arose between the groups.(Ibid., 375.)  Such a pattern may have been the reason why the miners attacked the Yanomami.Claimed causesThe specific incident that caused the garimpeiros to attack the Yanomami is uncertain and accounts vary.  A former tuxua (chief) of Haximu named Antonio claimed that the garimpeiros attacked his people after they stole a hammock from the miners.  However, it was also reported that he claimed that 20 people from his tribe were killed,(Vincent, Isabel. Everyone diedthe Yanomami want revenge, The Globe and Mail, August 28, 1993, sec. A6.) which was later proven to be false.(The specifics pertaining to this massacre are fuzzy.) Furthermore, reports by major media exaggerated the number of Yanomami who were killed, based on the account of the first Brazilian to visit the village.  He claimed at a press conference to have seen several decapitated bodies there.(Tierney, Patrick, Darkness in El Dorado, 195.) which somehow led people to believe that 73 Yanomami had died. However, due to the inability to locate the bodies,(Vincent, Isabel. Was there a massacre in the Amazon? sec. A6.) discovering later that the Yanomami burned the bodies for mourning rituals(Tierney, Patrick, Darkness in El Dorado, 195.) and interviews with survivors by Bruce Albert(Ferguson, R. Brian, Yanomami Warfare, 375.) historians and scholars have deemed this portrayal to be incorrect.See also*of massacres in BrazilReferencesde Haximu
13463456
Whitewood_mine
Whitewood is an Albertan coal mine located just north of Lake Wabamun, about sixty-five kilometres west of Edmonton, Alberta.  Owned by the TransAlta Corporation of Calgary, the mine has been run by Ltd. (Edmonton) since that company acquired the extraction contract from Coal Ltd. (Calgary) in 2003.HistoryOpened in 1962, the Whitewood mine operates on a strip model, harvesting approximately 2.8 megatonnes of coal per annum.  Most of this thermal coal is used for steam-driven power generation at the Wabamun, Sundance, and Keephills power plants, but a small amount of coal is sold to the residents of Parkland County for personal uses.GeologyDevelopment of the mining site at Whitewood and the seismic testing done there in the 1980s have allowed geologists to establish the timeframe and geologic phases associated with the formation of the mines coal bed.  Analysis has shown that there are six distinct coal seams present at Whitewood, with deposits from the late Cretaceous found at the deepest intervals, and with Early Tertiary formations found closest to the top.A few layers of bentonitic gangue appear throughout the coal, most notably a three-metre seam near the uppermost portion of the late Cretaceous zone.  Above the twenty to seventy metre thick coal-bearing deposit lies a glacial till several metres deep; this must be removed from the surface before mining of the coal below can begin.Coal extraction and usesThe Whitewood mine covers approximately 4700 hectares of slightly hilly prairie, with locales of forest and wetland interspersed throughout.  The 2800000 tonnes of coal mined there each year act as enough fuel to fulfil approximately 13% of Albertas electrical energy requirements.  As a strip-surface mine, Whitewood employs the use of heavy equipment  excavators, loaders/shovels, dumpers, and the like  to extract the coal in an efficient and cost-sensible manner.  Post-mining processing includes pulverisation, to maximise thermal yields when the coal is burnt in one of the surrounding power stations.Although the present rate of extraction would allow this sites fifty-one million tonnes of reserves to be mined for more than a decade, TransAlta has plans to cease production by 2010, the same year the company will finalise the decommissioning of its coal-fired Wabamun electrical generation facility nearby.  The company will continue mining coal at the massive mine five kilometres to the southwest; that mine produces 12.9 megatonnes of sub-bituminous coal per annum, has reserves pegged at over 200 megatonnes, and will be able to fuel the power plants now served by Whitewood, in addition to the Genesee power station.Environmental considerationsAn important part of decommissioning a mine is the reclamation process that follows.  TransAlta has made provisions for renaturalisation to continue as far as 2013, three years after the Whitewood mine is slated to close.  Already, the coal-depleted portions of the site have been subject to rebeautification, with pits being reclaimed as lakes or being filled-in with backfill.  Much of the backfill land is now lain with local subsoils and rich topsoils, which make the land suitable for agricultural use; the other parts of the reclaimed land have been made into forests and wetlands in a way that is designed to reflect the pre-mining environment.When the mine is fully out of service, the power lines, service roads, sedimentation ponds, ditches, and other mining infrastructure will be removed, and their lands reconverted to their original forms.  After the seeded vegitation takes root and grows, the mining site will hopefully show little evidence of having hosted a mine.References* * *******
13494976
CALO
CALO was an artificial intelligence project that attempted to integrate numerous AI technologies into a cognitive assistant. It started in May 2003 and went for five years, thus having ended in 2008.OverviewCALO was an Artificial Intelligence project funded by the Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency (DARPA)() under its Personalized Assistant that Learns (PAL) program. Its five-year contract brought together 300+ researchers from 25 of the top university and commercial research institutions, with the goal of building a new generation of cognitive assistants that can reason, learn from experience, be told what to do, explain what they are doing, reflect on their experience, and respond robustly to surprise. International was the lead integrator responsible for coordinating the effort to produce an assistant that can live with and learn from its users, provide value to them, and then pass a yearly evaluation that measures how well the system has learned to do its job.CALO is an acronym for Cognitive Assistant that Learns and Organizes. The name was inspired by the Latin word calonis, which means soldiers servant, a reference to OReilly in the M*A*S*H TV series.CALO FunctionsCALO assists its user with six high-level functions:# Organizing and Prioritizing Information: As the user works with email, appointments, web pages, files, and so forth, CALO uses machine learning algorithms to build a queryable model of who works on which projects, what role they play, how important they are, how documents and deliverables are related to this, etc.# Preparing Information Artifacts: CALO can help its user put together new documents such as PowerPoint presentations, leveraging learning about structure and content from previous documents accessed in the past.# Mediating Human Communications: CALO provides assistance as its user interacts with other people, both in electronic forums (e.g. email) and in physical meetings.  If given access to participate in a meeting, CALO automatically generates a meeting transcript, tracks action item assignments, detects roles of participants, and so forth.  CALO can also put together a PrepPak for a meeting containing information to read ahead of time or have at your fingertips as the meeting progresses.# Task Management: CALO can automate routine tasks for you (e.g. travel authorizations), and can be taught new procedures and task by observing and interacting with the user.# Scheduling and Reasoning in Time:  CALO can learn your preferences for when you need things done by, and help you manage your busy schedule.# Resource allocation: As part of Task management, CALO can learn to acquire new resources (electronic services and real-world people) to help get a job done.CALO EvaluationEvery year, the CALO system, after living with its user for a period of time, is given an achievement-style test of 153 administration assistant questions, primarily focused on what it has learned about the users life.  Evaluators measure how well CALOs performance on these questions improves year-over-year, and how much of CALOs performance is due to learning in the wild (new knowledge, tasks, and inferences it has been able to acquire on its own, as opposed to function or knowledge hard-wired into the system by a developer).PAL Framework(https://pal.sri.com/Plone/framework)International, a non-profit research institute in Menlo Park, California, has made available a collection of successful machine learning and reasoning technologies developed in the PAL program, primarily from the CALO project. The available technologies include both general-purpose learning methods along with more focused learning applications.The PAL software and related publications are available at the PAL Framework website.The PAL capabilities have been modularized, packaged, and adapted to industry standards to facilitate their incorporation into target applications. Various infrastructure components and APIs are available to simplify interaction with the technologies.The available technologies were developed by research teams at International, Mellon University, the of Massachusetts, the of Rochester, the for Human and Machine Cognition, State University, the of Southern California, and University.Bibliography(https://pal.sri.com/Plone/publications)In the first four years of the project, CALO-funded research has resulted in more than five hundred publications across all fields of artificial intelligence.  Here are several:* A* Based Joint Segmentation and Classification of Dialog Acts in Multiparty Meetings, Matthias Zimmermann, Yang Liu, Elizabeth Shriberg, and Andreas Stolcke. Proceedings of the IEEE Speech Recognition and Understanding Workshop, Cancun, 2005.http://www.calosystem.org/publications/abasedjointsegment.html* Active Preference Learning for Personalized Calendar Scheduling Assistance, Melinda T. Gervasio, Michael D. Moffitt, Martha E. Pollack, Joseph M. Taylor, and Tomas E. Uribe. Proceedings of the 2005 International Conference on Intelligent User Interfaces, 2005.http://www.calosystem.org/publications/activepreflearning.html* Activity recognition and abnormality detection with the switching hidden semi-Markov model, T. Duong, H. Bui, D. Phung, and S. Vekatesh. IEEE International Conference on Computer Vision and Pattern Recognition, 2005. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/activityrecognition.html* Analysis of Privacy Loss in Distributed Constraint Optimization, Rachel Greenstadt, Jonathan P. Pearce and Milind Tambe. Copyright 2006, American Association for Artificial Intelligence. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/analysisprivacyloss.html* Asimovian Multiagents: Applying Laws of Robotics to Teams of Humans and Agents, Nathan Schurr, Pradeep Varakantham, Emma Bowring, Milind Tambe, and Barbara Grosz. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/asimovianmultiagents.html* Balancing Formal and Practical Concerns in Agent Design, David Morley and Karen Myers. Proceedings of AAAI Workshop on Intelligent Agent Architectures: Combining the Strengths of Software Engineering and Cognitive Systems, 2004. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/balancingformal.html* Bibliometric Impact Measures Leveraging Topic Analysis, Gideon S. Mann, David Mimno, and Andrew McCallum. JCDL06, June 1115, 2006, Chapel Hill, North Carolina, USA. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/bibliometricimpact.html* Building an Intelligent Personal Assistant, Karen Myers. AAAI Invited Talk, July 2006.http://www.calosystem.org/publications/buildingintelligent.html* Can Modeling Redundancy In Multimodal, Multi-party Tasks Support Dynamic Learning? Edward C. Kaiser. CHI 2005 Workshop: CHI Virtuality 2005, Portland, OR., USA, April 3, 2005. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/canmodelingredundancy.html* A Case Study in Engineering a Knowledge Base for an Intelligent Personal Assistant, Vinay K. Chaudhri, Adam Cheyer, Richard Guili, Bill Jarrold, Karen Myers, and John Niekarasz. Technical Report. SRI International, 2006. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/casestudyengineering.html* A Cognitive Framework for Delegation to an Assistive User Agent, K. Myers and N. Yorke-Smith. Proceedings of AAAI 2005 Fall Symposium on Mixed-Initiative Problem Solving Assistants, Arlington, VA, November 2005. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/cognitiveframework.html* Collective Multi-Label Classification, Nadia Ghamrawi and Andrew McCallum. CIKM05, Bremen, Germany. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/collectivemultilabel.html* Composition of Conditional Random Fields for Transfer Learning, Charles Sutton and Andrew McCallum. Proceedings of HLT/EMNLP, 2005.http://www.calosystem.org/publications/compofconditional.html* Deploying a Personalized Time Management Agent, P. Berry, K. Conley, M. Gervasio, B. Peintner, T. Uribe, and N. Yorke-Smith. Proceedings of the Fifth International Joint Conference on Autonomous Agents and Multi Agent Systems (AAMAS06) Industrial Track, Hakodate, Japan, May 2006. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/deployingpersonalized.html* Design and Implementation of the CALO Query Manager, Jose-Luis Ambite, Vinay K. Chaudhri, Richard Fikes, Jessica Jenkins, Sunil Mishra, Maria Muslea, Tomas Uribe, Guizhen Yang. Innovative Applications of Artificial Intelligence, July 2006. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/designandimplement.html* Fewer Clicks and Less Frustration: Reducing the Cost of Reaching the Right Folder, X. Bao, J.Herlocker, and T. Dietterich. 2006 International Conference on Intelligent User Interfaces. 178-185. Sydney, Australia. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/fewerclicks.html* Group and Topic Discovery from Relations and Text, Xuerui Wang, Natasha Mohanty, and Andrew McCallum. LinkKDD2005 August 21, 2005, Chicago, Illinois, USA. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/grouptopicdiscovery.html* Hierarchical Hidden Markov Models with General State Hierarchy, H. Bui, D. Phung, and S. Venkatesh. Proceedings of AAAI, 2004.  http://www.calosystem.org/publications/hierarchhiddenmarkov.html* A Hybrid Learning System for Recognizing User Tasks from Desktop Activities and Email Messages, J. Shen, L. Li, T. Dietterich, and J. Herlocker. 2006 International Conference on Intelligent User Interfaces, 86-92. Sydney, Australia. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/hybridlearning.html* IRIS: Integrate. Relate. Infer. Share. Adam Cheyer, Jack Park, and Richard Giuli. Workshop on The Semantic Desktop - Next Generation Personal Information Management and Collaboration Infrastructure at the International Semantic Web Conference (ISWC2005). 6 November 2005, Galway, Ireland. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/irisintegrate.html* More Than Words Can Say: Using Prosody to Find Sentence Boundaries in Speech, Y. Liu and E. Shriberg (2006). 4th ASA/ASJ Joint Meeting Lay Language Papers. Popular version of paper IaSC2, 4th ASA/ASJ Joint Meeting, Honolulu, HI. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/morethanwords.html* Multi-Conditional Learning: Generative/Discriminative Training for Clustering and Classification, Andrew McCallum, Chris Pal, Greg Druck, and Xuerui Wang. AAAI, 2006. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/multicondlearning.html* Multi-Criteria Evaluation in User-Centric Distributed Scheduling Agents, P.M. Berry, M. Gervasio, B. Peintner, T. Uribe, and N. Yorke-Smith. AAAI Spring Symposium on Distributed Plan and Schedule Management, Mar 2006. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/multicritieriaeval.html* Online Query Relaxation via Bayesian Causal Structures Discovery, Ion Muslea and Thomas J. Lee. Proceedings of the Twentieth National Conference on Artificial Intelligence (AAAI 2005), Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, 2005. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/onlinequeryrelax.html* Populating the Semantic Web, Kristina Lerman, Cenk Gazen, Steven Minton, and Craig A. Knoblock. Proceedings of the AAAI 2004 Workshop on Advances in Text Extraction and Mining, 2004. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/populatingsemanticweb.html* A Portable Process Language, Peter E. Clark, David Morley, Vinay K. Chaudhri, and Karen L. Myers. In Workshop on the Role of Ontologies in Planning and Scheduling, Monterey, CA; June 7, 2005. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/portableprocess.html* A Probabilistic Model of Redundancy in Information Extraction, D. Downey, O. Etzioni, and S. Soderland. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/probabilisticmodel.html* Recovery from Interruptions: Knowledge Workers? Strategies, Failures and Envisioned Solutions, Simone Stumpf, Margaret Burnett, Thomas G. Dietterich, Kevin Johnsrude, Jonathan Herlocker, and Vidya Rajaram.  Institution: Oregon State University Corvallis, OR http://www.calosystem.org/publications/recoveryfrominterruptions.html* Semi-Supervised Text Classification Using EM, Kamal Nigam, Andrew McCallum, and Tom M. Mitchell. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/semisupervisedtext.html* Skeletons in the Parser: Using Shallow Parsing to Improve Deep Parsing, M. Swift, J. Allen, and D. Gildea. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/skeletonsinparser.html* The SPARK Agent Framework, David Morley and, Karen Myers. Proceedings of the Third Int. Joint Conf. on Autonomous Agents and Multi-Agent Systems (AAMAS-04), New York, NY, pp. 712719, July 2004. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/sparkagentframe.html* Speaker Overlaps and ASR Errors in Meetings: Effects Before, During, and After the Overlap, Ozgur Cetin and Elizabeth Shriberg. Proceedings of the IEEE ICASSP, Toulouse, 2006 http://www.calosystem.org/publications/speakeroverlaps.html* Task Management under Change and Uncertainty: Constraint Solving Experience with the CALO Project, P. Berry, K. Myers, T. Uribe, and N. Yorke-Smith. Proceedings of CP05 Workshop on Constraint Solving under Change and Uncertainty, Sitges, Spain, October 2005. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/taskmanagement.html* Temporal Planning with Preferences and Probabilities, R. Morris, P. Morris, Khatib, L. and N. Yorke-Smith. Proceedings of ICAPS05 Workshop on Constraint Programming for Planning and Scheduling, Monterey, CA, June 2005. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/temporalplannning.html* To Transfer or Not to Transfer, M. T. Rosenstein, Z. Marx, L. P. Kaelbling, and T. G. Dietterich. NIPS 2005 Workshop on Transfer Learning, Whistler, BC. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/totransferornot.html* Transfer Learning with an Ensemble of Background Tasks, Z. Marx, M. T. Rosenstein, L. P. Kaelbling, and T. G. Dietterich. NIPS 2005 Workshop on Transfer Learning, Whistler, BC. http://www.calosystem.org/publications/transferlearningensemble.html External links * CALO Project Homepage* DARPA PAL Program* DARPAs Cognitive System Vision* DARPAs PAL (CALO/RADAR) Framework website References 
13511796
United_States_vice-presidential_debate,_1984
As part of the 1984 United States presidential election, on October 11, 1984, the Democratic Party nominee for President of the United States, Congresswoman Ferraro, and the Republican Party nominee, incumbent Vice President H.W. Bush, participated in a televised campaign debate.  The debate was the first vice presidential debate to feature a woman and was the only vice presidential debate in the race.  It was moderated by Vanocur of News and held at the Civic Center.(The debateFerraros experienceFerraro handled a question about her experience at the debate, after being asked how her three House terms stacked up with Bushs two House terms, career as an ambassador to China and the United Nations, of Central Intelligence and four years as Vice President.  The peak of the experience battle came when, during a discussion of the administration in Iran and the administration in Lebanon, Bush said, Let me help you with the difference, Mrs. Ferraro, between Iran and the embassy in Lebanon.()  Ferraro responded to cap what New York Times termed a bristling exchange,( Let me just say first of all, that I almost resent, Vice President Bush, your patronizing attitude that you have to teach me about foreign policy.(Views on abortionAs a Catholic, Ferraro came under fire from the Catholic Church for being pro-choice on abortion, a position in conflict with Catholic moral doctrine.(Pressing the Abortion Issue, Time, September 24, 1984.) She strongly defended her position at the debate, which earned her audience applause and a respectful reply from her opponent. Bush was attacked for his change in views since 1980, his transition from pro-choice to pro-life.() Central AmericaFerraro said ,Were not moving toward a more secure area of the world, in regards to Nicaragua and Salvador, stating that both Sandinista soldiers levels and Soviet and Cuban advisors levels had increased during the Reagan years.  She also criticized the mining of the harbors in Nicaragua as a violation of international law.(Voting Rights ActWhen Ferraro criticized Reagans actions of refusing to support, and later signing, the Rights Act the moderator, Sander Vancour, cut her off in order to ask the enthusiastically applauding audience to calm down.AftermathThe result was proclaimed mostly even by newspapers, television, other media, and historians.( pp. 785ff.)( p. 966.)  Women voters tended to think Ferraro had won, while men, Bush.( pp. 103, 107108.)  Some media, however, either declared Bush or Ferraro the winner. The candidates were praised, both, for their ability to debate.An open microphone caught Bush bragging that he had kicked a little ass following the debate.References
13524938
Ken_Domon
 website         is one of the most renowned Japanese photographers of the twentieth century.(Nihon shashinka jiten () / 328 Outstanding Japanese Photographers. Kyoto: Tanksha, 2000. ISBN 4-473-01750-8) He is most celebrated as a photojournalist, though he may have been most prolific as a photographer of Buddhist temples and statuary.Domon was born in Sakata, Prefecture,() and, as a young man, was deeply influenced by the philosophical writings of Watsuji.(Watanabe (1998), p. 4.) He studied law at University, but was expelled from the school due to his participation in radical politics.() He moved from painting to portrait photography, and obtained a position with Kotaro Miyauchi Photo Studio in 1933.( In 1935 he joined Kb to work on its magazine Nippon. Four years later he moved to Bunka Shinkkai, a national propaganda organization;( like Kimura and many other notable Japanese photographers, he helped the war effort.With the end of the war, Domon became independent and documented the aftermath of the war, focusing on society and the lives of ordinary people.( He became known as a proponent of realism in photography, which he described as, an absolute snapshot that is absolutely not dramatic.( He was a prolific contributor to photographic magazines, revived or started afresh through the early 1950s. With Kimura, Hamaya and others, he rejected posed and other artful photographs; in his polemics in the photographic magazines, Domon was the most forceful exponent of this view. He famously defined his goal as the direct connection between camera and motif.(Among Domons most powerful images are those taken in the first decade or so after the war, particularly those of the survivors of the atomic bombing of Hiroshima, the life and particularly the children in a poor coal-mining community in Chikuh, Kysh), and the improvised play of children in Kt, Tokyo.In 1958 Domon was awarded the Mainichi Photography Award and the Photographer of the Year Award from the Japan Photo Critics Association. He was given the Award of Arts award from the Ministry of Education in 1959 and the Japan Journalists Congress Award in 1960.( Domon suffered strokes in 1960 and 1968,( which eventually prevented him from holding a camera and confined him to a wheelchair. This did not deter him from photography, and in documenting the traditional culture of Japan.( He traveled energetically around the country, photographing its Buddhist temples in what would become an imposing series of luxuriously produced books. In 1963 he began work on the major work of his life, Koji junrei (1963-1975).( Concerning his photographs of Japans traditional culture, Domon wrote, I am involved with the social realities of today, at the same time that I am involved with the traditions and classical culture of Nara and Kyoto, and these two involvements are linked by their common search for the point in which they are related to the fate of the people, the anger, the sadness, the joys of the Japanese people.(Domon, Ken. Demo shuzai to koji junrei shooting and pilgrimage to ancient temples, Shimbun, 11 March 1968. quoted in Watanabe (1998), p. 4.)Domons method of photographing these temples was to stay at the location for a time before taking the first photo. He would then begin photographing based not on a systematic, scholarly approach to the subject, but based on how his feelings towards the subjects moved him to record them.(Watanabe (1998), pp. 4-5.) Domon prefaced the first volume of Koji Junrei with, This is thus intended as a beloved book, a book which allows the individual Japanese to reconfirm the culture, the people which formed them.(Watanabe (1998), p. 5.)In 1976 Domon was completely incapacitated by a third stroke, and he died in Tokyo on 15 September 1990.( In 1981 Mainichi Newspapers established the annual Ken Award in celebration of the 110th birthday of the Shimbun; two years later, the Ken Photography Museum was opened in Sakata.Books by Domon*Nihon no chkoku (). Tokyo: Bijutsushuppansha, 1952.**2. Asuka jidai ().**5. Heian jidai ().*Fb (). Tokyo: Ars, 1953.*Murji (). Tokyo: Bijutsushuppansha, 1955.*The Muro-ji, an eighth century Japanese temple: Its art and history. Tokyo: Bijutsu Shuppansha, c. 1954. Text by Andrew Miller.*With . Gendai geijutsu kza ( ). 1956.*Murji (). Tokyo: Bijutsushuppansha, 1957.*Domon Ken sakuhinsh (). Gendai Nihon shashin zensh 2. , 1958.*Hiroshima () / Hiroshima. , 1958.*Chsonji (). Nihon no Tera 4. Tokyo: Bijutsushuppansha, 1959.*Saihji, Ryanji (). Nihon no tera 10. Tokyo: Bijutsushuppansha, 1959.*Chikuh no kodomotachi: Ken Domon shashinsh (). Patoria Shoten, 1960. , 1977.*Chikuh no kodomotachi: Ken Domon shashinsh. Zoku: Rumie-chan ha otsan ga shinda ( ). Patoria Shoten, 1960.*Hryji (). Nihon no Tera 6. Tokyo: Bijutsushuppansha, 1961.*Murji (). Nihon no Tera 13. Tokyo: Bijutsushuppansha, 1961.*Kyto (). Nihon no Tera. Tokyo: Bijutsushuppansha, 1961.*Nara (). Nihon no Tera. Tokyo: Bijutsushuppansha, 1961.* Masterpieces of Japanese sculpture Tokyo: Bijutsuhuppansha; Rutland, Vt.: Tuttle, 1961. Text by J. E. Kidder.*Kasuga (). Nihon no Yashiro 4. Tokyo: Bijutsushuppansha, 1962.*Koji junrei (). 5 vols. Tokyo: Bijutsushuppansha, 1963&ndash;75. International edition (with English texts added to the Japanese): A Pilgrimage to Ancient Temples. Tokyo: Bijutsushuppansha, 1980.*Tji: Daishinomitera (: ). Tokyo: Bijutsushuppansha, 1965.*Shigaraki tsubo (). Tokyo: Chnichi Shinbun Shuppankyoku, 1965.*Sf; his boundless world of flowers and form. Tokyo: Kodansha International, 1966. Text by Sfu.*Nihonjin no genz (). Tokyo: Heibonsha, 1966.*Yakushiji (). Tokyo: Mainichi Shinbunsha, 1971.*Bunraku (). Kyoto: Shinshind, 1972.*Tdaiji (). Tokyo: Heibonsha, 1973.* Nihon meishden (). Kyoto: Shinshind, 1974. Portraits of the famous, mostly in color.*Koy henreki (). Tokyo: Yarai Shoin, 1974.*Shinu koto to ikiru koto (). , 1974.* Watakushi no bigaku (, My aesthetics). Kyoto: Shinshind, 1975. Domon photographs Japanese arts and architecture (in both black and white and color), and writes commentary on these.*Nihon no bi (). Nishinomiya: It Hamu Eiy Shokuhin, 1978.*Shashin hihy (). Daviddosha, 1978.*Nyoninkya Murji (). Tokyo: Bijutsushuppansha, 1978.* Fkei (). Tokyo: Yarai Shoin, 1976. Popular edition, Tokyo: Yarai Shoin, 1978.*Gendai chkoku: Chkoku no Mori Bijutsukan korekushon (: ) / Sculptures modernes: Collection de The  Hakone Open-air Museum. Tokyo: Sankei Shinbunsha, 1979. With some French as well as Japanese text.*Shashin zuihitsu (). Tokyo: Daviddosha, 1979.*Domon Ken Nihon no Chkoku(). Tokyo: Bijutsushuppansha.**1. Asuka, Nara (). 1979.**2. Heian zenki (). 1980.**3. Heian kki, Kamakura (). 1980.*Domon Ken: Sono shi no shgen (). Tokyo: Asahi Sonorama, 1980.*Nihon no bien (). Gendai Nihon Shashin Zensh 7. Tokyo: Sheisha, 1980.*Domon Ken Nihon no kotji: Tanba, Imari, Karatsu, Eshino, Oribe, Tokoname, Atsumi, Shigaraki, Kutani, Bizen (). Tokyo: Bijutsushuppansha, 1981.* Domon Ken (). Shwa Shashin Zenshigoto 5. Tokyo: Asahi Shuppansha, 1982. A survey of Domons work.*Domon Ken zensh (). Tokyo: Shgakukan.**1. Koji junrei 1 Yamato-hen j ( 1  ). 1983. ISBN 4-09-559001-7.**2. Koji junrei 2 Yamato-hen ge ( 2  ). 1984. ISBN 4-09-559002-5.**3. Koji junrei 3 Kyto-hen (). ISBN 4-09-559003-3.**4. Koji junrei 4 Zenkoku-hen ( 4 ). 1984. ISBN 	4-09-559004-1.**5. Nyonin Kya Muroji (). 1984. ISBN 4-09-559005-X.**6. Bunraku (). 1985. ISBN 4-09-559006-8.**7. Dent no katachi (). 1984. ISBN 4-09-559007-6.**8. Nihon no fkei (). 1984. ISBN 4-09-559008-4.**9. Fb (). 1984. ISBN 4-09-559009-2.**10. Hiroshima (). 1985. ISBN 4-09-559010-6.**11. Chikuh no kodomotachi (). 1985. ISBN 4-09-559011-4.**12. Kessakusen j ( ). 1985. ISBN 4-09-559012-2.**13. Kessakusen ge ( ). 1985. ISBN 4-09-559013-0.*Domon Ken no koji junrei (). Tokyo: Shgakukan, 1989&ndash;90.**1. Yamato 1 (1). 1989. ISBN 4-09-559101-3.**2. Yamato 2 (2). 1990. ISBN 4-09-559102-1.**3. Kyto 1. (1). 1989. ISBN 4-09-559103-X.**4. Kyto 2. (2). 1990. ISBN 4-09-559104-8.**5. Murji (). 1990. ISBN 4-09-559105-6.**Bessatsu 1. Higashi Nihon (). 1990. ISBN 4-09-559106-4.**Bessatsu 2. Nishi Nihon (). 1990. ISBN 4-09-559107-2.*Domon Ken Nihon no butsuz (). Tokyo: Shgakukan, 1992. ISBN 4-09-699421-9.*Murji (). Nihon Meikenchiku Shashinsensh 1. Tokyo: Shinchsha, 1992. ISBN 4-10-602620-1.*Domon Ken no Shwa (). Tokyo: Shgakukan, 1995.**1. Fb (). ISBN 4-09-559201-X.**2. Kodomotachi (). ISBN 4-09-559202-8.**3. Nihon no fkei (). ISBN 4-09-559203-6.**4. Dokyumento Nihon	1935&ndash;1967 ( 1935&ndash;1967). ISBN 4-09-559204-4.**5. Nihon no butsuz (). ISBN 4-09-559205-2.*Koji junrei (). Tokyo: Mainichi Shinbunsha, c1995.*Domon Ken Koji Junrei (). Tokyo: Bijutsu Shuppansha, 1996. ISBN 4-568-12056-X. *Shashin to jinsei: Domon Ken esseish (). Djidai Raiburar. Tokyo: Iwanami, 1997.* Domon Ken (). Nihon no Shashinka. Tokyo: Iwanami, 1998. ISBN 4-00-008356-2.*Koji junrei (). Tokyo: Shgakukan, 1998. ISBN 4-09-681151-3.*  Tokyo: Shgakukan, 1999. ISBN 4-09-681152-1.*Domon Ken kott no bigaku (). Korona Bukkusu 69. Tokyo: Heibonsha, 1999. ISBN 4-582-63366-8. *Domon Ken no tsutaetakatta Nihon () Tokyo: Mainichi Shuppansha, 2000. ISBN 4-620-60559-X. *Domon Ken Nihon no chkoku ( Tokyo: Mainichi Shinbunsha, c2000. Exhibition catalogue. *Kengan (). Tokyo: Sekai Bunkasha, 2001. ISBN 4-418-01521-3.*Kenshin (). Tokyo: Sekai Bunkasha, 2001. ISBN 4-418-01522-1.*Kenkon (). Tokyo: Sekai Bunkasha, 2002. ISBN 4-418-02509-X.* /  to Serekushon. Tokyo: Shgakukan, 2003.*Domon Ken tsuyoku utsukushii mono: Nihon bitanb () Shgakukan Bunko. Tokyo: Shgakukan, 2003. ISBN 4-09-411426-2. Books with works by Domon*Association to Establish the Japan Peace Museum, ed. Ginza to sens () / Ginza and the War. Tokyo: Atelier for Peace, 1986. ISBN 4-938365-04-9. Domon is one of ten photographers &mdash; the others are Hayashi, Hayashi, Ishikawa, Kageyama, Kikuchi, Kimura, Morooka, ki, and Sekiguchi &mdash; who provide 340 photographs for this well-illustrated and large photographic history of Ginza from 1937 to 1947. Captions and text in both Japanese and English.*(Joint work) Bunshi no shz hyakujnin (, Portraits of 110 literati). Tokyo: Asahi Shinbunsha, 1990. ISBN 4-02-258466-1. Domon is one of five photographers &mdash; the others are Akiyama, Hamaya, Kimura and Hayashi. *Kaku: Hangenki () / The Half Life of Awareness: Photographs of Hiroshima and Nagasaki. Tokyo: Tokyo Metropolitan Museum of Photography, 1995.  Exhibition catalogue; captions and text in both Japanese and English. There are 12 pages of photographs taken by Domon in 1957 and 1967 of Hiroshima, particularly of medical treatment; (other works are by Fukada, Fukushima, Hayashi, Ishiguro, Kikuchi, Kishida, Matsumoto, Matsushige, Tmatsu, Tsuchida and Yamahata). Text and captions in both Japanese and English.* Mishima Yasushi (). Kimura Ihee to Domon Ken: Shashin to sono shgai (, Ihei Kimura and Ken Domon: Photography and biography). Tokyo: Heibonsha, 1995. ISBN 4-582-23107-1. Reprint. Heibonsha Library. Tokyo: Heibonsha, 2004. ISBN 4-582-76488-6. *Dokyumentar no jidai: Natori Ynosuke, Kimura Ihee, Domon Ken, Miki Jun no shashin kara ( ) / The Documentary Age: Photographs by Natori Younosuke, Kimura Ihei, Domon Ken, and Miki Jun. Tokyo: Tokyo Metropolitan Museum of Photography, 2001. An exhibition catalogue. Captions in both Japanese and English, other text in Japanese only.*Hiraki, Osamu, and Keiichi Takeuchi. Japan, a Self-Portrait: Photographs 1945&ndash;1964. Paris: Flammarion, 2004. ISBN 2-08-030463-1. Domon is one of eleven photographers whose works appear in this large book (the others are Hamaya, Hayashi, Hosoe, Ishimoto, Kawada, Kimura, Nagano, Narahara, Tanuma, and Tmatsu).*Kindai shashin no umi no oya: Kimura Ihee to Domon Ken () / Kimura Ihei and Domon Ken. Tokyo: Asahi Shinbunsha and Mainichi Shinbunsha, 2004. Catalogue of an exhibition. * Sengo shashin / Saisei to tenkai () / Twelve Photographers in Japan, 1945&ndash;55. Yamaguchi: Yamaguchi Prefectural Museum of Art, 1990.  Despite the alternative title in English, almost exclusively in Japanese (although each of the twelve has a potted chronology in English). Catalogue of an exhibition held at Prefectural Museum of Art. Twenty of Domons photographs of children in Tokyo appear on pp. 18&ndash;28.*Szarkowski, John, and Yamagishi. New Japanese Photography. New York: Museum of Modern Art, 1974. ISBN 0-87070-503-2 (hard), ISBN 0-87070-503-2 (paper).Books on Domon*Satake Makoto (). Sakashiranami no hito: Domon Ken no shgai (). Tokyo: Shgakukan, 2003. ISBN 4-09-607015-7.Notes(External links* Domon Ken Photography Museum in the Sakata municipal site * Domon Ken Photography Museum requires Javascript and Flash *Ono, Philbert. Domon Ken.*Ono, Philbert. Review of Domon Ken no tsutaetakatta Nihon.Further reading* DomonDomonja:
13536507
Patrick_Durack
Patrick Durack (March 1834 &ndash; 20 January 1893) was a pastoral pioneer.(   )  His family were struggling tenant farmers from Magherareagh near Scarriff in County Clare, Ireland who moved from Ireland to South Wales in 1853. Two months after arriving in New South Wales, his father, Michael was accidentally killed. He settled his mother and siblings, and moved to Victoria, he returned 18 months later with 1000.(On the 31 July 1862 he married Mary Costello, only daughter of Michael Costello, a native of Co. Tipperary and his wife Mary Tully, a native of Co. Galway. Patrick and Mary had eight children (two of whom died in infancy), including Durack. Goulburn provided insufficient outlets for Duracks energy, land hunger and organizing powers. Along with his brother Michael and brother-in-law John Costello, they set out to establish a property in South-west Queensland in 1863. Drought conditions almost killed the men, but they continued around the country pegging claims to some 17,000 square miles.(Durack and his brother Michael trekked across the north of the continent from their property on Creek in Queensland which they left from in 1879 along with 7250 breeding cattle and 200 horses to the Kimberley region of Australia near Kununurra where they arrived in 1882. The  journey of cattle to stock Downs and Station is the longest of its type ever recorded.()In 1885, he retired to Brisbane. Later that year he purchased gold-crushing machinery from Sydney and began mining on the Kimberley goldfields. In 1889 he learned that financial disaster had overtaken his Queensland interests. He died in  Fremantle on 20 January 1893.( References External links* Australian dictionary of Biography Online
13547957
No_Holdin_Back
 rev1score   ()No Holdin Back is the title of American music singer Traviss fifth album. It was released on September 26, 1989, by Bros. Records Nashville. Three singles were released from it, all of which charted on the Country Songs charts: the Number One hits Its Just a Matter of Time and Hard Rock Bottom of Your Heart, as well as the #2 hit He Walked on Water. Its Just a Matter of Time was previously a Number One hit for Benton in 1959 on the R&B charts, and for James in 1970 on the country charts. Glen Campbell also had a #7-peaking rendition of the song in 1986. The track Somewhere in My Broken Heart was co-written by Dean, who would later cut it for his 1990 album Young Man and release it as that albums second single. Also included is a cover of Singing the Blues, a song originally recorded by Robbins.Track listing# Mining For Coal (Berg, Ronnie Samoset) - 3:08# the Blues (Melvin Endsley) - 2:19# When Your World Was Turning for Me (Frazier, A. L. Doodle Owens) - 2:40# Walked on Water (Shamblin) - 3:28# No Stoppin Us Now (Randy Travis) - 3:05# Its Just a Matter of Time (Benton, Belford Hendricks, Otis) - 3:59# Card Carryin Fool (Hill, Tim Bays) - 2:27# in My Broken Heart (Dean, Richard Leigh) - 3:16# Rock Bottom of Your Heart (Prestwood) - 4:06# Have a Nice Rest of Your Life (Verlon Thompson, D. Sanders) - 3:24Personnel*Eddie Bayers - drums on No Stoppin Us Now*Dennis Burnside - piano*Larry Byrom - guitar*Mark Casstevens - acoustic guitar*Douglas - Dobro*Fleck - banjo on Hard Rock Bottom of Your Heart*Steve Gibson - guitar, electric 12-string guitar*Doyle Grisham - guitar*Hungate - guitar*John Jarvis - piano*Kirk Jelly Roll Johnson - harmonica on He Walked on Water*Paul Leim - drums*Steve Lindsey - synthesizer and Synthesizer on Its Just a Matter of Time*Londin - drums*Terry McMillan - harmonica, percussion*Mason - electric guitar*OConnor - fiddle*Parks - guitar solo on Its Just a Matter of Time*Tom Roady - percussion*Pig Robbins - piano*Billy Joe Walker, Jr. - electric guitar*Jack Williams - bass guitarChart performanceReferences
13561682
Kinzua_Bridge
 commons  Kinzua BridgeThe Kinzua Bridge or the Kinzua Viaduct (() or ) was a railroad trestle that spanned Creek in McKean County in the state of Pennsylvania. The bridge was  tall and  long prior to its collapse in 2003.The bridge was originally built from iron in 1882 and was billed as the Wonder of the World, holding the record as the tallest railroad bridge in the world for two years. In 1900 the bridge was dismantled and simultaneously rebuilt out of steel to allow it to accommodate heavier trains. It stayed in commercial service until 1959 and was sold to the of Pennsylvania in 1963, becoming the centerpiece of a state park. Restoration of the bridge began in 2002, but before it was finished, a tornado struck the bridge in 2003 causing a large portion of the bridge to collapse. Corroded anchor bolts holding the bridge to its foundations failed, contributing to the collapse.Before its collapse, the Kinzua Bridge was ranked as the fourth-tallest railway bridge in the United States.() It was listed on the Register of Historic Places in 1977 and as a National Historic Civil Engineering Landmark in 1982. The ruins of the Kinzua Bridge are in Bridge State Park off U.S. Route 6 near the borough of Jewett, Pennsylvania.ConstructionIn 1882, L. Kane, president of the York, Lake Erie and Western Railway (NYLE&W), was faced with the challenge of building a line off the main line in Pennsylvania, from Bradford south to the coal fields in Elk County.()() The fastest way to do so was to build a bridge to cross the Kinzua Valley. The only other alternative to building a bridge would have been to lay an additional  of track over rough terrain.( When built, the bridge was larger than any that had been attempted, and over twice as large as the largest similar structure: the Portage Bridge over the River in New York.(The first Kinzua Bridge was built by a crew of 40 from  of iron in just 94 working days, between May 10 and August 29, 1882.()(() The reason for the short construction time was that scaffolding was not used in the bridges construction; instead a gin pole was used to build the first tower, then a traveling crane was built atop it and used in building the second tower.(( The process was then repeated across all 20 towers.(The bridge was designed by the engineer Chanute and was built by the Iron Works, which specialized in producing patented, hollow iron tubes called Phoenix columns.( Because of the design of these columns, it was often mistakenly believed that the bridge had been built out of wooden poles.( The bridges 110 sandstone masonry piers were quarried from the hillside used for the foundation of the bridge.(( The tallest tower had a base that was  wide.( The bridge was designed to support a load of ,( and cost US$167,000 (or $ in  dollars).(()On completion, the bridge was the tallest and longest railroad bridge in the world and was advertised as the Eighth Wonder of the World.(() Six of the bridges 20 towers were taller than the Bridge.( Excursion trains from as far away as New York, and Pittsburgh would come just to cross the Kinzua Bridge,( which held the height record until the Garabit Viaduct,  tall, was completed in France in 1884.() Trains crossing the bridge were restricted to a speed of  because the locomotive, and sometimes the wind, caused the bridge to vibrate.( People sometimes visited the bridge in hopes of finding the loot of a bank robber, who supposedly hid $40,000 in gold and currency under or near it.((Reconstruction and useIn 1893 the NYLE&W went bankrupt and was merged with the Railroad, which became the owner of the bridge.( By the start of the 20th century, locomotives were almost 85 percent heavier, and the iron bridge could no longer safely carry trains.( The last traffic crossed the old bridge on May 14, 1900, and removal of the old iron began on May 24. Construction on the new steel bridge began on May 26, starting from both ends. Two Howe Truss timber travelers, each  long and  deep, were used to build the new bridge.( Each traveler was supported by two of the original towers on the opposite sides of a third original tower that was to be demolished. After the middle tower had been removed, construction of a new steel replacement tower and the spans adjoining it took one week. Then the traveler would move, and the next tower would be taken down and replaced.()The new bridge was designed by C.R. Grimm and was built by the Elmira Bridge Company out of  of steel.( A crew of between 100 and 150 worked 10-hour days for four months to complete the steel frame by September 6, and the bridge reopened to traffic on September 25, 1900.(( Once rebuilt, the $275,000 bridge was able to safely accommodate one of the largest steam locomotives in the world, the  Big Boy.(() The bolts used to hold the towers to the anchor blocks were reused from the first bridge, which played a major role in the bridges demise. Some of the anchor bolts were also extended with tap bolts and threaded sleeves.() Grimm later admitted that the bolts should have been replaced.() The Erie Railroad maintained a station at the Kinzua Viaduct. Constructed between 1911 and 1916,() the station was not manned by an agent.() The station was gone between 1923 and 1927.()()American Engineering Record (HAER) photo of the bridge in July 1971|altA black and white aerial photo of a bridge crossing a valleyTrain crews would sometimes play a trick on a brakeman on his first journey on the line. When the train was a short distance from the bridge, the crew would send the brakeman over the rooftops of the cars to check on a small supposed problem. As the train crossed the bridge, the rookie suddenly found himself terrified, staring down three hundred feet m from the roof of a rocking boxcar.( Even after being reconstructed the bridge still had a speed limit of . As the bridge aged, heavy trains pulled by two steam locomotives had to stop so the engines could cross the bridge one at a time. Diesel locomotives were lighter and did not face this limit; the bridge was last used by a steam engine on October 5, 1950.(The Erie Railroad obtained trackage rights on the nearby and Ohio Railroad (B&O) line in the late 1950s, which allowed it to bypass the aging Kinzua Bridge. Regular commercial service ended on June 21, 1959, and the Erie sold the bridge to the Kovalchick Salvage Company of Pennsylvania, for $76,000.( The bridge was reopened for one day in October 1959 when a wreck on the B&O line forced trains to be rerouted across the bridge.( According to the Society of Civil Engineers, the Kinzua Bridge was a critical structure in facilitating the transport of coal from Northwestern Pennsylvania to the Eastern Great Lakes region, and is credited with causing an increase in coal mining that led to significant economic growth.(State parkNick Kovalchick, the owner of the salvage company, could not bear to dismantle the bridge. On seeing it for the first time he is supposed to have said There will never be another bridge like this.() Kovalchick worked with local groups who wanted to save the structure, and Pennsylvania Governor Scranton signed a bill into law on August 12, 1963, to purchase the bridge and nearby land for $50,000 and create Kinzua Bridge State Park.(() The deed for the parks  was recorded on January 20, 1965, and the park was opened to the public in 1970.(An access road to the park was built in 1974, and new facilities there included a parking lot, drinking water and toilets, and installation of a fence on the bridge deck.( There was an official cutting ceremony on July 5, 1975, for the park, which was and is unique in the park system since its centerpiece is a man-made structure.( The bridge was listed on the Register of Historic Places on August 29, 1977,() and was named to the National Register of Historic Civil Engineering Landmarks on June 26, 1982.(The and Kane Railroad (KKRR) operated sightseeing trips from Kane through the National Forest and over the Kinzua Bridge from 1987 until the bridge was closed in 2002.( In 1988 it operated the longest steam train excursion in the United States, a  round trip to the bridge from the village of Marienville in Forest County, with a stop in Kane. New York Times described being on the bridge as more akin to ballooning than railroading and noted You stare straight out with nothing between you and an immense sea of verdure a hundred yards m below.() The railroad still operated excursions through the forest and stopped at the bridges western approach until October 2004.()As of 2009, Kinzua Bridge State Park is a  Pennsylvania state park surrounding the bridge and the Kinzua Valley. The park is located off of U.S. Route 6 north of Mount Jewett in Hamlin and Keating Townships. A scenic overlook within the park allows views of the fallen bridge and of the valley, and is also a prime location to view the fall foliage during the first two weeks of October. The park has a shaded picnic area with a centrally located modern restroom.( Prior to the bridges collapse, visitors were allowed on or under the bridge and hiking was allowed in the valley around the bridge.( In September 2002 the bridge was closed even to pedestrian traffic.( About  of Kinzua Bridge State Park are open to hunting. Common game species are turkey, bear and deer.(DestructionOn July 21, 2003, a tornado struck the Kinzua Bridge, snapping and uprooting nearby trees, as well as causing 11 of the 20 bridge towers to collapse. There were no human deaths or injuries. The tornado was produced by a convective system (MCS), a complex of strong thunderstorms, that had formed over an area that included eastern Ohio, western Pennsylvania, western New York, and southern Ontario.() The MCS traveled east at around . As the MCS crossed northwestern Pennsylvania, it formed into a distinctive comma shape. The northern portion of the MCS contained a long-lived mesocyclone, a thunderstorm with a rotating updraft that is often conducive to tornados.()At approximately 15:20 EDT (20:20 UTC), the tornado touched down in Kinzua Bridge State Park,  from the Kinzua Bridge. The tornado, classified as F1 on the scale, passed by the bridge and continued another  before it lifted. It touched down again  from Smethport and traveled another  before finally dissipating. It was estimated to have been  wide and it left a path  long.() The same storm also spawned an F3 tornado in nearby Potter County.()Since 2002, the Kinzua Bridge had been closed to all recreational pedestrian and railroad usage after it was determined that the structure was at risk to high winds.( Engineers had determined that during high winds, the bridges center of gravity could shift, putting weight onto only one side of the bridge and causing it to fail.( An Ohio-based bridge construction and repair company had already started work on restoring the Kinzua Bridge in February 2003.( Construction workers had already packed up and were starting to leave for the day when the storm came.()When the tornado touched down, the winds had increased to at least  and were coming from the east, perpendicular to the bridge, which ran northsouth. An investigation determined that Towers 10 and 11 had collapsed first, in a westerly direction.() Meanwhile, Towers 12 through 14 had actually been picked up off of their foundations, moved slightly to the northwest and set back down intact and upright, held together by only the railroad tracks on the bridge. Next towers four through nine collapsed to the west, twisting clockwise, as the tornado started to move northward.( As it moved north, inflow winds came in from the south and caused Towers 12, 13, and 14 to finally collapse towards the north, twisting counterclockwise.(The failures were caused by the badly rusted base bolts holding the bases of the towers to concrete anchor blocks embedded into the ground.( An investigation determined that the tornado had a wind speed of at least , which applied an estimated  of lateral force against the bridge.() The investigation also hypothesized that the whole structure oscillated laterally four to five times before fatigue started to cause the base bolts to fail. The towers fell intact in sections and suffered damage upon impact with the ground.() The tornado took less than 30 seconds to destroy a bridge that had stood for over a century.(AftermathThe state decided not to rebuild the Kinzua Bridge, which would have cost an estimated $45 million. Instead, the ruins are intended to become a visitor attraction used to show the forces of nature at work.( Kinzua Bridge State Park had attracted 215,000 visitors annually before the bridge collapsed,() and was one of twenty-one state parks chosen by the Pennsylvania Bureau of Parks for its list of Twenty Must-See Pennsylvania State Parks.( Note: Despite the title, there are twenty-one parks in the list, with Colton Point and Harrison State Parks treated as one.) The viaduct and its collapse were featured in the History Channels After People as an example of how corrosion and high winds would eventually lead to the collapse of any steel structure.() The bridge was removed from the National Register of Historic Places on July 21, 2004.()The Knox and Kane Railroad was forced to suspend operations in October 2004 after a 75 percent decline in the number of passengers, brought about by the collapse of the Kinzua Bridge.() The Kovalchick Corporation bought the Knox and Kanes tracks and all other property owned by the railroad, including the locomotives and stock. The Kovalchick Corporation also owns the Broad Top Railroad and was the company that owned the Kinzua Bridge before selling it to the state in 1963.( The company plans to remove the tracks and sell them for scrap. The right-of-way would then be used to establish a trail.(Pennsylvania released $700,000 to design repairs on the remaining towers and plan development of the new park facilities in June 2005.() In late 2005, the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources (DCNR) put forward an $8 million proposal for a new deck and visitors center, with plans to allow access to the bridge and a hiking trail giving views of the fallen towers.() The Kinzua Sky Walk was opened on September 15, 2011 in a ceremony.() The Sky Walk consists of a pedestrian walkway to an observation deck with a glass floor at the end of bridge that allows views of bridge and the valley directly below. The walkway cost $4.3 million to construct, but is estimated to bring in $11.5 million in tourism revenue for the region.()See also* of bridge failures* of Historic Civil Engineering Landmarks* Register of Historic Places listings in McKean County, Pennsylvania* Bridge disasterReferencesExternal links* Board of Inquiry Investigation (PA DCNR)* Animation of the Kinzua Bridge collapse (PA DCNR) (30 MiB)* Documentary on the Kinzua Bridge (University/BBC)* Photographs of the Kinzua Bridge (of Congress/HAER)Bridgede Kinzua()silta
13588684
Panama_Bight
The Panama Bight is a ecoregion on the Pacific coast of the Americas.The Panama Bight extends eastwards from the Peninsula in Panama along the coast of the of Panama and de las Perlas. It continues south along the entire Pacific coast of Colombia to the coast of northern Ecuador. The marine ecoregion bounds it on the north, and the marine ecoregion bounds it on the south.The Panama Bight ecoregion is home to rich coral beds in the near shore waters. While coral diversity is lower here than in the Caribbean Sea on the other side of Panama, the coral cover tends to be higher. In fact, the density of coral coverage here-90 percent coverage is common-is rarely seen in the Caribbean. In addition to the coral beds, enclaves of Bight mangroves can be found in the tidal zone.ThreatsNio climate events have warmed the water of this ecoregion, which has led to bleached and killed coral. Outbreaks of the starfish (Acanthaster planci) have also reduced coral populations. Siltation from soil erosion has destroyed many coral areas. Additionally threats include deforestation on shore and destruction of the reefs due to fishing, as well as damage from domestic pollution, dam construction, mining, oil shipping, and pesticides.The Panama Bight ecoregion is one of the Wildlife Funds 200 priority ecoregions for conservation.External links* Panama Bight (WWF)* Panama Bight (National Geographic)* Panama Bight map (National Geographic)References* Spalding, Mark D., Helen E. Fox, Gerald R. Allen, Nick Davidson et al. Marine Ecoregions of the World: A Bioregionalization of Coastal and Shelf Areas. Bioscience Vol. 57 No. 7, July/August 2007, pp. 573583. http://www.worldwildlife.org/MEOW/pdfs/meow_biosci.pdf
13608949
1841_in_New_Zealand
PopulationThe estimated population of New Zealand at the end of 1841 is 78,400 Mori and 5000 non-Mori.(Statistics New Zealand has collated estimates from a number of sources (interpolating where necessary) at , in particular )IncumbentsRegal and Vice Regal*of State  Victoria*of New South Wales  Sir George Gipps (overall responsibility for New Zealand until 3 May)*Governor  Captain Hobson (Lieutenant- Governor until 3 May then Governor-in-Chief)Government and law*Chief Justice  William Martin is appointed the first Chief Justice of New Zealand on 5 February but does not arrive in New Zealand until August.Events*March 31: The William Bryan arrives at Taranaki from Plymouth bearing 148 settlers to found Plymouth.()* March  Captain Rhodes builds the first wharf in Wellington, in front of his store on the Wellington waterfront.(New Zealand Electronic Text Centre: The Exchange)(New Zealand Electronic Text Centre: Early Wellington)*10 July:  The New Zealand Herald and Auckland Gazette begins publication. The newspaper lasts less than a year.()*8 November: The Auckland Chronicle and New Zealand Colonist begins publishing. It continues with some gaps until 1845.()Undated* The of New Zealand is moved from Okiato (Old Russell) to Auckland.* The first recorded mining in New Zealand as outcrops of manganese are mined on the coast of Island.()Arts and literatureAppointments and awards*Bishop of New Zealand  Augustus Selwyn is created the first of New Zealand.SportCricketHorse racing* January  A hurdle race is run in January at Aro P, Wellington.(Todd, S. (1976) Sporting Records of New Zealand. Auckland: Moa Publications. ISBN 0-908570-00-7)Unknown date*  The Auckland Town Plate is contested at Epsom Downs.(  A committee of army officers and townspeople forms to control racing in Auckland (Epsom).( (see also 1849).Yachting*January  The first sailing regatta in the country is held as part of Anniversary celebrations in Wellington.(Births* 9 March (in Switzerland): Suter, zoologist.;Unknown date* (in Scotland): John Duthie, politician and Mayor of Wellington.* James McGowan, politician.* (in England): William Steward, politician.(Biographies of former speakers - NZ Parliament)DeathsSee also*of years in New Zealand*of New Zealand history*of New Zealand*history of New Zealand*of environmental history of New Zealand*of New Zealands links with AntarcticaFor world events and topics in 1841 not specifically related to New Zealand see: 1841References
13624702
Adult_Blood_Lead_Epidemiology_and_Surveillance
The US Institute for Occupational Safety and Health funds the Adult Blood Lead Epidemiology and Surveillance (ABLES) program, a state-based surveillance program of laboratory-reported adult lead levels. The goal of ABLES is to reduce the rate of adults (age 16 or older) who have blood lead levels of 25 micrograms per deciliter (mcg/dL) or greater (objective 20.7 in People 2010).() The ABLES program objective is to build state capacity to initiate or improve adult blood lead surveillance programs which can accurately measure trends in adult blood lead levels and which can effectively intervene to prevent lead over-exposures.Health EffectsElevated lead levels (BLLs) in adults can damage the nervous, hematologic, reproductive, renal, cardiovascular, and gastrointestinal systems. The majority of cases are workplace-related. During 20032004, the industry sectors with the highest annual average numbers of resident adults with elevated BLLs were manufacturing, 4,622 (69%); construction, 1,252 (19%); and mining, 488 (7%). The specific industries with the highest numbers were manufacture of storage batteries, 2,499; painting, paperhanging, and decorating, 626; and mining of lead ores, 482.  () U.S. of Health and Human Services recommends that BLLs among all adults be reduced to <25 g/dL.( Reduce the number of persons who have elevated blood lead concentrations from work exposures, pp. B20-18,19 (Objective 20-7) in Tracking Healthy People 2010 http://www.cdc.gov/nchs/hphome.htm, U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, Washington DC: U.S. Government Printing Office, November 2000.) The highest BLL acceptable by standards of the U.S. Occupational Safety and Health Administration is 40 g/dL.( U.S. Department of Labor, Occupational Safety and Health Administration. Final standard; occupational exposure to lead. Federal Register 1978;43:529523014 (29 CFR  1910.1025))( U.S. Department of Labor, Occupational Safety and Health Administration. Lead exposure in constructioninterim rule. Federal Register 1993;58:2659026649 (29 CFR  1926.62)) The geometric mean BLL of all adults in the United States is <3 g/dL.(Blood Lead Levels --- United States, 1999--2002,MMWR, http://www.cdc.gov/mmwr/preview/mmwrhtml/mm5420a5.htm. May 27, 2005 / 54(20);513-516 )   Program DescriptionABLES state interventions to prevent lead over-exposures include: (1) conducting follow-up interviews with physicians, employers, and workers; (2) investigating work sites; (3) providing technical assistance; (4) providing referrals for consultation and/or enforcement; and (5) developing and disseminating educational materials and outreach programs.ABLES states are required to have a mandatory state requirement that laboratories report blood lead level results to the health department or designee. The lowest blood lead level to be reported varies from state to state.  Lead may be taken home from the workplace on clothes or in cars potentially exposing spouses and children. Children who come in contact with lead-exposed workers should be targeted for blood lead screening.ABLES StatesThe ABLES program collects data from 40 funded states:Alabama,Alaska,Arizona,California,Connecticut,Florida,Georgia,Hawaii,Illinois,Indiana,Iowa,Kansas,Kentucky,Louisiana,Maine, Maryland,Massachusetts,Michigan,Maine,Missouri,Montana,Nebraska,New Hampshire,New Jersey,New Mexico,New York,North Carolina,Ohio,Oklahoma,Oregon,Pennsylvania,Rhode Island,South Carolina,Tennessee,Texas,Utah,Vermont,Washington,Wisconsin, andWyoming.See also*poisoningReferences External links * National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health - ABLES Page*Center to Protect Workers Rights (CPWR)*Council of State and Territorial Epidemiologists (CSTE)*OSHA Safety and Health Topics: Heavy Metals: Lead* International Chemical Safety Cards (ICSCs)*NIOSH Pocket Guide to Chemical Hazards*Occupational Health Guidelines for Chemical Hazards
13648486
Fossil_beach
A fossil beach is an ancient beach which is preserved in fossil form due to a change in level or a shift in elevation which causes the beach to become an elevated terrace.()Fossil beaches may be discovered where a limestone quarry or strip mining operation is present.  For example, Miami has numerous fossil beaches which have been exposed by limestone mining. A famous example is the Pinecrest beds &mdash; a fossil-bearing rock formation found in the south of the city which is a segment of a much larger geological formation &mdash; the Formation.Fossil specimens found at a fossil beach vary according to the age of the bedrock or the sea floor matrix and the type of prehistoric environment that was present at the location.  In southwest England,  Jurassic ammonites are found.  In South Florida, Miocene shells and marine animals are found such as the teeth of the extinct shark.References
13669182
The_Disinherited
The Disinherited is a novel written by Conroy. It was published in 1933. Conroy wrote it initially as nonfiction, but editors insisted he fictionalize the story for better audience reception. The novel explores the 1920s and 30s worker experience through the eyes of Larry Donovan.PlotMonkey Nest CampThe Disinherited is heard through the voice of Larry Donovan, a young boy, growing up in the Monkey Nest coal mine camp. It is a difficult life, and after Larrys brother Dan starts working in the mines, Larrys father prods Larry to do well in school so he too wont have to go into the mines. Larry makes many observations about the differences between miner families and other families, especially farmer Ben Haskins and his daughter Bonny Fern. Larry throws a dirt clod at Bonny Ferns head one day and the next tries to give her a flower. She calls him camp trash and Ben chases Larry away. Larry also distinguishes differences between the miners themselves. His father and his fathers friend, Frenchy are both educated. So is Lionel Stafford, but Larrys father doesnt get along with Mr. Stafford. Lionel flaunts his education whereas Larrys father does not. One day the mine owner, Edward Stacpoole, comes to the mine with his wife and son. The son pushes Larrys sister, Madge, into a mud puddle and taunts her. Dan is hurt in a mining accident and dies three days later. Frenchy also dies in a separate mining accident. The camp miners go on strike, and Larrys father meets unsuccessfully with Mr. Stacpoole to negotiate. One night during a storm a scab knocks on the Donovans door seeking shelter. Tom punches the scab in the mouth and sends him away. Tom tells his children never to become scabs. Eventually, the miners go back to work.Aunt Jessie comes to take Larry to the house of a dead man; she asks Larry if Rollie Weems ever talks about her. Larry says that he does but plays innocent. At the dead mans house, Aunt Jessie forces Larry to touch the mans face. Afterwards, Larry suffers nightmares about the dead man. Larrys father takes a more dangerous job within the mine in order to make more money to pay for Larrys schooling. However, there is an accident while Mike Riordan and Tom are in the mine. Larrys father dies, and without an income Mother begins to take in others laundry. One of Mothers customers is the butchers wife, Mrs. Koch, who is very particular about her laundry. Larry stains a load of her clothing and Mother takes the blame. Rollie Weems leaves town after rumors start that he got Mattie Perkins pregnant. Mike Riordan, who had disappeared following Toms funeral, reappears and periodically leaves groceries on the Donovans porch. When the mine goes on strike again, the superintendent approaches Mother about cooking for the strikebreakers; Mother refuses on principle. Rollie Weems returns to say he has gotten work at a railroad; since Larry is of working age now, Rollie recommends that Larry get a job at the railroad also.  Bull MarketLarry starts going to night school and also gets a job at the railroad, where he becomes friends with Ed Warren. Ed introduces Larry to Wilma and Larry has his first experience with sex, which he reacts to with disgust. American involvement with World War I begins. Rollie Weems enlists and marries Aunt Jessie before going on tour. A baby is born to the newlyweds while he is France. A man speaks in the town square denouncing war and capitalism. Lionel Stafford joins in and the crowd attacks the two men, beating them very badly. Afterwards the Staffords leave town defeated.During this time Madge dies. Ed enlists after making several attempts to join the army. Larry stays away from the war he calls cruel. Ed sends Bonny Fern letters, and she approaches Larry to ask about Ed. When the soldiers return from war, the railroad goes on strike. Ed returns and moves to Detroit with the Haskins. Rollie emerges as a leader in the strike. During a conversation between him and Larry, he propounds the advantages of staying single. Larry listens and seems to remember Rollies advice throughout the narrative. One evening, Rollie starts a fight with a strikebreaker and is shot. He tells Larry to pretend the fight hadnt happened. Rollie crashes his car into a streetlight and dies. After Rollies death, Larry gets a job at a steel mill which begins a series, throughout the novel, of Larry getting and losing jobs. At the steel mill, Larry meets several people, including an old man the workers call Bun Grady. Grady is homeless and unable to get many jobs because of his age. Larry rooms at the home of Nat Moore. Nats wife Lena is sickly and often places Larry in uncomfortable situations. Larry finds a job at the rubber plant and meets Hans, a German worker, and Jasper, a prankster of sorts. Larry dates Helen, the lunch girl. Larry receives many letters from Ed in Detroit encouraging him to move to Detroit. Ed finally accepts the offer, along with Jasper and Nat, after Lena dies. Nat has also been remarried to Emma, his former cleaning lady, though he plans to send for her after he gets a job. Larry rooms with the Haskins and gets a job at the auto factory. Bonny Fern now takes college classes and Larry takes note of how the classes and the city have affected her. She influences him in the proletarian movement. Getting word that Helen is in Detroit, Larry follows her to a whorehouse that is disguised as a lunch counter. He requests Helen who has become a prostitute. She shares her feelings about him, and mildly drunk, Larry reacts oddly. There is a scene and Larry is thrown out. Nat has sent for his family and has bought a plot of land to build a house on. However he doesnt yet have enough money to build. In the meantime, he begins making homebrew which upsets Emma. Bonny Fern also expresses disgust when Larry drinks. The Hard WinterThe Stock Market crashes and men from the auto factory are laid off. Ed and Larry bounce from job to job. The Haskins decide to go back to the farm, though the decision distresses Bonny Fern. After being gone for some time, Bonny Fern sends Larry a letter detailing his mothers poor living conditions. Larry and Ed buy a car and head to Monkey Nest Camp. The car is a clunker, and the boys must get jobs to pay for repairs. When they reach the camp, they find Mother, Aunt Jessie, and the kids nearly starved and living in Liam Ryans old barroom. Larry is shocked at the physical degeneration of his once pretty Aunt Jessie and his mother. After fixing a leaky roof and buying the family groceries, Ed and Larry look for work. While lying pipeline they meet a half-wit who they deduce to be Willy Stafford. It seems his once uppity older brother, Paul Stafford, has been buried alive working in the pipeline ditch. Bonny Fern is friendly with Larry but he recalls again the advice of Rollie and keeps his distance. In conversation, Mother tells Larry to be a fighter like his father was. Nat and his family show up, as does Hans. Ben Haskins farm is repossessed and is set to be sold piece by piece in an auction. Well-meaning farmers come to the auction and refuse to bid. Hans and a sheriff get involved. Eventually one farmer sells the farm and goods back to Ben Haskins for 99 cents. Larry decides to go West with Hans. Mother and Bonny Fern wave good-bye as the Moore family, Hans, Ed, and Larry drive off.Characters in The DisinheritedMain Characters*Larry Donavon   The main character of the story *Bonny Fern Haskins   Bens daughter; she is the object of Larrys affection throughout the book; when her family moves to Detroit she attends college and gets Larry interested in the socialist movement*Ed Warren   Railroad worker; he becomes friends with Larry and they travel together looking for work* Rollie Weems  a miner/soldier/railroad man; marries Aunt Jessie; he supports a the railroad strike and is later killed by a scabAncillary Characters*Mike Riordan  Peg-leg sailor turned miner who is with Larrys father during a mine accident*Dan Donavon  Larrys brother who dies in the mines*Tom Donavon  Larrys father*Mother  Larrys mother*Lionel Stafford  lives at the camp but is scared of the mine; later he leaves town when others dont agree with his radical ideas*Ben Haskins, farmer*Madge  Larrys sister *Edward Stacpoole  Monkey Nest Camp owner*Paul Stafford  son of Lionel; he is also scared of the mines though later is buried alive while working to lay pipeline*Willy Stafford  the epileptic youngest son of Lionel*Mrs. Stafford  Lionels overbearing wife*Frenchy Barbour (Marcel)  a friend of Tom Donavon*Fred Dobson  the Donovans landlord*Aunt Jessie  Larrys aunt; she marries Rollie Weems*Koch  the butcher; Mother does Mrs. Kochs laundry*Liam Ryan  saloon owner*Wilma  a young girl that Ed sets Larry up with*Robert Lee (Bun) Grady  an older man Larry meets while working in the steel factory*Nat Moore  takes Larry in as a boarder; after his wife Lena dies he goes with Larry to Detroit*Lena Moore  sickly wife of Nat *Hans  a German worker Larry first meets at the rubber plant; Hans is full of Marxist ideology and at the end of the story, he sets off with Larry *Jasper Collins,  a friend Larry also meets at the rubber plant and later travels to Detroit with; Jasper enjoys teasing Hans*Emma Hallen  the Moores widowed cleaning lady; Nat marries her after Lenas death*Helen  Lunch girl; she dates Larry and later moves to Detroit where she becomes a prostituteReception and CriticismThe Disinherited isnt really a novel, as some critics have said.  I agree with that.  Novel or not, just so it tells the truth.  I describe myself as a witness to the times, not as a novelist.  And thats what I prefer to be known as. - Jack Conroy( Jack Conroy, Cited in Wixson, Douglas. Introduction to the 1991 Edition. The Disinherited.  Jack Conroy. Columbia: University of Missouri Press, 1991.)The Disinherited, Jack Conroys first novel, was released in November 1933, after being rejected by twelve publishers.  Once it was accepted by Covici-Friede in April 1933, it was only accepted subject to revision.  Once Conroy made the suggested revisions, the book was released to mixed reviews (Wixson, Douglas. Introduction to the 1991 Edition. The Disinherited.  Jack Conroy. Columbia: University of Missouri Press, 1991. 9-10).  Part of the reason for this reception was that many critics werent sure exactly how to judge Conroys first novel.  Critics tended to review The Disinherited using conventional literary standards.  But Conroys novel does not solely align itself with the tradition of literary realism; it is also what Conroy himself calls fictional documentation (Wixson, Douglas. Introduction to the 1991 Edition. The Disinherited.  Jack Conroy. Columbia: University of Missouri Press, 1991. 9-12)One of the major criticisms of  The Disinherited is its broken threads of narrative (Wixson, Douglas. Introduction to the 1991 Edition. The Disinherited.  Jack Conroy. Columbia: University of Missouri Press, 1991. 12).  The varying elements of the story never come together to support one unifying purpose.  The novel is more a string of events, some of greater importance than others, but all present nonetheless (Examining the life of a worker-writer. wsws.org.  9 November 1995.  International Committee of the Fourth International. 24 September 2007.http://www.wsws.org/arts/1995/nov1995/conroy.shtml).  However, these broken threads lend themselves to the realism of the novel.  Characters come in and out of the story in much the same way that people came into and out of Conroys life as a migratory worker, moving from job to job (Wixson, Douglas. Introduction to the 1991 Edition. The Disinherited.  Jack Conroy. Columbia: University of Missouri Press, 1991. 12)Another criticism of The Disinherited was to write this novel off as propaganda.  The novel suggests that freedom must be achieved through responsible collective action, not through individual virtue alone.  In most naturalistic fiction, one must leave their tragic life behind, to remain within that life to work for change sounds like propaganda (Wixson 22).   But Conroy did remain within that life, and because he remained in that position as worker-writer, he held true to his point of view that acted as the subject of his writing, and this contributed to energize his literary work. (Wixson, Douglas. Introduction to the 1991 Edition. The Disinherited.  Jack Conroy. Columbia: University of Missouri Press, 1991. 23)Despite these criticisms, many feel that The Disinherited is a notable achievement because it was one of the first works of proletarian fiction to be written from a working class, firsthand experience.  This is an arguable position, however, due to the fact that there is no singular definition of proletarian literature.  Some believe it is simply literature written about the working class; some believe it is instead written for the working class, or by someone from the working class.  Whatever the definition, most of the so-called proletarian fiction in the 1930s was written by middle class authors who had lost faith in capitalism and were interested in dramatizing the coming struggle for power (Aaron, Daniel. Introduction. The Disinherited. Jack Conroy.  New York: Hill and Wang, 1963. viii)However, once the Great Depression began to weigh heavily on the American landscapeunemployment, evictions, strikes, etc.writing about these conditions hit home, and became legitimate subjects for literary works.    Works like The Disinherited opened a new class of literary realism and helped break down the barriers between literate and illiterate America (Aaron, Daniel. Introduction. The Disinherited. Jack Conroy.  New York: Hill and Wang, 1963. xiii)Relevant Historical Events1905 The US Supreme Court decides v. New York, setting a precedent that lasts until 1934. This decision made it difficult for state governments as well as the federal to enact laws regulating working conditions, such as limiting the amount of hours in a work week or requiring a minimum wage. Roosevelt takes office; the empire is soundly defeated by the Japanese in a bid to enlarge Russian territory. The novel opens in Monkey Nest Camp, a coal mining community, most likely set in northern Missouri, where Conroy lived as a boy. Larry Donovan, Conroys alter ego, is nine years old.April 1917The States enters War I on the side of Britain and France after discovering that Germany is trying to persuade Mexico to enter the war as Germanys ally. Larry now works at the railroad yard. His friend and co-work, Ed Warden, introduces Larry to the pleasures of womanly flesh by setting him up with Wilma, an experienced fifteen year-old girl. Larry is not quite eighteen years old since he is too young to enlist.Early 1918A devastating influenza pandemic sweeps the United States and the rest of the world. It appears to have originated in Kansas and causes 50 million deaths worldwide. Larrys sister Madge dies of the disease. Nov. 1918 Armistice is declared; WWI is over, with Germany the loser. Over forty million casualties, about half of those fatalities, are suffered between both sides. Ed, who serves in Europe, returns a changed man after seeing horrific things. He begins to show interest in Bonny Fern, the girl for whom Larry has unresolved feelings. 1918Revolution takes place after Germanys defeat in WWI. This results in the dissolution of the monarchy, the formation of the Republic, leading eventually to Hitlers rise to power. Larry befriends Hans, who participated in the revolution, while working in the steel mill. Hanss viewpoints influence Larrys own.1920	Prohibition begins in the U. S. and lasts until 1933. Ed writes Larry, inviting him to come to Detroit, where jobs are plentiful at the automobile factories.1921Hoover is made Secretary of Commerce under President Warren G. Harding. He serves until 1928, when he is elected President. Hoover declares at one point that poverty will be eliminated in the U. S. Larry changes from job to job, factory to factory, in search of the elusive American Dream.October 1929 The  stock market crash occurs despite Hoovers promises of prosperity. Larry returns home to Monkey Nest Camp to help his mother as well as Bonny Ferns father through the Hard Winter. Larry decides that he must follow Hans to fight for the proletariat.Notes
13683076
San_Cristbal_mine_(Bolivia)
The San Cristobal mine in Lipez, Department, Bolivia is an open-pit silver, lead and zinc mine near the town of San Cristbal, Potos. The mine, operated by Corporation, produces approximately 1,300 metric tons of zinc-silver ore and 300 tons of lead-silver ore per day, , () by processing 40,000 to 50,000 tons of rock.() It is one of Bolivias largest mining facilities and, according to Sumitomo, the worlds sixth-largest producer of zinc and third-largest producer of silver.( It is located in southwestern Bolivia and hosts approximately 450 million ounces of silver and 8 billion pounds of zinc and 3 billion pounds of lead contained in 231 million tonnes of open-pittable proven and probable reserves. As the ore body is open both at depth and laterally, reserve expansion potential is considered excellent.(Apex Silver Mines Limited website on the San Cristobal project - http://www.apexsilver.com/home.html) The mine has been in various stages of development since the early 1980s but only recently came into full operation.OwnershipThe San Cristbal mine was formerly developed by Apex Silver Mines Ltd. of Colorado, a company founded in 1993. In September 2006, Corporation of Japan acquired a 35% share of the facility in a financing deal. The acquisition was supported by the Bank for International Cooperation and Export and Investment Insurance (NEXI).() Sumitomo Corporation assumed full ownership following Apex Silvers 2009 bankruptcy filing.(Labor conditionsWork is hard. A miner works 12 hour shifts from 7 in the morning to 7 at night. He works continuously for three months with not one day off and is then entitled to 2 weeks leave. Not known if this is paid or unpaid leave. The monthly wage while working is 2000 bolivianos (equivalent to 200 a month or 50 a week).ControversyThe San Cristobal mine faces some controversy with the Bolivian government due to Bolivian President Moraless desire to nationalize, at least in all but name, the mining industry in Bolivia. Previously the oil and gas industry was nationalized and Bolivian troops seized the fields; initially the nationalization took shape in the form of increased taxes for profits in this industry - from 50% to 83%. There has been great fear that next would be the mining industry.However on May 1, 2007 President Morales signed Presidential Decree 29117(Presidential Decree 29117 (Decreto Supremo No. 29117) (in Spanish) http://www.derechoteca.com/gacetabolivia/decreto-supremo-29117-del-01-mayo-2007.htm) that assured all mining concessions existing at the time of the Decree will be respected and will remain in effect. This is the most significant step since the May 10, 2006 ruling by the Bolivian Supreme Court which declared the Mining Code to be unconstitutional. The Courts ruling is not effective until May 2008 and the Court urged the Bolivian Congress to enact legislation during that time which may supersede the ruling.Under the Mining Code, all mineral deposits in Bolivia are the property of the State. Mining concessions awarded by the State grant the holder, subject to certain payments, the exclusive right to carry out prospecting, exploration, exploitation, concentration, smelting, refining and marketing activities with respect to all mineral substances located within a given concession. Under Bolivian law, local and foreign companies are treated equally in obtaining mineral concessions.The court determined that the natural resources of Bolivia are owned by the public and the public must maintain ownership in part of these resources regardless of concessions made to foreign entities wishing to develop these resources. It ruled the State does not have the proper authority to give the aforementioned concessions to private companies wishing to engage in the mining of natural resources. In essence that is to say that a foreign company cannot own in full a mining operation in Bolivia without the State owning a part of it.The mining Decree by the President also designated all unclaimed mineral resources within the national territory as a Mining Fiscal Reserve to be administered by Bolivias national mining company, COMIBOL. As indicated above, this portion of the decree does not interfere in any respect with any mining concession existing at the time of the decree, and in fact reinforces those privately-held rights as inviolable.(Part III: Bolivias Mining Rollercoaster: Negotiating Nationalization Written by Andean Information Network - Thursday, 16 August 2007 http://ain-bolivia.org/index.php?optioncom_content&taskview&id94&Itemid52)ReferencesExternal links*Protests Mount Against San Cristobal Silver Mine - video report by Now!
13708916
504th_Bombardment_Group
The 504th Bombardment Group (504th BG) was a War II States Army Air Forces combat organization. It was inactivated on 15 June 1946.The unit served primarily in the Ocean theater of World War II as part of Air Force. The 504th Bomb Groups aircraft engaged in Superfortress bombardment operations against Japan. Its aircraft were identified by a E inside a Circle painted on the tail.The 504th Bombardment Group flew the last combat mission by the United States Army Air Forces of World War II, its last combat mission being on 15 August 1945.HistoryThe unit was established in early 1944 at Army Air Field, Texas, being formed as a Superfortress Very Heavy bombardment Group. Thu unit was initially formed with four bomb squadrons (393d, 398th, 421st, and 507th ), being a mixture of both newly-constituted and reassigned units. The 398th was formerly a Bomber Command Mitchell medium bomber Operational Training Unit in the southeastern United states, being formed in 1942. It later became a Marauder Replacement Training Unit until being inactivated in October 1943.Due to a shortage of B-29s, the group was initially equipped with former Bomber Command Flying Fortresses previously used for training heavy bomber replacement personnel. The unit was then reassigned for advanced training and received B-29s at Army Airfield, Nebraska during the late spring and summer of 1944.In May shortages in aircraft and equipment led to the 507th Bomb Squadron being inactivated, with its personnel being consolidated into other group squadrons (the 507th would be reactivated a month later as part of the Bombardment Group). In November, the 393d Bombardment Squadron was reassigned to the to Composite Group at Field, Utah, leaving the 504th to be a two squadron group. The 393d became the 509ths only operational B-29 squadron. The 393d would eventually become the only military unit in history to engage in warfare, dropping Bombs on Hiroshima and Nagasaki, Japan, in August 1945.As a two squadron group, the 504th was deployed to Theater of Operations (PTO) in late 1944, being assigned to the Bomber Command Bombardment Wing in the Mariana Islands; being stationed at North Field, Tinian. The group began combat operations from Tinian in January 1945 with attacks on Japanese airfields and other installations on Maug and Jima and in the Truk Islands. Flew its first mission against the Japanese home islands early in February 1945 when the group bombed the industrial area of Kobe. Continued to attack strategic targets in Japan, operating in daylight and at high altitude to bomb such objectives as aircraft factories, chemical plants, harbors, and arsenals. Switched to night incendiary raids attacking major Japanese cities in the spring of 1945, causing massive destruction of urbanized areas. Received a Unit Citation (DUC) for striking the industrial center at Yokohama late in May 1945. Began incendiary raids in March 1945, flying at night and at low altitude to strike area targets in Japan. Started mining operations against enemy shipping late in Mar, receiving a 2d DUC for mining Korean shipping lanes, the Strait, and harbors of the Inland Sea, JulyAugust 1945. In April and May 1945 the group hit airfields from which the Japanese launched kamikaze planes against the invasion force during the assault on Okinawa. During mid June 1945 the 680th Bomb Squadron was attached to the 504th bomb group to bring the group up to full strength with 3 squadrons. The group continued strategic bombing raids and incendiary attacks until the Japanese Capitulation in August 1945.  After Day, the 504th dropped supplies to Allied prisoners, participated in show-of-force missions, and flew over Japan to evaluate bombardment damage. In the fall of 1945, the group largely demobilized as part of the Sunset Project, with some aircraft being sent reclamation on Tinian; others being returned to the United States for storage at aircraft depots in the southwest. By Christmas, the group fleet was reduced to 30 or less planes Many of the remaining veterans signed for any conditions of travel to get home, arriving three weeks later in Oakland, California, where troop trains scattered them for points of discharge close to their homes.The unit was largely a paper organization when it was reassigned to Field in the Philippines in March 1946, and assigned to Air Force. At Clark its remaining aircraft and personnel were consolidated into other units, and it was inactivated in June.Lineage* Constituted as 504th Bombardment Group (Very Heavy) on 18 February 1944: Activated on 11 March 1944: Inactivated on 15 June 1946Assignments* Air Force, 11 March-5 November 1944: Attached to Bombardment Operational Training Wing (Very Heavy), 12 March-5 November 1944* Bombardment Wing, 23 December 1944* Air Force, 6 March  15 June 1946Components* Bombardment Squadron:  11 March-25 November 1944* Bombardment Squadron: 11 March 1944  15 June 1946* Bombardment Squadron: 11 March 1944  15 June 1946* Bombardment Squadron: 11 March-10 May 1944 * Bombardment Squadron: Attached, 15 June 1945; assigned 14 November 1945  15 June 1946Stations* Army Air Field, Texas, 11 March 1944* Army Airfield, Nebraska, 12 March-5 November 1944* North Field, Tinian, Islands, 23 December 1944* Field, Luzon, Philippines, 13 March  15 June 1946Aircraft* Boeing B-17 Flying Fortress, 1944 (Training only)* Boeing B-29 Superfortress, 19441946References* Maurer, Maurer (1983). Air Force Combat Units Of World War II. Maxwell AFB, Alabama: Office of Air Force History. ISBN 0-89201-092-4.* Colonel Hogan from the TV Show Hogans Heroes led 504th Bombing GroupExternal links* 504th Bomb Group Website
13724354
Apollo_Management
  assets          $37 billion(Includes Apollo Fund VI, Apollo Fund VII, Public investment companies (, ) and distressed investment vehicles)  Apollo Global Management LLC is a equity investment firm, founded in 1990 by former Burnham Lambert banker Black.(Leon D. Black.  Business Week Snapshot)  The firm specializes in buyout transactions and purchases of securities involving corporate restructuring, special situations and industry consolidations. Apollo is headquartered in York City, and also has offices in New York, Angeles and London. The firm has invested over $16 billion in companies.(Apollo Management. AOL Finance Profile, Feb 13th 2009)As of March 2011, Apollo managed over US$70 billion of investor commitments across its equity funds and other investment vehicles making it one of the private equity firms globally.( Among the most notable companies currently owned by Apollo are Entertainment, Claires, Entertainment Corporation, Cruise Line, and Realogy (Banker and 21 Real Estate).(Deal Makers 3-Day Tally: $37 Billion. New York Times, 2006)The firmApollo is operated by its managing partners, Black, Joshua Harris and Marc Rowan and a team of more than 175 investment professionals, as of December 31, 2007. The firms headquarters are located in the Building at West 57th Street(Business People; Taking Tycos View.  New York Times, February 29, 2004) in New York City, and the firm operates additional offices in Purchase, New York, Los Angeles and London.(Apollo Global Management, Llc, Form S-1, Securities And Exchange Commission, April 8, 2008) Apollos executive committee includes: Leon Black, chairman and chief executive officer; Josh Harris, senior managing director; Marc Rowan, senior managing director; Henry Silverman, vice chairman and chief operating officer and Spilker who was hired as President in November 2010. (International Alternative Investment Review )Apollo operates two business lines in an integrated manner:* equityThe private equity business is the cornerstone of Apollos investment activities.  Apollo invests through a variety of private equity strategies, most notably buyouts and distressed buyouts and debt investments.  This business operates primarily through the firms family of private equity investment funds (See: Investment funds)(* marketsApollo invests through a variety of capital markets strategies to complement its core private equity business. Apollo invests through a variety of investment vehicles including mezzanine funds, funds and senior credit opportunity funds.(Investment vehiclesPrivate equity fundsApollo has historically relied primarily on equity funds, pools of committed capital from funds, insurance companies, endowments, of funds, net worth individuals, offices, wealth funds and other investors.  Since 2008, Apollo has begun investing its seventh private equity fund, Apollo Investment Fund VII, which raised approximately $15 billion of investor commitments.(  Since inception in 1990, Apollo has raised a total of seven equity funds, including:(FundVintageYearCommittedCapital ($m)Apollo Investment Fund VII(2008$14,900Apollo Investment Fund VI2005$10,200Apollo Investment Fund V2001$3,700Apollo Investment Fund IV1998$3,600Apollo Investment Fund III1995$1,500Apollo Investment Fund II1992$500Apollo Investment Fund I1990$400Apollo Investment Corporation  homepage        www.apolloic.com Apollo Investment Corporation () is a US-domiciled traded private equity fund and an affiliate of Apollo.  AIC was formed  to invest primarily in companies in the form of debt and senior secured loans, as well as by making certain direct equity investments in companies. The Company also invests in the securities of public companies.(Fabrikant, Geraldine. Private Firms Use Closed-End Funds To Tap the Market. York Times, April 17, 2004.)(AIC is structured as a development company, a type of traded private equity vehicle that is designed to generate interest income and long term capital appreciation.  AIC historically has not invested in companies controlled by Apollos private equity funds.(Apollo Investment Corporation: Portfolio Companies (company website))AP Alternative Assets  homepage        www.apolloalternativeassets.com AP Alternative Assets () is a Guernsey-domiciled traded private equity closed-end limited partnership, managed by Apollo Alternative Assets, an affiliate of Apollo Management. AAA was formed to invest alongside Apollos main private equity funds and hedge funds.((AAA was launched in August 2006, shortly after Kravis Roberts completed an public offering for its $5 billion for its KKR Private Equity Investors vehicle in May 2006.((  Apollo raised a total of $2 billion for AAA including the vehicles $1.5 billion IPO and a subsequent private placement.(AAAs investment portfolio is made up of a mix of equity and markets investments:(Apollo Alternative Assets: Investment Strategy (company website)* Private equity co-investments companies controlled by Apollo Investment Fund VI and Apollo Investment Fund VII* Apollo Strategic Value Fund - an Apollo-sponsored securities and special situations fund* AP Investment Europe Limited - an Apollo-sponsored investment fund with holdings in debt and mezzanine investments in European companies* Apollo Asia Opportunity Fund - an Apollo-sponsored fund focused on debt and equity investment opportunities in Asia in both the public and private markets* Apollo European Principal Finance Fund - an Apollo-sponsored fund investing in non-performing loans in EuropeHistoryApollo, originally referred to as Apollo Advisors, was founded in 1990, on the heels of the collapse of Burnham Lambert in February 1990. It was founded by Black, the former head of Drexels mergers and acquisitions department, along with other Drexel alumni.(Drexel Divided on Settlement.  New York Times, December 17, 1988)  Among the most notable founders are John Hannan, Drexels former co-director of international finance; Craig Cogut, a lawyer who worked with Drexels high-yield division in Los Angeles; and Arthur Bilger, the former head of the corporate finance department.  Other founding partners included Marc Rowan and Michael Gross, who both worked under Black in the mergers and acquisitions department and Tony Ressler, who worked as a senior vice president in Drexels high yield department with responsibilities for the responsibility for the new issue/syndicate desk.(Ex-Drexel Executives Arrange Aid for Fruit of the Loom, August 24, 1990)(Changes at Drexel Continue.  New York Times, March 11, 1989)(Drexels Uncertain Future.  New York Times, October 15, 1989)Less than six months after the collapse of Drexel, the founders of Apollo had already begun a series of ventures.  Apollo Investment Fund L.P., the first of their private equity investment funds was formed to make investments in distressed companies. Apollos first fund raised approximately $400 million of investor commitments on the strength of Blacks reputation as a prominent lieutenant of Milken and key player in the buyout boom of the 1980s.(  Lion Advisors was set up to provide investment services to Credit Lyonnais, which was seeking to profit from depressed prices in the high yield market.(Bailing Out Frances Biggest Bank.  New York Times, January 26, 1995)1990sAt the time of Apollos founding, financing for new leveraged buyouts was minimal and Apollo turned instead to a strategy of distressed-to-control takeovers.(Altman, Edward I. The High Yield Bond Market: A Decade Of Assessment, Comparing 1990 With 2000. NYU Stern School of Business, 2000)(HYLTON, RICHARD D. Corporate Bond Defaults Up Sharply in 89 York Times, January 11, 1990.)  Apollo would purchase securities which could be converted into a controlling interest in the equity of the company through a bankruptcy reorganization or other restructuring.  Apollo used distressed debt as an entry point, enabling the firm to invest in such firms as Resorts,(Apollo dissolves Vail Resorts stake.  Deseret News (Salt Lake City), Oct 1, 2004) Industries,(Company News; Walter Industries Bondholders in Accord.  New York Times, April 9, 1994)(Settlement For Walter Industries And Creditors.  New York Times, October 21, 1994) Culligan and Samsonite.(E-II Revamps Debt Plan To Offset Offer by Icahn.  New York Times, May 22, 1993.)Early on, Apollo made a name for itself by acquiring interests in companies that Drexel had helped finance by purchasing bonds from failed and loans and insurance companies.  Apollo acquired several large portfolios of assets from the U.S. governments Trust Corporation.(Washington Hopes Vulture Investors Will Buy Bad Assets.  New York Times, February 10, 2009)  One of Apollos earliest and most successful deals involved the acquisition of Executive Life Insurance Companys bond portfolio.  Using this vehicle, Apollo would purchase the Executive Life portfolio, generating tremendous profits when the value of high yield bonds recovered, but also resulting in a variety of state regulatory issues for Apollo and Credit Lyonnais over the purchase.(European Group Pressing Its Offer for Executive Life, April 13, 1991) More than a decade after the purchase, in 2002, California Attorney General Bill Lockyer accused Apollo, Leon Black, and an investor group led by French bank Credit Lyonnais, of illegally acquiring the assets and bond portfolio of Executive Life Insurance Co. in 1991.  According to the State of California, Lion allegedly violated a California law that prohibited foreign government-owned banks from owning California insurance companies.( Executive Life Indictments Brought.  Wall Street Journal, December 18, 2003)In 1995, Apollo raised its third private equity fund, Apollo Investment Fund III with $1.5 billion of investor commitments from investors that included CalPERS and the General Motors pension fund.(Double trouble.  The Deal, July 18, 2008)(Leon Black: Wall Streets Dr. No.  Business Week, July 29, 1996)  Unlike its first two funds and later funds, Fund III would ultimately prove only an average performer for private equity funds of its vintage.  Among the investments made in Fund III (invested through 1998) were: Alliance Imaging, Waste Industries, Home Furnishings, Furniture,(Levitz Furniture Gets Boost from Financier Leon Black.  Knight Ridder/Tribune Business News, July, 1996) Corporation of America,(Communications Corporation of America Profile.  Business Week) Dominicks, Ralphs (acquired Apollos Food-4-Less),(Yucaipa will stack up hefty debt load if it buys Ralphs.  Los Angeles Business Journal, August 22, 1994) Move.com, Incorporated,(HFS-Apollo in Real Estate Brokerage Venture.  New York Times, August 13, 1997) Corporation,(Pillowtex to Acquire Fieldcrest for $400 Million.  New York Times, September 12, 1997) Telemundo(Telemundo Plan Backed.  New York Times, July 21, 1994) and Mortgage Corporation.(Weyerhaeuser Mortgage Company sale closes.  Business Wire,  May 22, 1997)Empire 25 NYC.jpg|thumb|right|215px|Apollo invested in AMC in 2001 and would buy out the company in 2004 Also in 1995, Apollo founding partner Craig Cogut left the firm to found a smaller competitor Capital Advisors.  Since inception Pegasus has raised $1.8 billion in four private equity funds focused on investments in middle-market companies in financial distress.  In 1997, Apollo co-founder Tony Ressler founded Management as the successor to its Lion Advisors business which would manage debt obligation vehicles.(Pegasus Capital Advisors > Craig Cogut Profile (company website).  Also: Craig Coguts Professional Profile (Founder of Pegasus Capital Advisors).)In 1998, Apollo raised its fourth private equity fund, Apollo Investment Fund IV, with $3.6 billion of investor commitments.(  Among the investments made in Fund IV (invested through 2001) were: Waste Industries,(A trash hauler is buying a much bigger rival, a type of deal that makes Wall Street a bit nervous.  York Times, March 9, 1999) Entertainment,( International,(Apollo Takes 20% Stake In Berlitz For $100 Million.  New York Times, October 8, 1998) Clark Retail Enterprises,(Apollo Affiliate Is Acquiring Clarks Store Operations.  New York Times, May 14, 1999) Express (Buhrmann), Encompass Services Corporation, National Financial Partners, International,(Neptune Orient To Sell North American Train Network.  New York Times, March 18, 1999) Rent-A-Center, Performance Products, Specialty Materials, Satellite Radio, SkyTerra Communications, Rentals and Worldwide.(Wyndham Receives $1 Billion From Investor Group.  New York Times, July 1, 1999)2000-2005Image:SolowBuilding.jpg|upright|thumb|165px|left|Apollos headquarters in the Building at 9 West 57th Street in York City, formerly occupied by TycoApollo deployed its fourth fund during the booming markets of the late 1990s, only to experience difficulties with the collapse of the Internet bubble and the onset of the recession.  Amid the turmoil of collapsing markets, Apollo was able to raise its fifth private equity fund in 2001, Apollo Investment Fund V, with $3.7 billion of investor commitments, roughly the same amount raised as for its previous fund.(  Among the investments made in Fund V (invested through 2006) were Group, Entertainment, Plastics, Cablecom, Minerals, Nutrition Centers (GNC), Goodman Global, Specialty Chemicals (Borden), Intelsat, n Things, Metals USA, Investment Holdings, Sourcecorp, Communications, and Unity Media.Meanwhile, Ares continued to grow through the late 1990s, and profited significantly from investments made after the collapse of the high yield market in 2000 and 2001.  Although technically, the founders of Ares had completed a out with the formation of the firm in 1997, they had maintained a close relationship with Apollo over its first five years and operated as the West Coast affiliate of Apollo. By 2002, when Ares raised its first corporate opportunities fund, the firm announced that it was more formally separating itself from its former parent company.(Fitch Assigns Ares Management CDO Asset Manager Ratings.  Business Wire, February 25, 2003)   The timing of this separation also coincided with Apollos legal difficulties with the State of California over its purchase of Life Insurance Company in 1991.Following the spin-off of Ares in 2002, Apollo developed two new affiliates to continue its investment activities in the capital markets. The first of these new affiliates, founded in 2003, was Apollo Distressed Investment Fund (DIF) Management a credit opportunity investment vehicle.(Apollo raising distressed-debt fund.  The Deal, June 5, 2003)  The following year, in April 2004, Apollo raised $930 million through an public offering (IPO) for a listed development company, Apollo Investment Corporation ()).  Apollo Investment Corporation was formed  to invest primarily in middle-market companies in the form of debt and senior secured loans, as well as by making certain direct equity investments in companies. The Company also invests in the securities of public companies.((Sorkin, Andrew Ross.  Equity Firm Is Seen Ready to Sell a Stake to Investors. York Times, April 5, 2007.)Since 2005Image:Caesars Palace - Across Bellagio Lake.jpg|thumb|255px|Palace, acquired as part of Apollos LBO of EntertainmentThe 2005 - 2007 period marked a boom period in private equity with new largest buyout records set and surpassed several times in an 18-month window from the beginning of 2006 through the middle of 2007.(Samuelson, Robert J. The Private Equity Boom.  The Washington Post, March 15, 2007.)  Apollo was among the most active investors in leveraged buyout transactions during this period.  Although Apollo was involved in a number of notable and large buyouts, the firm largely avoided the very largest transactions of this period.  Among Apollos most notable investments during this period included Entertainment, a leading US gaming and casino company; Cruise Line, the cruise line operator; Stores, the retailer of costume jewelry; and Realogy, the real estate franchisor that owns Banker, 21 and International Realty.(In Private Equity, the Limits of Apollos Power.  New York Times, December 7, 2008)In August 2006, Apollo launched a $2 billion traded private equity vehicle in Europe, AP Alternative Assets (ENXTAM:AAA).(  The IPO of this new vehicle followed in the footsteps of Kravis Roberts, which raised $5 billion for its KKR Private Equity Investors vehicle in May 2006.(Timmons, Heather. Opening Private Equitys Door, at Least a Crack, to Public Investors. York Times, May 4, 2006.)  Apollo initially attempted to raise $2.5 billion for the public vehicle, but fell short when it offered the shares in June, raising only $1.5 billion. Apollo raised an additional $500 million via private placements in the weeks following that sale.(Apollo equity fund IPO falls short of its target.  International Herald Tribune, June 9, 2006)As the private equity industry expanded through 2006 and 2007, several of the largest private equity firms, most notably Blackstone Group and Kravis Roberts, announced plans to realize value from their firms through the sale of shares in the public equity markets.  Apollo Management chose a slightly different path, by completing a placement of shares in its management company in July 2007.  By pursuing a private placement rather than a public offering, Apollo would be able to avoid much of the public scrutiny applied to Blackstone and KKR.((Sorkin, Andrew Ross and De La Merced, Michael J.  Buyout Firm Said to Seek a Private Market Offering. York Times, July 18, 2007.)  In November 2007, Apollo was able to realize additional value from the sale of a 9% ownership interest in its management company to the Dhabi Investment Authority (ADIA).(Apollo chief says sold nine percent of firm to Abu Dhabi.  Reuters, November 7, 2007)  Ultimately, in April 2008, Apollo would file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC)( to permit some holders of its privately traded stock to sell their shares on the York Stock Exchange.(de la Merced, Michael J. Apollo Struggles to Keep Debt From Sinking Linens n Things. York Times, April 14, 2008.) In 2008, the firm opened an office in India, marking their first push into Asia.(Forget slowdown, PEs still heading to India.  The Economic Times, August 8, 2008)Image:2008-11-22 Linens n Things store closing in Durham.jpg|thumb|255px|left|Apollo lost its investment in retailer n Things with the companys 2008 bankruptcy(As the deterioration of the financial markets worsened into 2008, Apollo saw several of its investments come under pressure.  Apollos 2005 investment in the struggling US retailer, n Things suffered from a significant debt burden and softening consumer demand.  In May 2008, Linens was forced to file for bankruptcy protection, one of several high profile retail bankruptcies in 2008, costing Apollo all of its $365 million investment in the company.((  At the same time, Apollos investment in Claires, Realogy and Entertainment came under pressure.(  Apollo would respond actively to its investment difficulties seeking to exchange a portion of the existing debt at Harrahs and Realogy to more favorable securities(.  At Claires, Apollo exercised its toggle option to shut off cash interest payments to its bondholders and issue more debt instead, in order to provide the company with additional financial flexibility.(PIK and Roll: Companies Seize On Perks of Loose Lending .  Wall Street Journal, May 19, 2008)In December 2008, Apollo completed fundraising for its latest fund, Apollo Investment Fund VII with approximately $14.9 billion of investor commitments.  Apollo had been targeting $15 billion, but had been in fundraising for more than 16 months, with the bulk of the capital raised in 2007.(Apollo Closes Buyout Fund Near $15 Billion Target.  Wall Street Journal, January 23, 2009. Most recently, Apollo acquired Fair L.P. for about $650 million dollars cash. The company had seen profits plummet in the recent recession. Net income dropped more than $45 million from last year, and Cedar Fair was forced to sell. Apollo acquired more than 1.5 billion dollars of debt.) In December 2009, it was announced that Apollo would acquire Fair Entertainment Company shares and the company would be become private underneath the management group.(http://www.cedarfair.com/ir/press_releases/index.cfm?current_root15&modestory&story_id210) The deal includes a cash payment of $635 million and assumed debt which gives the transaction a value of $2.4 billion.( ) It was later announced in April 2010 that the deal was pulled due to poor shareholder response.(Cedar Fair: Takeover Not Happening.  Associated Press, April 6, 2010)In March 2011, the company announced plans for a $473 million IPO, giving it a market value of $6.4 billion. (Apollo Global Management launches $473 million IPO Renaissance Capital, March 21, 2011)Portfolio investmentsApollo has been an active private equity investor through the mid-2000s buyout boom.  The following is a list of Apollos most recent and currently active private equity investments.  The bulk of these investments are held in Apollo Investment Fund V, VI and VII.InvestmentYearCompany DescriptionRef.Entertainment2001In April 2001, Apollo made a $250 million cash infusion into AMC through a preferred stock that would convert into 64% of the company.  In 2004, Partners acquired a controlling interest in the company in a $2 billion transaction, with Apollo retaining 49.9% of AMC.(For a Theater Chain, A Revival May Be Near.  New York Times, January 27, 2002)(Theater Chain Still Slumps After Revealing Its Loan Deals.  New York Times, September 2, 2002)(J.P. Morgan To Control AMC Entertainment.  New York Times, July 23, 2004)Plastics2006In June 2009, Apollo and Graham Partners announced the acquisition of Berry Plastics Corporation, a maker of plastic containers, for $2.25 billion from Sachs Capital Partners and Partners.(Berry Plastics to Be Sold Again.  Reuters, June 29, 2006)Claires2007In March 2007, Apollo announced the $3.1 billion leveraged buyout of costume jewelry retailer, Claires Stores.  In 2008, Claires experienced financial difficulty amid the slump in consumer spending.(Costume Jewelry Retailer Agrees to a Takeover.  New York Times, March 21, 2007)(Wave of Bankruptcy Filings Expected From Retailers in Wake of Holidays.  Wall Street Journal, JANUARY 12, 2009)Countrywide plc2007In May 2007, Apollo acquired Countrywide plc, the leading provider of residential property related services in the UK, formerly known as Hambro Countrywide (1988) and Countrywide Assured Group (1998) for $1.05 billion (not related to Financial).(Apollo Sweetens Countrywide PLC Bid.  Wall Street Journal, April 13, 2007)Logistics2006In August 2006, N.V. announced that it had agreed to the sale of its logistics division to Apollo for $1.9 billion.  The business was re-branded as CEVA in November 2007.(Dutch Postal Deal.  Associated Press, August 24, 2006)Debt investments2008-2009Since the beginning of 2008, Apollo has been a significant acquiror of senior secured loans from banks and other financial institutions.  In April 2008, Apollo, Capital and Blackstone Group completed the acquisition of $12.5 billion of bank loans from Citigroup.  The portfolio comprised primarily senior secured leveraged loans that had been made to finance leveraged buyout transactions at the peak of the market.  Citigroup had been unable to syndicate the loans before the onset of the credit crunch.  The loans were reported to have been sold in the mid-80 cents on the dollar relative to face value.  In late 2008, it was reported that Apollo had received calls associated with the financing of its purchase of certain loan portfolios as the price of the loans decreased.(Citi Is Said to Be Near Deal to Sell $12.5 Billion of Loans.  New York Times, April 9, 2008)(Apollo, GSO Debt Funds Have Faced Margin Call Issues.  Wall Street Journal, November 12, 2008)(Black: Apollos debt bets were a little early.  Private Equity Online, January 23, 2009)Entertainment2006On December 19, 2006, Apollo and Capital announced an agreement to acquire the gaming company for $27.4 billion, including the assumption of existing debt.(Sorkin, Andrew Ross. Harrahs Is Said to Be in Talks to Accept $16.7 Billion Buyout. York Times, December 18, 2006.)Specialty Chemicals2005Hexion was formed in 2005 through the merger of Borden Chemical, Inc., Resolution Performance Products LLC, and Resolution Specialty Materials LLC, and the acquisition of Bakelite AG.  Hexion announced in July 2007 that it was acquiring Corporation, a major specialty chemicals company, in a $6.5 billion leveraged buyout.  Hexion announced in June 2008 it would refuse to close the deal, prompting a series of legal actions.  The transaction was officially terminated on December 14 after a settlement between Hexion and Huntsman, wherein they were required to pay Huntsman $1 billion to drop fraud charges that would have potentially sent the CEO of Apollo to prison.(Manufacturer of Chemicals Agrees to Bid From Apollo.  New York Times, July 13, 2007)(Huntsman Settles With Apollo, New York Times, December 14, 2008)Jacuzzi Brands2006In October 2006, Apollo announced a $990 million leveraged buyout of Jacuzzi Brands, the manufacturer of whirlpool baths.(Jacuzzi Brands Is Going Private.  Reuters, October 12, 2006)n Things2006In February 2006, Apollo completed the acquisition of the struggling US retailer of home textiles, housewares and decorative home accessories for $1.3 billion, announced in November 2005.  By 2008, the companys problems had increased as the economy slowed and Linens filed for bankruptcy protection in May 2008, one of several high profile retail bankruptcies in 2008.(Bankruptcy Protection for Retailer.  New York Times, May 3, 2008)( Apollo Struggles to Keep Debt From Sinking Linens n Things.  New York Times, April 14, 2008)(Furnishings Retailer Agrees to Go Private.  Reuters, November 9, 2005)Performance Materials2006 In June 2006, Apollo acquired Electrics Advanced Materials (Silicones & Quartz) business in a deal valued at approximately $3.8 billion.(Apollo Management to buy GE Advanced Materials Business.  AltAssets, September 18, 2006)Noranda Aluminum2007In April 2007, Apollo acquired the US aluminum business of the mining company Xstrata for $1.15 billion. The aluminum business, Noranda Aluminum, includes a primary smelter and three rolling mills in Tennessee, North Carolina and Arkansas along with other operations.(Mine Company Sells U.S. Unit.  New York Times, April 12, 2007)Cruise Line2008In January 2008, Apollo completed a $1 billion investment in the cruise line operator to support a recapitalization of the companys balance sheet.(Closes $1 Billion Investment by Apollo.  Reuters, January 7, 2008)Cruises2007In February, 2007, Apollo acquired the luxury cruise line and provided additional capital to fund the expansion of the company with the purchase of two new cruise ships.(Oceania Cruises sold to new owners.  USA Today, February 27, 2007)(Oceania Cruises Closes A Transaction With Apollo Management: Completes $850 Million Strategic Partnership.  Oceania Cruises press release, April 30, 2007)Realogy:*Banker*International Realty*21 Real Estate 2006In December 2006, Apollo announced an $8.5 billion buyout of the real estate franchisor that owns Coldwell Banker, Century 21 and Sothebys International Realty.  The transaction closed in April 2007 and was delisted from the York Stock Exchange.  As the housing market crash accelerated in 2008, Realogy faced financial pressures relating to its debt load.  In November 2008, Realogy launched an offer for a portion of its debt to provide additional flexibility, prompting a lawsuit from Icahn.(An End Run Around Realogys Lenders.  New York Times, November 27, 2008)(Latest Deal in Real Estate for $9 Billion.  New York Times, December 18, 2006)()(Icahn Sues Real Estate Company Over Debt.  New York Times, December 2, 2008)Seven Seas Cruises2008In February 2008, Apollo purchased the luxury cruise line from Companies for $1 billion. Following the purchase, Apollo made public their plans to order a new ship for Regent.(Apollo to buy cruise company Regent Seven Seas Cruises.  AltAssets, December 12, 2007)Rexnord2006In May 2006, Apollo announced the acquisition of the manufacturer of precision motion technology products, primarily focused on power transmission, from private equity firm Carlyle Group for $1.825 billion.((Carlyle to sell Rexnord Corporation to Apollo for $1.8bn.  AltAssets, May 25, 2006)& Final*Marketplace 2007In February 2007, Apollo announced the acquisition of the & Final chain of warehouse style food and supply stores.  In June 2007, Smart & Final completed the acquisition of the Marketplace chain of market style food retailers from Oats Markets as part of that companies acquisition by Foods Market.(Smart & Final sells to Apollo Management affiliate in $813.9M deal.  Los Angeles Business, February 20, 2007)(Whole Foods Deal.  Bloomberg, June 21, 2007)Vantium Management2008In May 2008, Apollo invested in Vantium, a company that buys residential mortgage assets as part of a strategy to profit from the housing market crash.(Apollo Management Invests in Buyer of Mortgage Assets.  New York Times, May 28, 2008)Paper2006In 2006, Apollo acquired Papers coated and supercalendered paper business for $1.4 billion, renaming the business, Verso Paper.  Verso has been the second largest producer for the North American magazine publishing and catalog/commercial print markets.  In May 2008, Verso was able to complete an public offering of stock.(Verso Paper turns a page with IPO; President & CEO Mike Jackson credits a foundation document, focused strategies, and talented employees for companys success.  Paper360, Oct, 2008)(Verso Paper Sets I.P.O. Range.  New York Times, April 29, 2008)Other investments include Academy and Unity Media GMBH.Affiliated businessesFrom its inception, Apollo built as part of a network of affiliated businesses focusing on equity and a variety of distressed investment strategies.Lion AdvisorsLion Advisors (or Lion Capital), which was founded at the same time as Apollo in 1990, focused on investment management and consulting services to foreign institutional accounts targeting investments in public and private high yield debt securities in the US.  In 1992, Lion entered into a more formal arrangement to manage the $3 billion high-yield portfolio for Credit Lyonnais which together with a consortium of other international investors provided the capital for Lions investment activities.  The Lion business would ultimately be replaced by Ares Management.(Ares Enhanced Loan Investment Strategy IR, Ltd. Prospectus. September 22, 2008)Ares ManagementAres Management, founded in 1997, was initially established to manage a $1.2 billion market value collateralized debt obligation vehicle.  Ares would grow to manage a family of loan obligation (CLO) vehicles that would invest in capital markets-based securities including senior bank loans and high-yield and mezzanine debt.  Ares was founded by Antony Ressler and John H. Kissick, both partners at Apollo as well as Bennett Rosenthal, who joined the group from the global leveraged finance group at Lynch.(Ares Management to Take New Fund Public.  Los Angeles Times, April 22, 2004)Ares I and II which were raised were structured as market value CLOs.  Ares III though Ares X  were structured as cash flow CLOs.  In 2002, Ares completed a spinout from Apollo management.  Although technically, the founders of Ares had completed a spinout with the formation of the firm in 1997, they had maintained a close relationship with Apollo over its first five years and operated as the West Coast affiliate of Apollo.   Shortly thereafter, Ares completed fundraising for Ares Corporate Opportunities Fund, a special situations investment fund with $750 million of capital under management.((In 2004, Ares debuted a publicly traded development company, Ares Capital Corporation (NASDAQ:ARCC).(Ares Capital IPO Raises $165 Million.  Los Angeles Times, October 06, 2004)  In 2006, Ares raised a $2.1 billion successor special situations fund (Ares Corporate Opportunities Fund II).(AREA Property Partners (Apollo Real Estate Advisors)AREA Property Partners, originally Apollo Real Estate, was founded in 1993 by William Mack, to take advantage of opportunities to purchase distressed properties as many real estate markets crashed in the early 1990s.(He Made Real Estate a Science: William L. Mack, W61.  Wharton School of Business Alumni Magazine, Spring 2007)  Apollo Real Estate Investment Fund, L.P., the first in a family of real estate opportunity funds was closed in April 1993 with $500 million of investor commitments.  As of 2008, the firm was investing out of three funds: Apollo Real Estate Investment Fund V, Apollo European Real Estate Fund II and Apollo Value Enhancement Fund VII. In 2004, Apollo Real Estate acquired the Value Enhancement Funds family of investment vehicles to broaden its offerings in the value-added segment of the real estate investment spectrum. Apollo also operates a real estate mezzanine lending program and real estate securities hedge fund called Claros Real Estate Securities Fund, L.P.(Apollo Real Estate Advisors closes Apollo Value Enhancement Fund VII with USD758m.  Hedge Week, July 8, 2008)ReferencesExternal linksApollo affiliates*Apollo Alternative Assets (ENXTAM:AAA) - European domiciled investment vehicle*Apollo Investment Corporation () - US development company*Apollo Real Estate Advisors*Aspect InvestmentsManagement
13740746
List_of_Gerry_Andersons_New_Captain_Scarlet_episodes
This is an episode guide for Andersons television series Andersons New Captain Scarlet, a CGI update of his Supermarionation series Scarlet and the Mysterons (19671968). Commissioned in March 2003,(CGI News) the first series was first broadcast between 12 February 2005 and 14 May 2005 (except 2 April). A second series followed between 1 September 2005 and 26 November 2005.(Captain Scarlet (2005) - Episode list)Series 1Instrument of Destruction Part 1Dateline - the day after tomorrow. When a mysterious extraplanetary signal is detected emanating from Mars, the world security organisation known as Spectrum sends agents Captain Scarlet and Captain Black to investigate. Reaching the red planet, the two men leave their ship and head for the surface in their Bison Alien Terrain Vehicle, where they soon discover the source of the signals; a huge alien city, which materialises before them. The aliens dispatch a probe to examine the Earth vehicle, but Black assumes it to be hostile, and fires a burst of missiles which destroys the entire city. However, the alien buildings immediately reform, and the citys inhabitants, the Mysterons, retaliate by killing Black and declaring war on Earth. Scarlet manages to return to Earth with Blacks body, which receives a heros burial; the ceremony is a sombre one, attended by Blacks colleagues and his bereaved girlfriend, Destiny Angel. Later, the head of Spectrum, Colonel White, calls a meeting to discuss the Mysteron threat. But the aliens then take over Captain Scarlet to act as their instrument of destruction - and Scarlets first act is to disable the engines that keep Spectrums mighty Skybase aloft...Wayne Forester (Captain Scarlet), Robbie Stevens (Captain Blue / Skybase Engineer), Emma Tate (Destiny Angel), Mike Hayley (Colonel White / Voice of the Mysterons / Narrator), Jules De Jongh (Lieutenant Green / Shuttle Computer / Skybase Control), Nigel Plaskitt (Captain Black / Doctor Gold / Hank McGill).(Gerry Anderson Encyclopedia Page on Instrument Of Destruction Part 1)Instrument of Destruction Part 2After Captain Black steals a quantity of nuclear fuel rods from a military research centre, Colonel White sends Captain Scarlet and Captain Blue to New York to work with the FBI in tracking down the Mysteron agent, now branded as an international terrorist. White addresses the delegates at a UN conference on the Mysteron threat, unaware that Black has infiltrated the UN Tower and taken over the Russian representative, Colonel Zamatev. Under Mysteron control, Zamatev questions Skybases defences, and promises to supply his own Vampire jets to guard the Spectrum base. Believing that Whites life is under threat from Captain Black, Scarlet and Blue race to the UN Tower, and as Black takes aim Scarlet bursts through a window and takes the shot meant for his commanding officer. Destiny confronts Black at gunpoint, but her feelings for her dead lover enable him to overpower her and escape. While Destiny struggles to decide whether she should remain in Spectrum, Black destroys the vehicle transporting the Russian jet pilots, who are then recreated as Mysteron agents. Learning that Trans Global trucks are transporting the missing fuel rods, Scarlet and Blue are sent to stop them. The Vampire jets attack Skybase, but are swiftly dealt with by the Angels; however, the Mysterons manage to tamper with Destinys plane, locking the controls and sending it on a collision course towards Skybase. Meanwhile, Scarlet is captured by Black, and learns that the Mysteron agent has amassed enough fuel rods to create a bomb that will blow the Earth in halfWayne Forester (Captain Scarlet), Robbie Stevens (Captain Blue / General Zamatev / Airman 2 / John Bishop), Emma Tate (Destiny Angel), Mike Hayley (Colonel White / Agent Avery / Airman 1), Jules de Jongh (Lieutenant Green / Harmony Angel / Symphony Angel), Nigel Plaskitt (Captain Black / Hank McGill)Rain of TerrorOn a snowy mountain pass, Captain Black triggers an avalanche and destroys a truck containing a revolutionary new chemical compound. Some time later, in the African desert, Captain Scarlet assists Professor Susan Todd of Hydra Laboratories with an experimental rainmaking project. After the Angel Interceptors release a special chemical into the atmosphere a mass of water-heavy clouds quickly forms, and rain begins to fall onto the dry desert plain below. Todd is ecstatic, and dances in triumph in the downpour. She and Scarlet return to Skybase to meet up with Todds colleague, Professor Vandamm, but when Todd boards Spectrum headquarters she begins to hallucinate; now displaying signs of paranoia, Todd pulls a gun, shoots Colonel White in the arm, and takes Vandamm hostage, demanding to be taken off Skybase immediately. Destiny Angel tries to overpower Todd, but in the confusion the scientist falls from a walkway to her death. Vandamm attributes his colleagues bizarre behaviour to overwork, but White is suspicious, and instructs Scarlet to investigate the test site, while he returns to Hydra Laboratories with Vandamm. Scarlet plays back the recording of the experiment and discovers that a pack of meerkats was also exposed to the rain; he soon finds the animals, but they have all been killed by one of their number, which is now inexplicably crazed with fear. Scarlet warns White that the Mysterons have somehow taken over Hydras experiment, and if the next test goes ahead, then thousands of people will start massacring each other. But before White can act he is knocked out by Vandamms new assistant  none other than Captain Black. With no one to stop it, Hydras Condor airplane takes off on a mission to seed the atmosphere with the Mysteronised rainmaking chemicalsWayne Forester (Captain Scarlet),  Emma Tate (Destiny Angel), Mike Hayley (Colonel White), Jules de Jongh (Lieutenant Green / Professor Susan Todd), Nigel Plaskitt (Captain Black / Doctor Gold / Hydra Control), Robbie Stevens (Theo Vandamm / Condor Pilot)Mercury FallingCaptain Blue and Destiny Angel pilot the International Space Agency shuttle Mercury on a top secret mission into space; they are to deploy a new satellite into Earth orbit, which will provide early warning of an imminent attack by identifying Mysteron energy on Mars. However, just as Mercury achieves orbit the shuttles controls are taken over by an outside force, and its systems lock onto a new flight path; Spectrum then receives a transmission from an unidentified extortionist who demands a ransom of $50 million in diamonds or else they will initiate Mercurys re-entry over North America and crash the shuttle onto Washington DC. Captain Scarlet heads for the launch facility to investigate, but when he arrives he learns from Doctor Celine Kopalski that Captain Black is already on the base; Scarlet tracks down the Mysteron agent, but Black evades capture and makes off in Scarlets Cheetah RRV; with Scarlet in pursuit in a helicopter, a high-speed chase ensues, ending when Harmony Angel arrives in an Interceptor and blows up the RRV, apparently destroying Black. Back on the shuttle, Blue and Destiny are informed that the U.S. Government has agreed to meet the ransom demands, and that Kopalski has been chosen to deliver the diamonds to a drop-point in an old abandoned mining town named Prosperity. However, Kopalski is actually the saboteur, and she switches the briefcases and steals the diamonds. But when she returns home with her ill-gotten gains she meets Captain Black, who hypnotises her into revealing the location of the laptop that is controlling the shuttles systems. Black obtains the device and uses it to set Mercury on a collision course with the White HouseWayne Forester (Captain Scarlet), Robbie Stevens (Captain Blue / Captain Grey), Emma Tate (Destiny Angel), Mike Hayley (Colonel White), Jules de Jongh (Lieutenant Green / Harmony Angel), Nigel Plaskitt (Captain Black), Julia Brahms (Doctor Celine Kopalski), Jeremy Hitchen (Technician)The HomecomingWhen an unidentified object is detected entering Earths atmosphere, Colonel White orders the Angels to immediately launch. The team identify the object as an old space capsule, which is heading for a crash-landing in the Arctic Circle. Captain Scarlet and Captain Blue investigate and discover that the capsule is an escape pod from the Endeavor II, a manned mission to Jupiter which mysteriously disappeared fifteen years ago. Entering the capsule, Scarlet and Blue find that two members of the three-man crew have died inside their cryogenic tubes; however, the third occupant is still alive, and is none other than Commander Lewis, Lieutenant Greens father. Lewis is taken back to Skybase, where he is checked over by Doctor Gold - but Lewis is in fact a Mysteron replicant, and when Gold attempts to take a blood sample from him, in order to test his DNA, Lewis hypnotises the doctor and makes him take the sample from himself instead. Now given the all-clear, Lewis is reunited with his daughter, Serena. She accompanies him to the Space Agency in New Mexico - unaware that her father intends to blow up the bases reactor, causing a gigantic explosion that will leave nothing but a smoking hole from California to TexasWayne Forester (Captain Scarlet), Robbie Stevens (Captain Blue), Emma Tate (Destiny Angel), Mike Hayley (Colonel White), Jules de Jongh (Lieutenant Green), Nigel Plaskitt (Doctor Gold), Bill Roberts (Commander Guy Lewis), Jeremy Hitchen (Major Franks)ChillerIn a remote diner in Phoenix, Arizona, Spectrum flight engineer Xander Story makes contact with two Mysteron Agents. Story agrees to destroy Spectrums Skybase in return for the aliens promise that they will halt their war on mankind - and also accepts the large suitcase of money they give him. Story is about to leave when Captain Scarlet bursts in; a gunfight ensues, but quickly ends when Captain Scarlet is shot and killed. Knowing that his body will soon return to life, the Mysterons tie Scarlet to a pillar, hijack a petro-chemical truck, and drive the vehicle into the diner, completely destroying the premises in a massive explosion. Searching for Scarlet, Captain Blue finds his badly devastated body and takes it back to Skybase. However, Doctor Gold finds that Scarlets injuries are too severe, and with no sign of the retrometabolisation process taking place, he is forced to pronounce the agent dead. While Destiny and Blue grieve for their lost friend, Story arrives on board Skybase, with a bomb secreted in his engineering case. Back in sickbay, Scarlet regains consciousness, only to find that no one can see or hear him, and that he has somehow become intangible  it looks like Scarlet has become a ghostWayne Forester (Captain Scarlet), Robbie Stevens (Captain Blue / Black Suit), Emma Tate (Destiny Angel), Mike Hayley (Colonel White), Jules de Jongh (Lieutenant Green / Harmony Angel / PA Voice), Nigel Plaskitt (Doctor Gold / Trucker / Stormtrooper), Jeremy Hitchen (Xander Story)Rat TrapWhen Spectrum loses contact with Elysium base on Mars, Colonel White sends Captain Scarlet, Captain Blue, Doctor Gold, and Destiny and Harmony Angels to investigate. After achieving Mars orbit, the team heads for the planets surface in the shuttles excursion vehicle, only to immediately come under missile attack from the base. Destiny manages to make a crash landing, but the craft is badly damaged; the only way off the planet lies at Elysium  which is taken to now be under Mysteron control. Boarding their Bison Alien Terrain Vehicle, Scarlet and the others head for Elysium. En route the come across a Bison which came from Elysium, and its three crewmen have died from lack of oxygen while apparently fleeing from their base. Arriving at Elysium, the Spectrum team discover that the remaining members of the bases volunteer personnel have all been brutally murdered. Destiny and Harmony attempt to access the bases shuttle, only to find that its systems have been sabotaged. It isnt long before the Spectrum team discover the saboteur: a robotic Remote Acquisition Technology (RAT) probe designed for use in hostile environments, has been taken over by the Mysterons and turned into a deadly killing machine. Using Captain Blue for bait, Scarlet manages to lure the RAT out into the open; he then jumps the robot like a cowboy riding a bronco, and destroys it with a mine. However, Scarlet and Blue then learn that there is a second RAT which also under Mysteron control  and it is heading straight for DestinyWayne Forester (Captain Scarlet), Robbie Stevens (Captain Blue), Emma Tate (Destiny Angel), Mike Hayley (Colonel White / Voice of the Mysterons), Nigel Plaskitt (Doctor Gold), Jules de Jongh (Harmony Angel)SwarmA USAF transport plane is detected on a collision course with Skybase; Colonel White orders the Angels on intercept launch, and when the plane fails to respond to hails, Destiny shoots it down. However, the explosion unleashes a swarm of green insects, which immediately cover Destinys Interceptor. The bugs enter the plane through its engine intake, and immediately begin to disrupt its systems. With her craft out of control, Destiny launches her escape pod, but the creatures cling to its hull and begin eating through the metal in order to reach her inside. Realising that she cannot land on Skybase, Destiny decides to eject, only to learn that the bugs have damaged her parachute. Captain Scarlet instructs her to eject anyway, and then skydives off Skybases landing platform after her; just in time he reaches Destiny and activates his own chute, landing them both safely. Later, Colonel White informs his staff that the transport plane contained a consignment of experimental cyber bugs, which had been taken over by the Mysterons. Believing the threat to be over, Destiny returns to her quarters, unaware that a solitary bug has secreted itself in her G-suit. It isnt long before the creature reproduces itself, creating a massive swarm that quickly infects Skybases systems; the creatures then capture the sleeping form of Lieutenant Green, tapping into her brain in order to learn the location of Skybases atomic reactorWayne Forester (Captain Scarlet), Robbie Stevens (Captain Blue / Control Operative), Emma Tate (Destiny Angel / Lieutenant Silver), Mike Hayley (Colonel White), Jules de Jongh (Lieutenant Green / Harmony Angel / Symphony Angel), Nigel Plaskitt (Doctor Gold / Technician), Heather Tobias (Melody Angel), Julia Brahms (Rhapsody Angel)Circles of DoomBored with her leave of duty, Destiny rejoins her fellow Angels at an air show held at an air base in Southern England. But as the team carries out a breathtaking practice run of their aerobatic display, Captain Black appears and uses a Mysteron device to shut down all the digital electronic systems in the area. As the systems aboard the Angel interceptors go out of control, Harmonys plane flies too close to Destinys and damages its wing; Harmony manages to eject before her aircraft crashes into the fields below, but Destiny can only watch helplessly as her Interceptor sets itself onto a collision course with the Control Tower. However, at the last minute, Black deactivates the device, and Destiny makes a safe landing. Back aboard Skybase, Colonel White is concerned that a recurrence of the breakdown could have terrible consequences for the planet; he also informs his team of a series of crop circles that have appeared within the footprint of the anomaly. Captain Scarlet and Captain Blue take a Hummingbird helicopter to investigate the circle that lies at the mathematical centre of the affected area, but when they arrive, the circle has mysteriously vanished. Scarlet suddenly feels nauseous, indicating a Mysteron presence nearby, and then Blue discovers that the Hummingbirds power has been drained. The crop circle reappears around them and immediately sinks into the ground, taking Scarlet, Blue and the helicopter with it. At the bottom of the shaft, the two Spectrum agents come face-to-face with Captain Black; the Mysterons speak through the rogue agent, demanding Mankinds surrender in twenty-four hours or else they will trigger a world-wide technological failure that will destroy everyone on the planetWayne Forester (Captain Scarlet), Robbie Stevens (Captain Blue / Vampire 3), Emma Tate (Destiny Angel), Mike Hayley (Colonel White / Voice of The Mysterons), Jules de Jongh (Lieutenant Green / Harmony Angel), Nigel Plaskitt (Captain Black), Jeremy Hitchen (Flight Controller / Vampire 2), Bill Roberts (Vampire 1)Trap for a RhinoIn the Scottish Highlands, an elderly lady named Mrs Mackenzie is alarmed to see green lights hovering over the nearby Grampian Nuclear Power Station; she reports the incident to the authorities, but no one believes her. When Colonel White learns of the incident he immediately sends Captain Scarlet to investigate the power station while Harmony Angel, who is currently attending the nearby Spectrum Flight Training School, is ordered to pay a visit to Mrs Mackenzie. Accompanied by Cadet Johnson, Harmony takes a Hummingbird helicopter and sets off for the old ladys house, unaware that her colleague has just been taken over by the Mysterons. Scarlet is assured by the power stations Head of Security that not one of the four hundred personnel has seen anything unusual; meanwhile, Harmony finds everything at Mrs Mackenzies cottage appears to be normal  until Johnson and the Mysteronised Mrs Mackenzie attack and overpower her. Harmony is forced at gunpoint to report in to White, but she manages to give a coded emergency signal; White responds by setting Spectrum on alert status and instructing Scarlet to head directly to the cottage to investigate. However, this chain of events has been carefully orchestrated by the Mysterons, who plan to hijack Scarlets Rhino and use its heavy weaponry to blow up the nuclear power stationWayne Forester (Captain Scarlet), Emma Tate (Destiny Angel), Mike Hayley (Colonel White), Jules de Jongh (Lieutenant Green / Harmony Angel), Suzy Westerby (Mrs Mackenzie), Jeremy Hitchen (Cadet Johnson / Albatross Pilot / PA Voice), Robbie Stevens (Head of Security / Policeman), Nigel Plaskitt (Security Guard)The Achilles MessengerAt the Spectrum Training Base in Castle Balmeath, Scotland, Captain Scarlet and Destiny Angel are subjected to interrogation resistance testing and psychological profiling. Scarlet soon tires of the inefficiency of the bases staff, and, to make a point, he escapes from his cell, frees Destiny, and together they make off on a motorcycle - much to the annoyance of the base commander, the frosty Astrid Winters. Later that night, Winters is killed in a car crash orchestrated by the Mysterons and is resurrected as a replicant; however, when she returns to the base, instead of killing Captain Scarlet, Winters reveals that she represents a faction of the Mysteron consciousness which believes the war with Earth is a mistake. She offers to hand over information on how to defeat the Mysterons, but insists that she will only tell it to Colonel White in person; as proof of her good faith she also reveals that the Mysterons are planning to murder Earths scientific elite at a gathering of the World Science Congress. Unsure whether or not to trust Winters, White sends Captain Blue and Captain Ochre to investigate the conference, and assigns Scarlet to protect Winters while she is held at the castle. Meanwhile, having learnt of Winters traitorous intentions, Mysteron troops attack the castle and prepare to destroy it with heavily-armed helicoptersWayne Forester (Captain Scarlet), Robbie Stevens (Captain Blue), Emma Tate (Destiny Angel), Mike Hayley (Colonel White), Nigel Plaskitt (Captain Black / Stormtrooper), Julia Brahms (Captain Ochre), Jules de Jongh (Astrid Winters), Bill Roberts (Interrogator), Jeremy Hitchen (Guard / Farmer)Skin DeepAs Scarlet and Destiny enjoy a spot of mountain climbing in the desert they are contacted by Colonel White, who informs Destiny that she has been chosen by the Aerospace Research Unit to help test their new flight guidance system. Some time later, as Destiny heads for the Falcon Air Base, she is overtaken by a speeding car, which then swerves off the road and crashes; Destiny goes to help, only to find the car empty  too late, she realises it is a trap, and she is captured at gunpoint by Captain Black. Some time later, Destiny breaks into the International Defence Force Headquarters, steals a set of top-secret missile launch codes, and badly injures a security guard while making her escape. When White shows Scarlet the security video recording of Destinys actions, he is devastated  the woman he loves has gone, and she is now under Mysteron control. Scarlet immediately sets out to locate and kill the rogue Destiny. However, he is unaware that the person he saw committing the crime was in fact an agent named Gina Martineri, who has been transformed into a perfect double of Destiny using a device created by the German scientist Herr Janus; Black is holding the real Destiny prisoner at Janus clinic, and has forced the scientist to use his device on Martineri as part of a plan to destroy Spectrum once and for allWayne Forester (Captain Scarlet), Emma Tate (Destiny Angel / Gina Martineri), Mike Hayley (Colonel White), Jules de Jongh (Lieutenant Green), Nigel Plaskitt (Captain Black), Jeremy Hitchen (Herr Janus / Spectrum Guard), Robbie Stevens (Armed Guard), Bill Roberts (Duty Guard)HeistColonel Whites dinner with his daughter Victoria is interrupted by Lieutenant Green, who reports that a Vampire fighter jet has been hijacked from the USAF base at Little Marwood and is now targeting the Schleswig-Holstein nuclear plant in Germany. Together with his bodyguards for the evening, Captain Scarlet, Destiny Angel and Captain Blue, White sets off in pursuit of the hijacked plane in a Spectrum Hummingbird Helicopter; they soon meet up with the Angels Interceptors en route, and the stolen Vampire is swiftly shot down. However, while Spectrums attention is distracted, Victoria is kidnapped by three men and held hostage. When Whites wife, Diana, contacts him with the news, the Colonel immediately leaves Skybase in a Stallion Raid Bike and heads for home; here, he is contacted by the kidnappers, who threaten to kill Victoria unless White uses a Spectrum Rhino and helps them mount an attack on an armoured express train en route to Paris so that they can steal its cargo of $1 billion in gold bullion. White has no choice but to accept  unaware that the entire operation has been masterminded by Captain Black, who plans to discredit White so that the Colonel will be relieved of his command of SpectrumWayne Forester (Captain Scarlet), Robbie Stevens (Captain Blue), Emma Tate (Destiny Angel / Diana Grey), Mike Hayley (Colonel White), Jules de Jongh (Lieutenant Green / Harmony Angel), Nigel Plaskitt (Captain Black / Doctor Gold), Julia Brahms (Victoria Grey), Jeremy Hitchen (Graves / Vampire Pilot), Bill Roberts (Fox), Glenn Wrage (Controller)Series 2VirusHaving completed an inspection of Spectrums Skybase, the U.S. Secretary of State returns to her office in New York escorted by the Angels, only to be attacked en route by three enemy Vampire jets. Although the Angels make swift work of destroying their assailants, Destiny only just manages to escape death when her aircraft is hit and sent smashing into the sea below. Destiny is brought back to Skybase, where she is instructed by Doctor Gold to spend the next thirty-six hours recuperating in Sickbay. Meanwhile, U.S. Special Security Council member Miguel Fernandez is busy working at his sea front home in Spain when he receives a mysterious email; when Fernandez reads it a strange signal causes him to slip into a trance, and compels him to walk into the ocean and drown himself. Suspecting a connection between Fernandezs apparent suicide and the recent death of another member of the Security Council, Colonel White calls in Captain Scarlet and Captain Blue to investigate. However, when Captain Blue checks Fernandezs computer he too reads the email and becomes infected with its virus; unaware, Scarlet instructs Blue to upload the contents of the PCs hard drive to Skybases Spectrumnet computer for examination, unwittingly allowing the virus to infect every member of Spectrums personnel via their computer screens. Captain Scarlet and Captain Blue then set off in their Cheetah RRV  but Blue, now under the virus control, takes over the controls and drives the vehicle off a cliffWayne Forester (Captain Scarlet), Robbie Stevens (Captain Blue / Miguel Fernandez), Emma Tate (Destiny Angel / UN Secretary), Mike Hayley (Colonel White), Jules de Jongh (Lieutenant Green / Symphony Angel / Arantza / Central Control Computer Voice), Julia Brahms (Captain Ochre / Rhapsody Angel),  Jeremy Hitchen (Captain Magenta / Fernandezs Computer Voice), Nigel Plaskitt (Doctor Gold / Alert Voice), Heather Tobias (Melody Angel)ContactWhile climbing a mountain rock face in Arizona, Doctor Phil Bogart is attacked by a Mysteronised eagle and plummets to his death. Brought back to life as a Mysteron agent, Phil returns to the Tier Research facility, where he steals a Thunderpulse bomb  a sonic displacement weapon  before destroying the complex. Learning of the disappearance of the entire research complex, Colonel White and his team determine that Bogart has been taken over by the enemy, and is planning on using the bomb to destroy a major city. Phil shares a psychic link with his twin brother, Frank, so Captain Scarlet and Captain Blue pay a visit to the prison where Frank is incarcerated, after having used his gift to pursue a life of crime. Frank agrees to help, but only plays along with the two Spectrum agents so that he can escape at the first opportunity; left alone in his brothers apartment on the forty-third floor, Frank climbs out a window and makes for the roof of an external lift to aid his descent. However, Scarlet and Blue give chase in a Rhino, and they soon apprehend the fleeing crook. Frank is taken back to Skybase where he is coerced into using his E.S.P. to track his brother; however, on making contact, he is possessed by the Mysterons and sent to kill Colonel WhiteWayne Forester (Captain Scarlet), Robbie Stevens (Captain Blue), Mike Hayley (Colonel White), Jules de Jongh (Lieutenant Green), Nigel Plaskitt (Doctor Gold / Tyr Guard), Jeremy Hitchen (Dr. Philip Bogart / Frank Bogart)EnigmaWhen Spectrum detects a massive unidentified spaceship leaving Mars on a collision course for Earth, Colonel White immediately scrambles the Angels to intercept. The Interceptors missiles have no effect, and it looks like the Mysterons have targeted Skybase; however, at the last possible moment, the huge spaceship changes course and lands in the Northern Territory of Australia. Captains Scarlet, Blue, Ochre and Grey set off to investigate and soon arrive in the Outback, where the colossal Mysteron ship has settled. When the Spectrum party approaches the vessel they are suddenly teleported inside, finding themselves in a surreal and astonishing environment that no human has ever seen before. But as the quartet study their surroundings they unwittingly become the subjects of the Mysterons latest round of mind gamesWayne Forester (Captain Scarlet), Robbie Stevens (Captain Blue / Captain Grey / Newsreader #2), Emma Tate (Destiny Angel), Mike Hayley (Colonel White / Voice of the Mysterons), Jules de Jongh (Lieutenant Green / Newsreader #1), Nigel Plaskitt (Captain Black), Julia Brahms (Captain Ochre)Best of EnemiesAs Captain Black drives a snow truck through Russias frozen wastes, he is unaware that he is being followed by Captain Scarlet in a Spectrum Rhino. Black makes a rendezvous with a group of men from the Russian Navy Technology Division and takes delivery of a prototype organic limpet mine; the Mysteron agent then defers on making payment by killing his contacts. As an Arctic storm approaches Black makes a hasty exit, but Scarlet cuts off his only escape route by blowing up a bridge with his Rhinos missiles. When Black attempts to outrun his enemy he crashes his vehicle, apparently knocking himself out; but the Mysteron agent is playing possum, and Scarlets compassion for his former friend allows Black to overpower him. After Blacks vehicle slips off the ice and into the frozen water below, the Mysteron decides to take the Rhino and leave Scarlet to freeze to death. However, to Blacks fury he finds that Scarlet has locked down the vehicle, preventing him from using it. Scarlet comes to and manages to get inside the Rhino by its emergency exit  but then the ice gives way, and the Spectrum vehicle falls into the icy depths with Scarlet and Black trapped insideWayne Forester (Captain Scarlet), Robbie Stevens (Captain Blue / Russian), Emma Tate (Destiny Angel), Mike Hayley (Colonel White), Nigel Plaskitt (Captain Black / Rhino Computer Voice), Jules de Jongh (Lieutenant Green), Julia Brahms (Captain Ochre)ProteusSpectrum is assisting with sea trials of a new stealth warship, Proteus. After the vessels computer-controlled camouflage system thwarts an attack run by the Angels, Colonel White, Captain Scarlet and Lieutenant Green remain on board to look around. While the Captain shows White and Scarlet the ships complement of powerful Crusader X50 missiles, First Officer Eden gives Lieutenant Green a tour of the ships computer room; however, when Eden attempts to use a control console he is electrocuted by a blast of Mysteron energy, and, as Green looks on, the Mysterons take over the mainframe and seize control of Proteus. Having jammed all communications systems, the Mysterons use their influence to turn the vessels maintenance robots into mechanised killers, injuring White with a laser blast. Meanwhile, the ships navigator, Mr Viegler, panics and makes off in the Spectrum agents Hummingbird Helicopter; but as he lifts off, the helicopter is shot down by the ships anti-aircraft guns. Realising that they are trapped aboard Proteus with no way of warning Spectrum, Scarlet instructs Green to look after the Colonel, while he tries to find a way to stop the rogue vessel. On reaching the bridge, Spectrum meets the Captain, now recreated as a Mysteron agent; the Captain gloatingly informs Scarlet that Proteus is now on an intercept course for a warship carrying the President of the Chinese Peoples Republic  by destroying the foreign vessel and leaving evidence of U.S involvement, the Mysterons intend to trigger a new World WarWayne Forester (Captain Scarlet), Robbie Stevens (Captain Blue / Lieutenant Feagler / Chinese Captain), Emma Tate (Destiny Angel / Lieutenant Silver / Computer Voice), Mike Hayley (Colonel White), Jules de Jongh (Lieutenant Green / Symphony Angel), Glenn Wrage (Captain Holzer), Jeremy Hitchen (Lieutenant Eden / Chinese President)Syrtis MajorSpectrum mounts an aerial raid on the headquarters of Vulcan Industries. Colonel White confronts the board of governors over their recent breach of the Martian Exclusion Directive: despite the fact that the companys durinium mining operation on Syrtis Major was suspended some time ago, a three man maintenance team recently left for Mars. On learning that all contact with these engineers has since been lost, Colonel White sends Captain Scarlet, Captain Blue, Captain Ochre, Destiny Angel and Doctor Gold to investigate. Accompanied by Griggs, chief engineer from Vulcan Industries, the team soon arrives at the abandoned mining complex; after a search of the base proves fruitless, Destiny remains behind in the operations room while Scarlet and the others head for the mines to search the tunnels for the missing engineers; Blue notes that the tunnels are filled with a strange gas, but Griggs dismisses it as harmless. Back in the Ops room, Destiny comes face-to-face with Captain Black, who appears to have stowed away with the maintenance team. Meanwhile, Scarlet and his party find one of the engineers, Roberts, but the man flees from them in terror; when Scarlet gives chase he comes under attack by the other two engineers, and Roberts is killed by a mining laser. After Blue manages to disarm the men, an examination by Doctor Gold reveals that they are still human, and not Mysteron replicants. It seems that something is making everyone paranoid  and when it affects the Spectrum agents they begin to turn on one anotherWayne Forester (Captain Scarlet), Robbie Stevens (Captain Blue), Emma Tate (Destiny Angel), Mike Hayley (Colonel White), Nigel Plaskitt (Captain Black / Doctor Gold / Oldfield), Julia Brahms (Captain Ochre), Jeremy Hitchen (John Griggs / Roberts), Jules de Jongh (Computer Voice)Fallen AngelsWhile Colonel White, Captain Blue and Captain Ochre are at the World Summit Conference, Captain Scarlet is assigned command of Spectrum as it oversees security, helped by Lieutenant Green. Meanwhile, Destiny returns from her latest mission, having shot down wreckage from an old U.N. space station before it could fall to Earth. However, as the Angel returns to base, the plane containing White is attacked by four Canadian Air Force Vampire jets under Mysteron control, she joins the other Angels, and a deadly dogfight ensues. Although all the enemy fighters are dealt with, Harmony and Melody are forced to eject when their fighters are shot down, while Destiny only just manages to bail out after her jet is hit by shrapnel. To the delight of the three Angels, they come to land on the beach of a beautiful desert island, and when Destiny checks in with Captain Scarlet, she learns that she, Harmony and Melody must remain on the island for the next twenty-four hours, as all other Spectrum aircraft are on alert for the conference. However, the Angels stay in paradise will be short-lived  out at sea, a gang of vicious pirates are killed by Mysteron intervention, and then brought back under the aliens control. The Mysterons then instruct the bandits to head for the island and capture the Angels  by forcing the trio to reveal the location of the summit, the Mysterons can then kill every world leader with a single, deadly blowWayne Forester (Captain Scarlet), Robbie Stevens (Captain Blue / OBrien / Chang), Emma Tate (Destiny Angel), Mike Hayley (Colonel White / Voice of the Mysterons), Jules de Jongh (Lieutenant Green / Harmony Angel), Julie Brahams (Captain Ocher), Heather Tobias (Melody Angel / Vane), Nigel Plaskit (Kreuger)Storm at the End of the WorldThe Mysterons steal a Druzynik armoured tank from a Russian War Games exercise, and use its firepower to destroy the small town of Ragnarok; the entire population is massacred and then replicated under Mysteron control. Searching for the missing tank the following morning, Captain Scarlet and Captain Blue discover it lying abandoned in the snowy countryside; instantly suspicious, the two Spectrum agents decide to investigate the nearest town: Ragnarok. Unaware that the entire town is a Mysteron replica, Scarlet and Blue find its streets deserted; seeking shelter from the intense cold in a diner they help themselves to some coffee, but the pot is drugged, and both agents slip into unconsciousness. When they come to, Scarlet and Blue find themselves held prisoner in the local mine, where the townsfolk have been set to work digging at the rock face. Forced to join the workforce, Scarlet and Blue wonder what the Mysterons are digging for; they soon find out when an ancient meteorite is uncovered. The Mysterons inform the Spectrum agents that the rock contains lethal alien spores that have been in hibernation since the meteor crashed into the icy permafrost millions of years ago. The Mysterons plan to infect each of the townsfolk with the deadly spores, turning them into plague carriers that will infect and kill everyone on Earth in just four weeksWayne Forester (Captain Scarlet), Robbie Stevens (Captain Blue), Mike Hayley (Colonel White / Doc Reacher), Jules de Jongh (Lieutenant Green), Nigel Plaskitt (Doctor Gold / Miner), Julia Brahms (Captain Ochre / Katie)DuelFollowing a tip-off that the Mysterons are about to obtain a deadly nerve agent, Spectrum attempts to break up the exchange as it takes place on a New York rooftop; however, the agent buying the weapon makes off in a helijet, while the courier speeds away on a motorbike. Avoiding heavy gunfire, Scarlet follows the jet on his Skyrider, while Captain Blue and Captain Ochre pursue and capture the biker in their Cheetah RRV. After a high-speed chase through skyscrapers, Scarlet manages to climb aboard the helijet and secure the canister, dealing with the Mysteron agents in the process. However, when the retrieved canister of nerve agent is taken back to Skybase for inspection, it is discovered that it merely contains nitrous oxide: laughing gas; furthermore, the agents involved in the exchange were humans, in league with the Mysterons. Realising that they have been duped, Scarlet heads to Egypt to question their informant, Zuca, over his apparent double-cross; the Egyptian confesses that he only learned that his information was a decoy after he passed it on, and reveals that the Mysterons real target is the lunar holiday camp Tranquility. Realising that this is where Destiny and Lieutenant Green are taking their vacation, Scarlet sets off to warn them  unaware that Zuca is really a Mysteron replicant sending him into a trap. On the moon, Destiny and Green arrange for Tranquilitys evacuation by sending its holidaymakers out on lunar excursions while routine maintenance is carried out; they are then joined by Scarlet and Blue, who have left Ochre and Magenta to deal with a distress call from one of Tranquilitys excursion vehicles. However, when Tranquilitys communications are jammed and contact is lost with Ochre and Magenta, Scarlet sets off in his Bison vehicle to investigate; he finds their Bison out on the lunar surface  now with Captain Black aboard. The Mysteron agent reveals that Scarlet has fallen into his trap  and now the two of them must face off in a duel to the deathWayne Forester (Captain Scarlet), Robbie Stevens (Captain Blue), Emma Tate (Destiny Angel), Mike Hayley (Colonel White / Zuka / Denim), Jules de Jongh (Lieutenant Green / Bison Computer Voice), Nigel Plaskitt (Captain Black), Julia Brahms (Captain Ochre / Ava Gordon), Glen Wrage (Black Suit / EV16 Mayday Voice)Shape ShifterWhen two Mysteron agents break into the Laroux Foundation in Louisiana and attempt to sabotage its particle collider, they come face to face with Captain Scarlet; during the ensuing firefight a bullet shatters a container tank, releasing a strange, yellow gas into the atmosphere. The replicants escape into the sewers below, but Scarlet gives chase and kills them both; however, the Mysterons take over the gas and use it to create another Captain Scarlet, who promptly shoots the real Captain Scarlet dead, dumps his body in a nearby swamp, and then heads for Skybase. Captain Scarlets body is saved from being eaten by an alligator by two hicks named Zachary and Eli; the two men loot Scarlet of his equipment, and then decide to bury his body in the morning. Meanwhile, the fake Captain Scarlet arrives on Skybase, passes the routine DNA screening, and transforms himself into the appearance of anyone he touches. The following morning, the ersatz Scarlet attempts to assassinate Colonel White while he works out in the gym; Captain Blue tries to stop him, but the fake Scarlets shot goes wide and shatters a window. The Mysteron is instantly sucked outside as the air rushes out, but he manages to cling to the outer surface of Skybase. Zachary and Eli bury Scarlet in a shallow grave, but are frightened off when the agent comes to life before their eyes; Scarlet makes his way to a Rhino concealed in a remote water tower, but the vehicles activation triggers an alarm that is immediately detected by Lieutenant Green. Scarlet contacts Spectrum and tries to warn his colleagues about the doppelganger, but White refuses to believe him; the Colonel is convinced that Scarlet has succumbed to Mysteron control, and he orders the Angels to destroy him. With some fancy driving, Scarlet manages to evade the Angels missile attack; he then returns to the Laroux Foundation, where he learns that the gas was an experimental form of pure atomic matter, able to assume any shape it is programmed with. Blue tracks Scarlet down and tells his friend that he believes his claims that he has been replicated; the two agents set off for Skybase  only to learn that the Mysteron replicant has now taken over the form of Colonel White and set the bases controls on a collision course with the city of HoustonWayne Forester (Captain Scarlet), Robbie Stevens (Captain Blue / Captain Grey / Technician), Emma Tate (Destiny Angel), Mike Hayley (Colonel White), Jules de Jongh (Lieutenant Green / Harmony Angel), Julia Brahms (Captain Ochre), Heather Tobias (Melody Angel), Glenn Wrage (Professor Reynard / Zachary Jarrod), Nigel Plaskitt (Eli Jarrod / Wheatley)Touch of the ReaperAt the Centre for Organism Research in Nevada, the Mysterons deliberately contaminate Doctor Michael King and his assistant, Dayna Parrish, with a mutated version of Razers Disease. The two scientists die in seconds  only to be reborn as Mysteron replicants, each with the power to kill with a single touch. Some time later, the personnel of Spectrum watch these ominous events unfold via a security recording. Colonel White immediately assigns Captain Scarlet and Captain Blue to locate the missing scientists; however, Scarlets focus is divided: having seen the Mysteron replication process for the first time, he now finds himself questioning his own humanity. Paying a visit to Doctor Kings wife, Blue and Scarlet clash with Daynas boyfriend, the hard-nosed, high profile reporter Dan Lloyd. Following a lead from Mrs King, the two Spectrum agents track the Mysterons to a lakeside cabin. Dayna takes off on a motorbike, with Scarlet in hot pursuit in a Cheetah RRV; a high-speed chase ensues, but Dayna is able to evade her pursuer, and she disappears amongst the streets of a nearby city. Back at the cabin, Blue manages to avoid Kings deadly touch, and succeeds in trapping the Mysteron in the cabins cellar. King is taken back to Skybase, where Scarlet and White question him on Daynas whereabouts; but the Mysterons use King as a conduit, and, after declaring their war of nerves on Earth in retaliation for humanitys attack on their base, they cause King to disintegrate. Dayna visits Lloyd and kills him with a kiss, allowing the Mysterons to recreate the reporter as another virus-carrying agent. Back at Skybase, Captain Scarlet realises the real Mysteron plan: by using Dayna to get to her boyfriend, they have a perfect means of assassinating one of the reporters most famous friends: none other than the President of the United States of AmericaWayne Forester (Captain Scarlet / Air Force One Captain), Robbie Stevens (Captain Blue / The President), Mike Hayley (Colonel White / Voice of the Mysterons / Dan Lioyd), Jules de Jongh (Lieutenant Green / Dana Parish / Military Stewardess), Nigel Plaskitt (Doctor Gold / Doctor Michael King / Head of Security), Emma Tate (Claudette King / Air Force One PA Voice), Jeremy Hitchen (Scientist)Grey SkullsAfter the Mysterons take over a Phoenix policeman named Rimmer and use him to steal a canister of deadly alien spores brought back by a space probe from Ganymede, Captain Scarlet and Captain Blue are ordered to give chase. Elsewhere, two rival bikers  Colt from the Grey Skulls and Brock of the Wolf Pack  are meeting to discuss a possible peace treaty when they are interrupted by the arrival of Rimmers police car; as the cop takes refuge inside a nearby building a Spectrum Rhino draws up, which trashes Colts motorcycle in the process. Brock is killed by Rimmer and recreated by the Mysterons; the biker then takes over possession of the canister as Rimmer disappears into thin air. Captain Ochre arrives to assist her comrades in the hunt for Rimmer; however, Colt immediately sees a way to replace his ruined bike, and promptly steals Ochres Stallion Raid Bike. Unable to find their quarry, the three Spectrum agents return to Skybase, where a furious Colonel White orders Ochre to recover her stolen bike before its firepower can be misused. Using Lieutenant Greens information that the Grey Skulls are based in Roswell, a chastened Ochre heads off to New Mexico to track down the Raid Bike. Having persuaded two Grey Skull gang members to take her to their leader Ochre confronts Colt  only to have him blow up her Cheetah RRV with the Raid Bikes weaponry. Colt then takes Ochre to his base inside a disused underground military bunker, where he and his gang are waging a war against the alien invaders first sited in the area in the 1950s. Meanwhile, Scarlet and Blue determine that the Mysterons target is the new Stellar City theme park in Phoenix; however, the two agents are still looking for Rimmer  unaware that it is now Brock who is about to release the deadly spores that will kill literally thousands of visitorsWayne Forester (Captain Scarlet), Robbie Stevens (Captain Blue / Brock / Monk / Technician / Ride Attendant), Mike Hayley (Colonel White), Jules de Jongh (Lieutenant Green), Julia Brahms (Captain Ochre), Glenn Wrage (Colt), Nigel Plaskitt (Trent / Sergeant / Cheetah Computer Voice)DominionCaptain Black steals a Druzynik tank and aims to destroy the Tereshkovo nuclear plant in Siberia; the Angels are ordered to stop him, but the armoured vehicle easily shrugs off their missile attack. Giving chase in another Druzynik, Captain Scarlet and Captain Blue manage to destroy the Mysteron agents tank just before it comes within weapons range of the plant. Blacks body is thrown clear of the blast, and is immediately taken back to Skybase for examination. Here Blacks body rapidly heals, and when he regains consciousness, the agent declares that he is now free of Mysteron control. Although Destiny is convinced that her former lover has returned, her colleagues remain suspicious, and when Black then announces that he wishes to make amends for his actions, and offers to reveal the location of the Mysterons power source on Mars, Colonel White flatly refuses to sanction a mission. Seeing an opportunity to end the war, Scarlet frees Black and together they escape Skybase on Stallion Raid Bikes; White orders Blue and Ochre to give pursuit, but the two agents are overpowered by Scarlet, who takes Black to the International Space Agency in New Mexico, where they steal a Spectrum shuttle. When the ISA ask White to grant clearance for the spacecraft, the Colonel decides to trust Scarlets instincts, and he allows the vessel to lift off. Scarlet and Black soon land on Mars and set off for the Mysteron city in their Bison ATV, unaware that the Mysterons are now following their every move. Can Black really be trusted  or is Scarlet being led into a final, lethal trap?Wayne Forester (Captain Scarlet), Robbie Stevens (Captain Blue), Emma Tate (Destiny Angel), Mike Hayley (Colonel White), Jules de Jongh (Lieutenant Green / Harmony Angel / Symphony Angel), Nigel Plaskitt (Captain Black / Doctor Gold), Julia Brahms (Captain Ochre)References         
13757972
Cripple_Creek_Historic_District
 refnum66000939Cripple Creek Historic District is a historic district including Creek, Colorado, USA and is significant for its gold mining era history.It was declared a Historic Landmark in 1961.((publisherNational Park Service and )Many Cripple Creek buildings post-date the gold mining era.  The district includes a number of surviving structures, possibly including the following seven:*The Midland Terminal Depot*Teller County Courthouse*The Imperial Hotel*The Old Homestead*St. Pauls Catholic Church*Mansard Roof House, on Warren Avenue*The El Paso County Hospital, a brick Greek Revival style two story building.A photograph of each of the seven above is included in the NRHP Inventory documentation.The boundary of the district is defined by high points around Cripple Creek to include the natural setting reminiscent of the historic environment.  Additionally, it encloses part of the extent of Poverty Gulch where some of the original ore discoveries were made as well as the County Hospital building which is located outside the town limits. ( (p.10)  It runs from the peak of Mineral Hill (elevation 10,255 feet) southwest to a peak (elevation 9,855 feet), then to northeast corner of Mount Pisgah cemetery, then south along the east border of the cemetery to its southeast corner, then southeast to the peak that is 1600 feet to the northwest of Signal Hill (at elevation 9731), then northeast to the summit of Globe Hill (elevation 10,436), then northwest to peak of Carbonate Hill (elevation 10,335), finally east back to the peak of Mineral Hill.State Highway 67 is the principal road through the area.References(External links*Victor and Cripple Creek History
13767267
Madneuli_JSC
JSC Madneuli (JSCM) (, saaktsio sazogadoeba madneuli;  , ss madneuli) is a mining company based in Tbilisi, Georgia. Established in 1994, Madneuli is currently involved in ore, copper, and gold mining and smelting. The company is a daughter affiliate and subsidiary of GeoProMining Ltd (former Stanton Equities). GeoProMining Group is an international group which invests in metals and mining industry worldwide.  HistoryJSC Madneuli -The leading mining company in Georgia contributing more than 10% of Georgian exports.Established in 1975 in Bolnisi region, Georgia.Companys rich history of mining has distinguished us as a respected precious metals producer in Georgia and post soviet region. While our past is impressive, we are determined to meet the challenges and opportunities for our future holds.. It has been claimed that the company netted $60 million U.S. dollars in the year of the privatization.FinancialsFinancials for Madneuli are not readily available. Using Georgian export data for the year of 2005, the maximum revenues Madneuli could have generated are $34.7 million for gold and  $36.4 million for copper suggesting a maximum total revenue of $70.70 million US dollars. Australian junior Gold, who worked the Mine in a joint venture with Madnueli in 2005 and had a 50% stake in the mine, reported a gross profit of $11.4 million US Dollars and positive cash flow from operating activities in the same period of $6.8 million.  Operations GeorgiaMadneuli has the pit Bolnisi Mine in the Bolnisi district of the Kartli region in southern Georgia. Western sources estimate Madneulis assets in this mine to be 350,435 oz (10,908 kg) of gold. Silver, copper, and other minerals are also mined at that location. This asset has been worked for 30 years. ArmeniaIn 2007 Madneuli purchased the Armenian company Ore which had a 25-year permit to exploit the copper-molybdenum mine at Hankavan.(What Issue Does the Government Have with Madneuli? Hetq Online, October 29, 2007, By Edik Baghdasaryan, Accessed Nov 3, 2007) Also, through the purchase of the Gold Recovery Company (AGRC)(What Issue Does the Government Have with Madneuli? Heqt Online Oct 29, 2007 Edik Baghdasaryan), on August 15, 2007, Madneuli now owns the mine in the Meghradzor region in the Abovyan province of Armenia, as well as the processing plant in the Ararat province of Armenia.Alleged interest in Nagorno-KarabakhBetween August and October 2007, the website Mineweb a series of articles concerning the Madneulis acquisition of Zod goldmine in the Vardenis region in the Gegharkunik province in Armenia and partly in the de facto independent of Nagorno-Karabakh, which sparked a significant controversy in the international press. The purchase price allegedly was $80 Million US dollars in cash plus assumption of all debts from Sterlite. The financing was alleged to be undertaken by the Russian financing company Investors. This mine is located in an area that is referred to as Kalbajar in Azerbaijan. Iskandarov, Azerbaijans minister of natural resources, called the alleged purchase unlawful.(Georgian Company Commences Talks on Gold Production in Occupied Azerbaijani Land ) Ibrahim, the Press-Secretary of the Azerbaijani Foreign Ministry, has stated that the Azerbaijani Embassy in Georgia holds investigations on the issue.( The Georgian government officials have stated that Tbilisi approaches negatively to interest shown by Madneuli company to the goldfield in the Nagorno-Karabakh, but the company is private enterprise and the government cannot interfere into the activity of the company.(The Georgian government approaches negatively to interest shown by Madneuli company to the goldfield in the Nagorno-Karabakh. Avcyia. 18 October 2007.) The deal was then reported to have been postponed due to negotiations with the government about settling of all debts Sterlite had towards the government.(Madneuli takeover of Zod Gold in doubt Mineweb 16 Oct 2007)On July 9, 2008, the Mineweb website accepted that the allegations concerning the Madneulis acquisition of Zod goldmines were completely untrue, apologized to Generalov and the Industrial Investors for the embarrassment and damage to their reputation that the articles have caused, and pledged a substantial payment to a charity of Mr Generalovs choice in compensation.(Apology: Sergey Generalov and Industrial Investors. Mineweb. 2008-07-09. Retrieved on 2008-07-15.)See also*as an investment*as an investmentReferencesExternal links* Company Website accessed Oct 17. 2007 under construction* Madneuli. World Investment News.* The Bolnisi mine is at coordinates 
13780439
Busveal
Busveal is a mining settlement in west Cornwall, Kingdom. It is located appromximately one mile east of Redruth.(Ordnance Survey: Landranger map sheet 203 Lands End ISBN 978-0-319-23148-7)Referencespl:Busveal
13790041
Appalachian_Voices
MissionAppalachian Voices is a grassroots organization whose mission is to: Bring people together to protect the land, air and water of central and southern Appalachia. We empower people to defend our regions rich natural and cultural heritage by providing them with tools and strategies for successful grassroots campaigns. Since the impacts of coal threaten Appalachia more than any other single source of pollution, we are committed to reducing coals impact on the region and advancing our vision for a cleaner energy future.Appalachian Voices was founded in 1997and is based out of Boone, Carolina (David Brewer (11 October 2007).  F. Kennedy, Jr. Helps Appalachian Voices Celebrate at 10th Anniversary Gala  High Country Press.), but has offices in D.C. and Charlottesville, Virginia  They are members of the Alliance for Appalachia, Waterkeeper Alliance, Wise Energy for Virginia.  Their work focuses primarily upon environmental issues concerning the Mountains region.  Their stated goals include eliminating pollution, ending mountaintop removal coal mining, and restoring Appalachian forests.  Their main actions entail advocacy, education, and grassroots organizing.EffortsMountaintop removalImage:Mountaintop Removal.jpg|thumb|left|removal coal mining at Kayford Mountain, Virginia.Appalachian Voices has been working to end the practice of mountaintop removal coal mining since 2002 through a campaign to garner national support. In 2003 Appalachian voices started the Appalachian Treasures Tour which went to different communities raise awareness across America about the impacts of mountaintop removal. In 2006 they continued to raise national awareness about mountaintop removal by producing the award winning website  Ilovemountains.org for the Alliance for Appalachia(). The website was recognized in 2006 as one of the internets top non-profit sites () and recently has been recognized as a Google Earth Hero by Google Earth (David Brewer (11 October 2007).  F. Kennedy, Jr. Helps Appalachian Voices Celebrate at 10th Anniversary Gala  High Country Press.)().Appalachian Water WatchAppalachian Voices is committed to protecting the waterways of the region from the largest source of pollution.  They head the initiatives of the Appalachian Water Watch and the Upper Watauga Riverkeepers to ensure a future for the waterways of Appalachia.Appalachia Water Watch is currently pursuing legal action against Kentucky coal companies ICG, Nally and Hamilton, and Frasure Creek Coal (owned by Trinity Coal) for over 20,000 violations of the Clean Water Act() ().Working to Promote Coal-Free EnergyAppalachian Voices led an effort()  in Wise County, V.A. to advocate energy alternatives such as efficiency that would protect the states environment, boost employment, consumer savings, and the economy rather than building a new coal-fired power plant. Appalachian Voices is also involved in organizing grassroots opposition towards a Surry County, VA power plant planned to be build by Old Dominion Electrical Co-operative(). Appalachian Voices also successfully lobbied for the establishment of the North Carolina Clean Smokestack Act(David Brewer (11 October 2007).  F. Kennedy, Jr. Helps Appalachian Voices Celebrate at 10th Anniversary Gala  High Country Press.).MagazineAppalachian Voices publishes a free semi-monthly magazine about the groups activities titled Appalachian Voice.  Archives of the magazine are available online.See also* of environmental organizationsReferencesExternal links* Appalachian Voices (Official website)* Navigator Rating - Appalachian Voices (2006)
13806078
K._Seshadri_Iyer
Sir Kumarapuram Seshadri Iyer KCIE (Tamil:   , Kannada:  ), b. June 1, 1845 - d.September 13, 1901), or Sheshadri Aiyar was an advocate who served as the Dewan of Mysore from 1883 to 1901. He was the second Dewan of Mysore state since the reinstation of the Wodeyar family on its throne in 1881 and was the longest serving Dewan of the princely state as well. He is regarded by most as the maker of modern BangaloreSeshadri Iyer was born in a Iyers family from Palghat in Malabar district, Madras Presidency. He had his early education in Calicut and graduated in arts from Presidency College, Madras in 1868. He was also a qualified lawyer.Seshadri Iyer joined the services of the Mysore kingdom in 1868 and served as a district magistrate and later as Personal Secretary to the Diwan, Rungacharlu before being appointed Diwan himself. Seshadri Iyer was the longest serving Diwan of Mysore kingdom and served from 1883 to 1901.Seshadri Iyer established the gold fields and Hospital and commissioned the Sivanasamudra hydel-electric power project and Bagh. He was also responsible for the founding of the Institute of Science. Seshadri Iyer had to deal with a devastating plague which afflicted Bangalore in 1898 and was responsible for the decongestion of streets and reconstructing the city in the aftermath of the plague. Early life Seshadri Iyer was born in a Brahmin (Brahacharanam)() family of Palghat (Modern Kerala) in Presidency in 1845. He did his early schooling in Calicut and graduated from the Presidency College, Madras in 1866. He stood first in the B. A. examinations.  After working for sometime in Madras, he moved to the Mysore kingdom in 1868. Service in the Mysore Kingdom In 1868, Seshadri Iyer was appointed Judicial Secretary in the Ashtagram division of the Mysore kingdom. He later served as Head Sheristadar of the Court of the Judicial Commissioner, Assistant Commissioner of Mysore, Deputy Commissioner and District Magistrate of Tumkur and District and Sessions Judge of Ashtagram division. He obtained his B. L. degree from the University of Madras in 1874. From 1881 to 1883, he served as an officer on special duty in Mysore. In 1883, when Rangacharlus period of service came to an end, Seshadri Iyer was appointed Diwan of Mysore. As Dewan Seshadri Iyer succeeded Rangacharlu as Dewan of Mysore in the year 1883 and administered Mysore for a span of eighteen years. He remains the longest serving Diwan of the princely state. He worked to improve the transport, irrigation and mining sectors in the kingdom. Seshadri Iyer extended the railway lines in the kingdom by The Kolar gold fields of Karnataka were established during his tenure. He constructed the famous Glass House at Lalbagh in 1889 and the Victoria Hospital at Bangalore in the year 1900. He also formulated the plans for the establishment of the Institute of Science which were put into work after his death in 1901.Sir Sheshadri Hydel StationSeshadri Iyer was responsible for initiating the first hydro-electric project in Asia, at Shivanasamudra, which began generating power in 1902 for the Kolar gold fields, and in 1905 for Bangalore. The gold fields were 147 km away, making the transmission line the longest in the world at the time. Later on, when construction of the Mettur dam in Nadu began in the 1930s, power was supplied from Shivanasamudra. The Sir Sheshadri Hydel Station was granted the status of a National Heritage Centre in May 2006. The Maker of Modern Bangalore In 1898, a devastating plague in Bangalore city wiped out most of its population. As a result of this, streets were decongested, roads were widened and sanitation was improved. Hotels made their appearance and many new industrial units came to be established and people got more employment opportunities.Seshadri Iyer started the Chamarajendra Water Works to supply water to the city from Hesaraghatta Lake, 18 km away, in 1894. He began the extensions of Basavanagudi and Malleswaram in 1898. The extensions served to alleviate the congestion of the city, which was just recovering from plague. He commissioned the glass house in Bagh in 1889.  The Hospital was begun by him in 1900. He persuaded the then monarch of the erstwhile Kingdom, Wodeyar IV, to donate  of free land to an institution that was finally to become the Tata Institute of Science, now known as the Institute of Science in 1911. The private residence of Seshadri Iyer, Krupa, is now the State Guest House. The city remembers him through the names of Sheshadripuram (a city extension created in 1892), Sheshadri Road, Sheshadri Memorial Library, and a statue in Park. Legacy Sir K.Seshadri Iyer is regarded as one of the greatest Dewans of Mysore. Robert H.Elliot in his book Gold,Sport and Coffee Planting in Mysore says: Criticism Seshadri Iyer, a Brahmin had been often criticized for inducting over a hundred men from Madras in the Mysore civil service.() Family Seshadri Iyers son K. S. Doraisami Iyer also served in the Mysore civil service. He was Private-Secretary to Seshadri Iyer from 1881 to 1891. In 1912, he was appointed Additional member of the Legislative Council. References External links# The Hindu special on the Dewans of Mysore.# Detailed history of the Indian Institute of Science, Bangalore# A detailed chonology of events which took place between 1850 and 1900 in BangaloreSeshadri Iyer
13828354
Locust_bean_gum
Locust bean gum (LBG, also known as carob gum, carob bean gum, carobin, E410) is a galactomannan vegetable gum extracted from the seeds of the carob tree, mostly found in the Mediterranean. The long pods that grow on the tree are used to make this gum. The pods are kibbled to separate the seed from the pulp. The seeds have their skins removed by an acid treatment. The deskinned seed is then split and gently milled. This causes the brittle germ to break up while not affecting the more robust endosperm. The two are separated by sieving. The separated endosperm can then be milled by a roller operation to produce the final locust bean gum powder.(CyberColloids: Locus bean gum production, CyberColloids, Hydrocolloids research and development webpage.)Locust bean gum occurs as a white to yellow-white powder. It consists chiefly of high-molecular-weight hydrocolloidal polysaccharides, composed of galactose and mannose units combined through glycosidic linkages, which may be described chemically as galactomannan.  It is dispersible in either hot or cold water, forming a sol having a pH between 5.4 and 7.0, which may be converted to a gel by the addition of small amounts of borate.  LBG is used as a agent and agent in technology. The bean, when made into powder, is sweetwith a flavor similar to chocolateand is used to sweeten foods and as a chocolate substitute. It is also used in inedible products such as pet foods, mining products, paper making, and to thicken textiles. It is used in cosmetics and to enhance the flavor of cigarettes. Shoe polish and insecticides also have locust bean gum powder as an additive.(Locust Bean Gum Powder http://www.glyconutritionforlife.org/Science_of_Glyconutrients/Locust_Bean_Gum_Powder.php) It is soluble in hot water.(Martin Chaplin: Locus bean gum, London South Bank University, web page.)Referencesde garrofceratonijos lipaihu:Szentjnoskenyr-liszt sv:Fruktkrnmjl 
13853417
Bugant,_Selenge
Bugant  () is an urban-type settlement in the Yer sum (district) of Province in northern Mongolia. It is 66 km SE from Yer sum center  and 112 km NE from Znkharaa city.Bugant was built in the socialist period as a mining center.mn:
13860220
Michael_Mainelli
Michael Mainelli is Chairman of Z/Yen,(zyen.com) a commercial think-tank, which he co-founded in 1994.  He is Emeritus Professor of Commerce and Fellow at College in London,(Gresham College - Professor Michael Mainelli) as well as a visiting professor at the School of Economics.(LSE)Gresham College Lecture SeriesProfessor Mainelli delivered and published a series of 28 free one-hour lectures on commerce at Gresham College in the of London while serving as Mercers School Memorial Professor of Commerce from 2005 to 2009.  The theme of his programme was Societys Commercial Choice - Risks and Rewards of Markets. The lectures emphasised the proper functioning of markets in realising societal goals, and the obligation on society to try to use market forces wherever suitable, as opposed to unnecessary regulation, hidden subsidy or inappropriate taxation.  During the public lectures he presented research on valuing sustainable certification and social responsibility using risk/reward options,(Take My Profits Please! Volatility Reduction And Ethics) applying measurement ranges to audit (Confidence Accounting),(Reforming Auditing - Radical Change Or Incremental Action?) developing standards markets,(Standards Markets: The Free Market Response To Regulation) liquidity estimation through supply-demand curve prediction,(Liquidity: Finance In Motion Or Evaporation?) and discerning the role of feedforward in creating leptokurtic market outcomes.(Perceptions Rather The Rules: The (Mis)Behaviour of Markets)  During the series he made observations about sustainability,(Is The Party Over? Sustainable Hopes) market solutions to social problems,(Save the World: A Commercial Break) risk,(Does Society Risk My Life Through Safety? The Perils Of Too Much Risk Aversion) the role of government,(Goldilocks Government And The Market: Not Too Little, Not Too Much, But Just Right) the rising paradox of money as a good,(Fads And Fashions: If They Are So Bad, Why Are They So Rapidly Rich?) taxation,(Corporation Tax Or Income Tax: Which Is The Greatest Con?) long term discount rates,(Stealing The Silver: How We Take From The Dispossessed, The Poor And Our Own Children) intellectual property managed as an option,(Enclosures Of The Mind: Governing The Intellectual Commons) corruption,(What I Like About This Country Is That It Has A Nice Level Of Corruption!) and lotteries as misery indicators.(Why Do People Play The Lottery? Make Up Your Mind)  The lecture series concluded by outlining a more general theory of commerce.(Commercial Philosophy: Science Or Religion?)  Professor Mainelli and the saxophonist Harle interwove a collage from the lecture series with Brittens music, Metamorphoses: The Terrible Beauty of Change,(Metamorphoses: The Terrible Beauty of Change) for the of London Festivals June 2009 Sustain! programme.(Sustain!)Michael continues to lecture and host symposia widely, including continuing lectures at Gresham College, where he has been introducing new concepts of money and the role of government, e.g. index linked carbon bonds.(Long Commerce: Transactions Across Time)  Wider InitiativesIn 2007 Michael, Z/Yen, Gresham College, the City of London Corporation and forty financial institutions launched London Accord, the worlds largest investment research cooperative into environmental, social and governance issues, publishing over 200 reports.(http://www.london-accord.co.uk/) In 2007 Michael, Gresham College, Z/Yen and a group of interested and motivated individuals launched the Long Finance initiative. The aim is to promote discussion, research and education about finance and starts with the question: When would we know our financial system is working?(http://www.longfinance.net/) Long Finance holds numerous, mostly no cost, events for the public.  Professor Mainelli delivered the AEA Technology Wolfson College Lecture at Oxford, Financing Technology, in February 2010.(http://www.aeat.com/cms/financing-innovation-viewing-the-uk-from-a-global-perspective-2/)Professor Mainelli was a keynote speaker at J. Rubinsteins TBLI Conference Europe in November 2010.(Link to TBLI conference link to Slides Link to biographic profile)CareerEducated at College, College Dublin and the School of Economics and Political Science, Professor Mainellis early scientific research in aerospace and computer graphics led to him starting Swiss companies in seismology, cartography and energy information from 1979 to 1984.  After a post at Arthur Andersen from 1985 to 1987, Professor Mainelli spent seven years as a partner and board member of the accountancy firm BDO Binder Hamlyn from 1987 to 1994, now International, directing global consulting projects.  While co-founding Z/Yen Professor Mainelli served as Corporate Development Director of Europes largest R&D organization (then the UK Ministry of Defences Evaluation and Research Agency, DERA, now largely QinetiQ and DSTL, the Defence Science & Technology Laboratory) leading to two privatisations.  At Z/Yen Professor Mainelli created the Financial Centres Index, London Accord, Long Finance, the Global Intellectual Property Index, the Farsight Award and other financial services initiatives.  He conceived and produced the first complete digital map of the world in 1983, Mundocart, the Google Earth equivalent of the 1980s, as well as the $20 million Geodat cartography project from 1980 to 1984.Professor Mainelli won a 1996 Foresight Challenge award for visualising risk in the Financial Laboratory, a 2003 UK Smart Award for prediction software, and was 2004/2005 British Computer Society Director of the Year.(http://www.bcs.org/server.php?shownav.7567)  He is a qualified accountant (FCCA), computer specialist (MBCS, CITP), investment researcher (FSI) and management consultant (FIMC, CMC).  Professor Mainelli is a non-executive Director of the United Kingdom Accreditation Service(http://www.ukas.com/about-accreditation/about-ukas/structure.asp) (the UKs national body for standards and laboratories) where he is a proponent for competitive standards markets, and Sirius Minerals plc (AIM-listed mining company).  He is a Fellow and Trustee of Gresham College, the founding home of the Society, which he terms a Tudor University,(Gresham College - A Short, Personal, Alternative History) and a trustee of the Fund for Animal Welfare(http://www.ifaw.org/Publications/Annual_reports/asset_upload_file759_55605.pdf) and Ocean Alliance.  Michael was designated a Gentiluomo (Don) in the Associazione Cavalieri di San Silvestro, in Rome in 2011. He has also held numerous advisory posts, for example Hitachi UK and Treasury.(http://www.hm-treasury.gov.uk/press_27_09.htm)WritingProfessor Mainelli has published over 35 journal articles, over 100 commercial articles(http://www.zyen.com/index.php/knowledge/articles-and-research.html) and three books including the humorous risk/reward management novel, Clean Business Cuisine: Now and Z/Yen,(http://www.zyen.com/index.php/knowledge/books/551.html) written with Ian Harris; a Sunday Times Book of the Week in 2000; Accountancy Age described it as surprisingly funny considering it is written by a couple of accountants.(http://www.accountancyage.com/accountancyage/takingstock/2039290/covers)  Professor Mainellis latest work has been a response to the crunch, The Road To Long Finance,(http://www.zyen.com/index.php/knowledge/books/26.html) written with Bob Giffords and published by the Centre for the Study of Financial Innovation.Wider Interests and Public ServiceMichael Mainelli and his wife Elisabeth are heavily involved in the restoration of the Sailing Barge S B Lady Daphne.(http://www.lady-daphne.co.uk/)  Aside from being the odd bagpiper at Burns Night dinners, current positions include:* Editorial Board, Journal of Strategic Change, John Wiley & Sons  London, England; 1990present.* Trustee, Ocean Alliance/Whale Conservation Institute  Lincoln, Massachusetts; 1994present.* Trustee, Thames Match (traditional sailing race since 1863)  Gravesend, England; 1999present.* Editorial Board, Journal of Business Strategy, Emerald Group  Bradford, England; 2004present.* non-executive Director, United Kingdom Accreditation Service (UKs sole accreditation body for certification, testing, inspection and calibration services)  Middlesex, England; 2005present.* Principal Advisor, London Accord  London, England; 2005present.* Commissioner, London Waterways Commission of the Greater London Authority  London, England; 2006present.* Trustee, IFAW  International Fund for Animal Welfare  Yarmouth Port, Massachusetts; 2007present.* Principal Advisor, Long Finance - London, England; 2007present.* Visiting Professor, London School of Economics  Department of Management Information Systems & Innovation Group  London, England; 2008present.* Trustee, Gresham Council  London, England; 2008present.* ACCA, Corporate Governance & Risk Management Committee  London, England; 2009present.* Presidents Committee, Council for Assisting Refugee Academics  London, England; 2009present.* Almoner, Hospital - London, England; 2010present.Significant former positions include:* Member, Professional Services Global Competitiveness Group, HM Treasury  London, England, 2008-2009.* Advisory Board, City University, School of Informatics  London, England; 1999-2003.* Chief Scientist, The Financial aboratory Club (LLP with Barclays, RoyalSunAlliance, London Stock Exchange, Silicon Graphics, City University, Ministry of Defence)  London, England; 1995-1998.WorksNovels*Clean Business Cuisine: Now and Z/Yen (2000) (with Ian Harris, free online)Non-Fiction*The Price of Fish: A New Approach to Wicked Economics and Better Decisions (2011) (with Ian Harris)*The Road To Long Finance: A Systems View Of The Credit Scrunch (2009) (with Bob Giffords, free online)*Information Technology For The Not-For-Profit Sector (2001) (with Ian Harris)Gresham Lectures*Gresham Transcripts, Recordings and VideosReferences
13874891
Bringewood_Ironworks
Bringewood Ironworks was a charcoal ironworks in north Herefordshire. It was powered by the Teme, with a furnace, a forge and latterly a mill for blackplate (to be tinned into tinplate).  It was probably built for Dudley, 1st Earl of Leicester in the 1590s, but reverted to the Crown on his attainder, and was then let to Sir Henry Wallop.  However, he evidently sublet it to working ironmasters.  By 1623, it was run by Francis Walker, and continued to be operated by his descendants until the bankruptcy of Job Walker in 1695.  They were also concerned in a number of other ironworks in southern and central Shropshire.  About 1695, the ironworks, consisting of a furnace and a forge, was acquired by Richard Knight.  He and then his sons gradually expanded their activities, acquiring ironworks in the valley of the Stour.  Richard Knight retired in about 1733, after which the works were managed by his son Ralph Knight for a family partnership with his brother Edward.  After his death, the works passed to Edward, who ran them in partnership with his sons John and James, managed by the latter.  Their interest in the works ceased on Edwards death in 1778.  The works were put into repair in 1782 and run by William Downing of Pembridge with a various partners, passing to ultimately Samuel George.  The 1782 lease expired in 1815.  This coincided with a depression in the iron industry at the end of the War.  This seems to mark its closure.  The furnace had probably closed in the 1790s, when Samuel George built at furnace at Knowbury close to Titterstone Clee.  From about 1740, in addition to the furnace and forge, there was a rolling mill further downstream, which produced blackplate, which was sent to a tinmill at Mitton (now in Stourport) to be made into tinplate.  The name of a nearby wood suggests that tinplate may have been produced at Bringewood.  However, this can only have been after period of the Knights occupation of the works, as the surviving accounts (for 1733-78) show only blackplate being produced.  Wood (for charcoal) came from the nearby chases of Bringewood, Mocktree and Darvel.  Though the possibility of mining locally is mentioned in some leases, it is probable that the main source of ore was Clee Hill.  iron, bar iron and blackplate, made in the works were carried by land to Bewdley for sale, so far as not sold locally.  Bringewood bar iron enjoyed a high reputation as being tough.  References* Dr Bull, Some account of Bringewood furnace and forge Trans. Woolhope Nat. Field Club 1869, 54-60.  *Maj. Stewart Robinson, The forests and woodland areas of Herefordshire Trans. Woolhope Nat. Fld Club 1921-3 (1925), 193-220. *Robert	Page, Richard and Edward Knight: ironmasters of Bringewood and Wolverley Trans. Woolhope Nat. Field Club 43(1) (1979), 7-17.  *L. Ince, The Knight Family and the British iron industry (1991).*
13893790
Church_Village
Church Village () is a large village in the historic parish and community of Fardre, located within the Taff Ely district of the County Borough of Cynon Taf in Wales.  The village is centrally located being around 4 miles from the local principal towns of Llantrisant to the southwest and Pontypridd to the north and is situated around 10 miles northwest of city centre. Historically it was known as Cross Inn and fell within the traditional county of Glamorgan.Church Village itself does not share the extent of industrial mining heritage of much of the rest of the county and largely comprises new and recent build housing.  It is a rapidly growing urban area, today almost a town rather than a village, being much sought after to live in due to its proximity to Cardiff and Pontyclun.  Church Village is also commonly used to refer to the whole CF38  postcode area of Pontypridd, comprising the adjoining principal settlements of - Beddau, Efail Isaf, Llantwit Fardre, Ton-teg, Tyn-y-Nant and Upper Church Village.Church village was served by Village railway station on the and Taff Vale Junction Railway until 1964.Costain, under contract from Cynon Taf County Borough Council constructed a bypass to reduce traffic congestion on the A473, Pontypridd to Bridgend () road, from Cross Inn, near Llantrisant, to Tonteg via Isaf. The Church Village bypass, which is built as a single carriageway, with crawler and overtaking lanes around roundabouts opened in September 2010.()()EducationChurch Village is the site of one of the newest school sites in Wales, which is called Gartholwg Community Campus. This initiative houses a school - Ysgol Gynradd Gymraeg Garth Olwg, a school - Gyfun Garth Olwg, a pre-school nursery, a community library, Lifelong Learning Centre and a Youth centre.ReligionThere are three Christian churches in the area, St. Illtyds, the Parish church, Capel Y Bedyddwyr Cymraeg Salem (Salem Welsh Baptist Chapel, with English and Welsh services) and Bethel Baptist Chapel. All three churches have a strong and healthy relationship between them which is constantly developing.The Parish church of St. Illtyds has been serving the community for hundreds of years, but Salem and Bethel have developed in the last 100 years. Bethel was formed owing to schismn, wishing for English services compared to the, then, complete Welsh Salem which was already established in the area. However, in the last 50 years Salem adopted an evening English service and is enjoying a morning family service under the current Pastor. Salem Chapel is widely known as the chapel (and resting place) of former Deacon and Arweinydd y gan, John Hughes, who wrote the famous hymn tune Cwm Rhondda (Guide Me, O Thou Great Jehovah).External links* Gartholwg Community Campus* www.geograph.co.uk : photos of Church Village and surrounding area* Ysgol Gyfun Rhydfelen school website References Eglwys
13905569
History_of_local_government_in_Yorkshire
The history of local government in Yorkshire is unique and complex. Yorkshire is the largest historic English county(Vision of Britain - Yorkshire ancient county (historic map)) and consists of a diverse mix of urban and rural development with a heritage in agriculture, manufacturing, and mining.(John Bartholomew, Gazetteer of the British Isles, (1887)) After a long period of very little change, it has been subject to a number of significant reforms of local government structures in modern times, some of which were controversial.(HMSO, Aspects of Britain: Local Government, (1996)) The most significant of these was the Government Act 1972(Arnold-Baker, C., Local Government Act 1972, (1973)) and the UK local government reform. It currently corresponds to several counties and districts and is mostly contained within the and the Humber region.IdentityThe people of Yorkshire are traditionally renowned for identifying with their county, above their country of England.(Major, J., Speech to a Conservative Party rally in Brighton, 29 May 2001, Conservatives.com) There is a long standing and powerful view that Yorkshire is a country on its own inside of another country and that Yorkshire has a significantly strong regional identity.(Tomlinson, A., Power Games: A Critical Sociology of Sport, (2002)) Ancient divisions thumb|Yorkshire ridings:1. North2. West3. EastYorkshire originated in antiquity as the Kingdom of Jrvk. It was traditionally divided into West, North and East ridings. The term originates from Norse riing, third part, a legacy of the areas ninth century Scandinavian settlers. Each of the ridings was then further subdivided into smaller units called Wapentakes, which were administered by an early form of democratic representation termed a Thing. Later the wapentakes were used as the basis for administration. In about 1823 the wapentakes were:Apart from these was the Ainsty wapentake to the west of the City of York.(Vision of Britain - Ainsty (historic map))Modern local governmentthumb|1904 map of YorkshireThe borough corporations of Beverley, Doncaster, Kingston upon Hull, Leeds, Pontefract, Richmond, Ripon, Scarborough and York were reformed by the Corporations Act 1835. In 1889, as part of the Government Act 1888, Yorkshire was divided into administrative counties (each with a council) and county boroughs. The administrative counties closely followed the ancient ridings, with the exclusion of the large towns of Bradford, Halifax, Huddersfield, Kingston upon Hull, Leeds, Middlesbrough, Sheffield and York. Yorkshire continued to be classed as a single county under the act, although each of the ridings retained their own lieutenancies and shrievalties. York became associated with the West Riding for this purpose. In 1894 the remainder of the county, that was not a county borough or municipal (non-county) borough, was divided into urban and rural districts by the Government Act 1894. Several new county boroughs were created from 1889 to 1974:The North Riding gained  from Durham when the Teesside county borough was created in 1968.(Distribution of population in 1971With the creation and growth of county boroughs, and a movement of people from the country to the towns and cities, the population in the county boroughs began to outnumber those in the administrative counties. By 1971, 53% of the population of Yorkshire were living in the county boroughs. The division of population in 1971 was as follows:(1971 census)Changes in 1974Local government in England was reformed in 1974 by the Government Act 1972.(Elcock, H, Local Government, (1994)) Under the act, the ridings lost their lieutenancies and shrievalties and the administrative counties, county boroughs and their councils were abolished.( The area of Yorkshire was divided between a number of metropolitan and non-metropolitan counties:(Redcliffe-Maud & Wood, B., English Local Government Reformed, (1974) )The reform sought to amalgamate the urbanised parts of the West Riding in the South and West Yorkshire metropolitan counties.(Jones, B. et al., Politics UK, (2004)) The other counties, known as non-metropolitan or shire counties,( recognised the urbanised areas that had developed around the Tees and the Humber, leaving Yorkshire as a predominantly rural county. The metropolitan and non-metropolitan counties also became counties for purposes such as lieutenancy.(Royal Mail reactionThe Royal Mail adopted South, North and West Yorkshire as postal counties in 1974. It also recognised the transfers from Yorkshire to Cumbria, Durham and Lancashire and the creation of Cleveland. In Humberside, the part from Yorkshire became the Humberside postal county. Greater Manchester could not be adopted as a postal county, so Saddleworth (which was part of the Oldham town) was included in the Lancashire postal county. Postal counties are no longer in official use.(Royal Mail, Address Management Guide, (2004))District name changesSome of the changes were unpopular,( and a provision of the 1972 act allowed district councils to change the names of their districts. Within Humberside, the Borough of Beverley was changed to East Yorkshire Borough of Bevereley and North Wolds district was changed to East Yorkshire in 1981, reflecting their historic association with Yorkshire.1990s UK local government reformA review of local government took place during the 1990s which made a number of changes to the counties created in 1974.( As part of the review, Cleveland(The Cleveland (Structural Change) Order 1995 SI 1995/187) and Humberside(The Humberside (Structural Change) Order 1995 SI 1995/600) were abolished in 1996 and their districts were reconstituted as unitary authorities. In addition to becoming a unitary authority, the Riding of Yorkshire was reintroduced as a county for the purposes of lieutenancy and shrievalty (also including Hull) and Yorkshire gained territory for this purpose; the changes to the ceremonial counties were reconfirmed by the Act 1997. The unitary districts created are as follows:DemographyThe total area and population of Yorkshire from 1831 to 1991 is as follows. The area corresponds to the three ridings until 1971 and to West, North and South Yorkshire from 1981.(National Statistics - 200 years of the Census in Yorkshire)From 1831 to 1991 there was a rise in population density from 0.4 to 1.4 people per acre.(See also*of local government in the United KingdomReferences 
13923646
Six_Hours_Past_Thursday
Six Hours Past Thursday is a thriller novel by Jack Payne.SettingTwo-thirds of the Six Hours Past Thursday story unfolds on the streets and in the office buildings, restaurants, and bars of Chicagos Loop, along with the suburban reaches on into the city by way of commuter train. The other one-third of this legal thriller takes place in Florida and off the coast of Miami Beach where a large construction project is underway: the building and outfitting of an nation ambitiously planned as a Carlo-like gambling Mecca.Story SummarySteve Draves leads three lives:Life #1: contented, happily married, father of twin sons, family man. He is a successful broker. To all outward appearances he is the epitome of the American Dream. He resides in the affluent suburb of Mellwood, Illinois, on the Norwest outskirts of Chicago, with his doting, devoted wife, Bettyshe of considerable personal and physical appealand their offspring. He commutes daily to his Michigan Avenue office in Chicagos Loop.Life #2: He engages in a secret extra-curricular activity as an inveterate womanizer, whose lust knows few bounds. Among his amorous pursuits are a fashion model, Tina Landon, a restaurant hostess, Sandy Serrell, even his own secretary, Deby Collinger. But, his prodigious prurience does not stop here. To him, all female species of the opposite sex fill the bill if they are sexually desirable, voluptuous, drop-dead beautiful.Life #3: A con man of extraordinary skills. Among his high-risk exploits are a block-of-stock sale in a mining company about to declare bankruptcy, extracting eight fees from a single business transaction, the straw man sale of prime development property in his own suburb that risks his having to take his own family and run, and a now-you-see-it-now-you-dont escrow manipulation. Con man extraordinaire, Draves successfully pulls every lever of the get-rich-quick engine: kickbacks. under-the-table-deals, accounts-stuffing, assets scraping, books-rigging. He prides himself in keeping all his business activities, technically, legal.He overconfidently falls in with mobster, Johnny Patiense in a grandiose gambling island development off the coast of Florida.  Then, storm clouds threaten. In a reverse of Draves usual womanizing role, the mobster, Johnny Patienses daughter, Nina, pursues him. Draves tries every evasive maneuver he can think of with little success.. He considers this a dire necessity since her father has declared him, Draves, off limits to his daughter.  To compound the fracture of his crumbling relationship with the mobster, grievous error by his distracted secretary, Deby, leads to contested ownership of Patienses island with wealthy entrepreneur, Chester Carlin. The construction project, for which Draves is responsible, falls behind schedule. And, other expected routines become unglued. He finds himself being rolled over by rapidly accumulating negative events. Now, as Nina Patiense stalks Draves, in a series of amorous pursuits, her fathers Enforcer stalks him with a very different motive.The scope of Draves dilemma widens to involve everyone close to him. Deby, Tina, Sandy. His lifelong friend, disgruntled agency account executive, Mark Brightly, who also gets inadvertently entangled with Nina Patiense. His loving wife, Betty. Even innocent bystander, Chester Carlin, whose name gets mistakenly posted onto the deed to Patienses island.Through all of this, Draves has long intended to reform, close out his relationship with Patiense as the last scam project of his career, and retire to a more quiet life, clean of avocational skirt-chasing, and all con games. He has long looked forward to fully appreciating and maximizing his loving relationship with his wife, Betty. With painful slowness the realization of the good life he has already enjoyed has nonetheless been gradually building within him.It all comes down to the final question: Whats the true definition of a con man?And, the usual answer: a mouth with a life support system, an empty suit But, in this story the answer reverts back to the question, in a much-to-ponder sort of way.
13933570
List_of_Swedish_Americans
The following is a list of notable Americans,  including both original immigrants who obtained American citizenship and their American descendants.  To be included in this list, the person must have a Wikipedia article showing they are Swedish American or must have references showing they are Swedish American and are notable. Listright|thumb|Candice BergenEntertainmentActors*Skarsgrd(Swedish-born) Actor DOB 8-25-76 * Ware (Actress in Hollywood), 29 movies 1932-1940.(Born Irene Ahlberg 6/11 1910 in New York(father from Sweden, mother from New York), died 6/3 1993 in Orange, California. According to : http://www.imdb.com/name/nm0912115/ and http://search.ancestry.com/cgi-bin/sse.dll?db1920usfedcen&indivtry&h31851738)* Adams (Swedish-born), Bond girl.(born Maud Solveig Christina Wikstrm in Lule, Sweden)* Bergen, actress and fashion model.(Swedish immigrant paternal grandparents. Bergen is a Swedish-American according to http://www.nordicway.com/search/Famous%20Swedish%20Americans.htm; she is Swedish on her fathers side http://query.nytimes.com/gst/fullpage.html?res9F03EFD91E39F93BA35757C0A962948260)* Bergen, actor and radio performer(Swedish immigrant parents http://www.otrcat.com/bergenmccarthy.htm, NY Times bio calls him a Swedish-American http://query.nytimes.com/gst/fullpage.html?res9F03EFD91E39F93BA35757C0A962948260)* Bergman (Swedish-born)* Bjorlin, soap opera actress(Swedish father. http://boards.sonypictures.com/soaps/showthread.php?t7325 Swedish-Persian, born in the U.S. to a Swedish father, composer/conductor Bjrlin, and a Persian mother)*Ann Borg, American film actress (IMDb.com, Inc.)* Christensen, film actor (http://www.imdb.com/name/nm0159789/bio)* Coburn, film actor* Damon, film actor* Dunst, film actress (Her mother is Swedish, according to)* Englund, film, television and voice actor(http://www.bloody-disgusting.com/feature/213)* Falco, television, film and stage actress(Swedish mother. http://www.telegraph.co.uk/arts/main.jhtml?xml/arts/2002/07/13/bfedie.xml half Swedish; her mother, Judith Anderson, is Swedish)* Franco, film actor (Swedish-American paternal grandmother)(http://www.latinoreview.com/news.php?id217Franco is Portuguese. Im one quarter through my grandfather. My grandfather and then Im also Russian and Swedish. His father is half-Swedish, half Portuguese)* Garbo (Swedish-born), film actress(http://www.sweden.se/templates/cs/Article____11120.aspx http://www.nordicway.com/search/Famous%20Swedish%20Americans.htm Swedish-born, became U.S. citizen)* Griffith, film actress(Daughter of Tippi Hedren. Listed as one of 24 Swedish-Americans at http://www.ancestorsswedish.com/en/products/c326737/p16521373.html; her maternal grandfather was Swedish)* Gyllenhaal, film actor  (his father, director Gyllenhaal, is of partial Swedish heritage http://www.imdb.com/name/nm0350453/bio)* Gyllenhaal, film actress (her father, director Gyllenhaal, is of partial Swedish heritage http://www.imdb.com/name/nm0350454/bio)* Hasso, film actress(http://www.findarticles.com/p/articles/mi_qn4158/is_20020610/ai_n12619438http://movies2.nytimes.com/gst/movies/filmography.html?p_id30946 Swedish born, became U.S. citizen)* Hayward, film actress.(Her maternal grandparents were from Sweden.)*Heder, Actor (Paternal grandparents were Swedish immigrants (MovieWeb))*Hedman, (Swedish-born), American stage actress* Hedren, film actress* Huber, soap opera, television and stage actress* Hutton, film actress* Johnson, actor and wrestler(Swedish-born. http://www.lethargiclad.com/tor/bio.html Swedish-born, became U.S. citizen)* Johnson, film and television actor((Swedish-born father)TomFolio.com: Van Johnson, Author Autograph Sample, Book List Link, Search Books Available)* Kilmer, Actor * Kleevage, stripper and pornographic actress* Kristofferson, country music songwriter, singer and actor(Swedish immigrant grandfather. Listed as one of several Famous Swedish Americans at http://www.nordicway.com/search/Famous%20Swedish%20Americans.htm)* Lagerfelt, stage, film, and television actress* Lee, actor and son of Bruce Lee (His mother, Lee Cadwell, is of part Swedish descent).* Lee, actrees and daughter of Bruce Lee* Linden, film actor* Lindfors, stage and film actress*Lindroth (Swedish-born), screen and stage actress (Helen Lindroth. New York Times. 1956-10-12. pp. 29)* Lucci (mother of part Swedish descent), soap opera actressright|thumb|Ann-Margret* Ann-Margret (Swedish-born), actress and singer(http://www.ropeofsilicon.com/profile.php?id4043; named the Swedish American of the Year, has performed for the King and Queen of Sweden)* Q. Nilsson (Swedish-born), silent film actress* Oland, film actor(perhaps best known for playing Chan.Listed as one of several Swedish-Americans at http://www.nordicway.com/search/Famous%20Swedish%20Americans.htm; Swedish-born)*Olson, Film and television actress(Nancy Olson Biography)* Pfeiffer, actress, maternal grandmother was Swedish.(http://www.talktalk.co.uk/entertainment/film/biography/artist/michelle-pfeiffer/biography/85)* Parker, film actress, star in (TV series).* Richter, Comedic actor, writer, and late night talk show sidekick (www.gregfitzsimmons.com/2010/03/20/greg-and-andy-richter)* Roberts, actress (her grandfathers mother Elin was Swedish)* Stevens (Swedish-born), film and television actress* Per Sullivan (1991 - ) in the Middle actor(Sullivan - Referred to as a Swedish-American at http://shopping.yahoo.com/p:Erik%20Per%20Sullivan:1804503863:pagebiography;_yltAg2aXzk6VR6X1i._vVvykQdDR60B;_yluX3oDMTBucmVlNmdkBF9zAzI4MTMzMTg3BHNlYwNhY3RmZWF0; mother is from Sweden and Per Sullivan speaks Swedish http://www.wvah.com/programs/malcolminthemiddle/erikpersullivan.shtml)* Swanson, film actress(Listed as one of several Swedish-Americans at)* Swanson, film/television actress(Swanson has referred to herself as Swedish  - http://www.maximonline.com/articles/index.aspx?a_id3331; nothing else known on her ancestry)*Tillstrom, puppeteer and the creator of Fran and Ollie* Thurman, Academy Award-nominated film actress and former fashion model(Director Stroman noted that Thurman is really Swedish, citing Thurmans Swedish maternal grandmother http://www.nzherald.co.nz/section/6/story.cfm?c_id6&objectid10367707)* Van Doren, stage, film and television actress* Wahlberg, film actor and producer((brother of Robert and Mark Wahlberg)Ancestry of Mark Wahlberg)* Wahlberg, Academy Award-nominated film actor ((brother of Robert and Donnie Wahlberg)Ancestry of Mark Wahlberg)* Wahlberg, film actor ((brother of Donnie and Mark Wahlberg)Ancestry of Mark Wahlberg)* Wahlgren, Voiceover Actress (Portrait of a Voiceover Actress interview by Ray Sidman, Comic Buyers Guide, #1631 (August 2007), pp. 36-38)* Walsh, actress (http://www.vivaatl.com/index.php?modulewebpage&id9)right|thumb|Gretchen CarlsonOther* Carlson, journalist, co-host of & Friends on News Channel, former Miss America.* Cline, model* Dahl, longtime Chicago radio jockey and talk personality, an influential early jock* Gyllenhaal, director(Gyllenhaal is referred to as a Swedish-American at http://www.artistsnetwork.org/artists/maggiegyllenhaal.html, he has one Swedish great-grandfather)* Hedberg, comedian*Lundquist, sportscaster, currently employed by CBS Sports television* Nelson (Swedish immigrant father), entertainer, radio and television actor*Peterson, vaudeville artist.* von Schlebrgge, former fashion model Mexican in the 1950s and 1960s but of German and Swedish descent. She is the mother of actress Uma Thurman.* Soderbergh, film producer, screenwriter, cinematographer, editor and Oscar-winning director(http://www.jewishjournal.com/home/preview.php?id7899 Noted Im Swedish regarding his ethnicity)right|thumb|Bror Julius Olsson NordfeldtArtists*Viggo Almquist, commercial artist(Frontier Cavalcade, The Dickinson Press, March 14, 1957)*Oscar Borg (Swedish-born),  Painter (known for themes of the Southwestern United States.Carl Oscar Borg, Artist of the American West(by Marlene R. Miller))*F. Carlson  (Swedish-born), Impressionist artist, author of Carlsons Guide to Landscape Painting ((Antiques and Fine Art))*David Edstrom (Swedish-born), sculptor(Hildebrand, Carver Edstrom. David Edstrom, Swedish American Sculptor (Swedish American Genealogist, 10, 1: 1729 March 1990))* Grace, cartoonist(Named one of 24 Famous Swedish Americans at)*Granlund,  sculptor(Paul Granlund  (Gustavus Adolphus College))*Heldner (Swedish-born), American artist(Ask Art. Knute Heldner)*Hesselius (Swedish-born), painter(Richard H. Saunders and Ellen G. Miles, American Colonial Portraits, 1700-1776, Washington, D.C.: National Portrait Gallery, Smithsonian Institution, 1987)*Hesselius,  portraitist (Doud, Richard K., John Hesselius: His Life and Work (Masters Thesis to the University of Delaware, 1963))* Colcord Heurlin (Swedish-born), artist and painter*Janel, artist* Lester Johnson, painter*Krans (Swedish-born), artist and painter (A Prairie Dream Recaptured (American Heritage. by David G. Lowe. October 1969.   Volume 20, Issue 6) http://www.americanheritage.com/articles/magazine/ah/1969/6/1969_6_14_print.shtml)* Karl Larsson (Swedish-born), painter, engraver and sculptor* Larson, illustrator and cartoonist*Julius Olsson Nordfeldt (Swedish-born), Artist (artist known for seascapes and depictions of New Mexicos indigenous culture.Bror Julius Olsson Nordfeldt (Luther College Fine Arts Collection))*Nyholm, artist known primarily as a portrait and landscape painter(Arvid Frederick Nyholm Biography (Luther College  Fine Arts Collection) http://finearts.luther.edu/artists/nyholm%20.html)*Oldenburg (Swedish-born), sculptor, best known for his public art (Biography of Claes Oldenburg)* Sandzn (Swedish-born), painter(http://www.kshs.org/portraits/sandzen_birger.htm Swedish born, immigrated to the United States)* Sundblom, creator of Claus images for the Company(http://www.simpletoremember.com/vitals/Christmas_TheRealStory.htm Swedish-American; parents were Swedish)* August Swanson (Swedish father), visual artist, painter* Tenggren (Swedish-born), illustrator*Widforss (Swedish-born),  artist specializing in landscapes (Gunnar Widforss Biography (Californiawatercolor.com))Engineers* Oscar Rosaen (Swedish born), mechanical engineerhttp://patents.justia.com/inventor/BORJEOROSAEN.html born in Tierp, Uppsala, Sweden * Alexanderson (Swedish born), electrical engineer(http://www.bookrags.com/sciences/earthscience/alexanderson-ernst-frederik-werner--mee-01.html born in Uppsala, Sweden, immigrated to the U.S.)* David Anderson, physicist(Second generation Swedish-American, according to)* Carlson, physicist, inventor, and patent attorney(Referred to as Swedish-American at)* Ericsson (Swedish born), inventor and mechanical engineer(http://web.mit.edu/invent/iow/ericsson.html born at Lngbanshyttan in Vrmland, Sweden, primarily active in the U.S.)* Jakobsson (Swedish-born), computer security researcher and entrepreneur* Johnson (Swedish-born parents), aircraft engineer and aeronautical innovator* B. Johnson (Swedish-born), electrical engineer and physicist* Kelly Johnson, widely considered one of the most talented and prolific aircraft design-engineers(http://www.nap.edu/html/biomems/cjohnson.html The seventh of nine children of impoverished Swedish immigrants)* Nyquist (Swedish born), engineer, important contributor to theory(http://www.bath.ac.uk/news/articles/archive/nyquistsuite.html; immigrant, born in Nilsby, Sweden)* W. Nystrom (Swedish born), engineer(Referred to as Swedish-American at)* T. Seaborg, Nobel Prize laureate, chemist prominent in the discovery and isolation of ten transuranic elements including plutonium, americium, curium, berkelium, californium, einsteinium, fermium, mendelevium, nobelium and seaborgium, which was named in his honor(http://nobelprize.org/chemistry/laureates/1951/seaborg-bio.html named Swedish American of the Year by Vasa Order of America)* Hugo Linder (Swedish descent), electrical engineer, founding member of The National Academy of EngineeringEntrepreneurs and businesspeople* Amdahl, computer architect and entrepreneur*Brynteson  (Swedish-born),  Alaskan Mining Executive (The Nome Gold Rush (by Larry Gedney. Geophysical Institute, University of Alaska Fairbanks))* Carlson, founder of Carlson*G. Cromwell, Texas based oil and aviation pioneer(The Handbook of Texas (Texas State Historical Association))*Erlander  (Swedish-born), founder of Rockford Union Furniture Company(Rockford Small Business Collection(Rockford, Illinois Regional History Center))*Ernest O. Estwing (Swedish-born), founder of Estwing Manufacturing Company(Estwing Tour)*Friden (Swedish Born) Founder of Inc.*Hedstrom (Swedish-born), co-founder of the Indian  Manufacturing Company(A Brief History of Indian Motorcycle Dick Scotts Indian Motorcycle Detroit)*Hoving (Swedish-born),  head of Tiffany & Company* Lilly, philanthropist and founder of Lilly and Company*Lindblom (Swedish-born), Alaskan Mining Executive (*Magnus Lindgren (Swedish-born), Shipping executive(The Swedish Element in Illinois: Survey of the Past Seven Decades (by Ernst Wilhelm Olson, Swedish-American Biographical Association. 1917))* R. Lindgren, Banking executive with Bank of Chicago. Founder of & Lindgren banking firm in Chicago.* Erik Jonsson (Swedish immigrant parents),(A tribute to Erik Jonsson) co-founder and former president of Texas Instruments Incorporated, of Dallas and philanthropist* Emanuel Kallen (Swedish-born), Motors executive*Matson (Swedish-born), founder of Navigation Company(Pacific Coast and Exposition Biographies (by John P. Young. Chronicle Publishing Company San Francisco, California, 1915) http://www.sfgenealogy.com/sf/bio1.htm)* W. Nordstrom (Swedish-born), co-founder of the Nordstrom department store chain*August Peterson (Swedish-born),  Business executive and founder of the American Hospital.(About P.A. Peterson (P.A. Peterson Center for Health))*A. Peterson, (Swedish-born), President and CEO of Bank of America(Rudolph A. Peterson, 98; Extended Global Reach of Bank of America (Los Angeles Times.  December 16, 2003) http://articles.latimes.com/2003/dec/16/local/me-peterson16)*Ralston, Co-founder of Aero Air* Stenbeck (Swedish father, American mother), businesswoman* Strandlund (Swedish-born), inventor and entrepreneur(http://www.wosu.org/tv/lustron/strandlund.php)* Sundback (Swedish-born), inventor, commercialized the zipper, son-in-law of colleague Peter Aronson*A. Swanson (Swedish-born), founder of Swanson (David Harris, Swanson Saga: End of a Dream (The New York Times, 9 September 1979))*M. Swenson (Swedish-born), founder of the SMS Ranches(S. M. Swenson and the Development of the SMS Ranches (Swenson, Gail. University of Texas, 1960))*Nils F. Testor (Swedish-born), founder of Corporation(55 Years at Testor, Rockford Register Star, May 12, 1994)* R. Walgreen, founder of Walgreens, one of Americas largest pharmacy chains. Swedish born parents.(http://hd.se/familj/slaktforskning/2008/11/26/slaktresa-i-kandisarnas-varld/)*Rudolph Walgreen, Jr., President of Walgreens*R. Walgreen III, President of Walgreens*Wickman, founder of Lines, Inc.right|thumb|Buzz AldrinMilitary* Aldrin, pilot and astronaut who was the Lunar Module Pilot on 11, the first lunar landing(http://www.carlson.com/press_releases/07_28_03.cfm was named Swedish-American of the Year)* I. Bong, Army Air Force and of Honor recipient* Burke, Navy Admiral* A. Dahlgren, Navy Rear Admiral*Ernest Dahlquist,  United States Army four-star general(Alford, Kenneth D. Nazi Plunder: Great Treasure Stories of World War II. York: Da Capo Press, 2003. ISBN 978-0-306-81241-5)* G. Gibson (Swedish-born ), Army soldier and of Honor recipient* Hanson, States Army General*G. Johnson,  Navy Admiral*Linn (Swedish-born), Captain in the States Navy (Corley, Robert G. and Marvin Yeomans Whiting, editors (July 1979) Dedication. Journal of the Birmingham Historical Society. Vol. 6, No. 2)*Malmborg, colonel in the Army(The Story of the Fifty-fifth Regiment Illinois Volunteer Infantry in the Civil War, 1861-1865 (A Committee of the Regiment, W. J. Coulter. 1887))* Momsen, States Navy Admiral* Thord-Gray (Swedish-born), mercenary soldierright|thumb|Kris KristoffersonMusic* Anderson (Swedish immigrant parents), composer* Andersson, Singer-songwriter* Bjrling (Swedish-born), opera singer* Blomstedt, orchestral conductor*Fremstad (Swedish-born), mezzo-soprano and soprano opera singer (The Rainbow Bridge (a biography of Olive Fremstad) (Mary Watkins Cushing, G. P. Putnams Sons, 1954. Library of Congress Catalog card number 54:10494))* Hammarskjld, composer* Hanson, composer, conductor, educator and music theorist(Referred to as Swedish-American at http://www.everyculture.com/multi/Sr-Z/Swedish-Americans.html; Swedish parents)*Christer Hennix, composer* Hill (Swedish born), songwriter, labor activist and member of the Industrial Workers of the World(http://mysongbook.de/msb/songs/j/joehill.html immigrant from Gstrikland, Sweden)* Jones III (Swedish-born mother), composer, music producer, film producer and author* Jorgensen, writer and singer for Armor For Sleep* Kristofferson, influential country music songwriter, singer and actor(Listed as one of several Famous Swedish Americans at)* Lars, rapper* Lee, lead singer of Evanescence* Lee (Swedish/Norwegian grandparents),(Peggy Lee Tribute)  jazz singer and songwriter* Levang, musician* Lindberg, singer-songwriter for the American rock band Pennywise* Lindquest (18911984), voice teacher* Lofgren, singer-songwriter, and multi-instrumentalist, member of Springsteens Street Band* Moore, singer-songwriter*Nelson, singer* Nilsson, singer-songwriter (http://www.imdb.com/name/nm0632223/bio)*Noren,  jazz drummer and vocalist* Rundgren, singer-songwriter* Slick, singer-songwriter* Thomasson, singer and guitarist* Uppman (Swedish parents), opera singer* Tjader (Swedish parents), jazz musician* Varnay (Swedish-born), opera singer* Vestine, guitarist, son of Harry Vestine*Wilson, lead guitarist of Beach Boys(Of the great-grandparents of the Wilson brothers, one was born in Sweden)*Wilson, lead drummer of Beach Boys(right|thumb|Mamie Eisenhowerright|thumb|Tipper GorePolitics and public service* L. Andersen, 30th of Minnesota(MNHS.ORG : Governors of Minnesota | Elmer L. (Lee) Andersen)* Elmer Anderson, 28th of Minnesota(MNHS.ORG : Governors of Minnesota | C. (Clyde) Elmer Anderson)* B. Anderson, U.S. Representative from Illinois and an Independent candidate in the 1980 presidential election* Anderson, 33rd of Minnesota, from January 4, 1971 to December 29, 1976(http://www.mnaflcio.org/humanrts.htm is Swedish Consul Emeritus)* H. Andresen, U.S. Representative from Minnesota* Bergland, U.S. Representative from Minnesota, 20th States Secretary of Agriculture* A. A. Burnquist, 19th of Minnesota(MNHS.ORG : Governors of Minnesota | J. A. A. (Joseph Alfred Arner) Burnquist)* H.W. Bush, Former president of the USA(http://www.aftonbladet.se/nyheter/article10793671.ab)* W. Bush, Former president of the USA(* Carlson, 37th of Minnesota.(Described as a Swedish-American at)*Richard Chindblom,  U.S. Representative from Illinois(bioguide.congress.gov)* Olson Eberhart, 17th of Minnesota* Eisenhower, wife of D. Eisenhower and Lady of the United States from 1953 to 1961(Mamie Doud Eisenhower  (The Chronicle. American Swedish Historical Foundation: Winter 1954-1955. Volume 1, Number 4. Philadelphia PA. : 1955))* Frankson, 22nd Governor of Minnesota* Freeman, 29th of Minnesota, 16th States Secretary of Agriculture (MNHS.ORG : Governors of Minnesota | Orville L. (Lothrop) Freeman)*Gore, wife of Vice President Gore(Not Politics As Usual (Nordic Reach .  July 1, 2002))* Granholm, Governor of the state of Michigan.(Is of Finnish-Swedish ancestry.http://www.loffe.net/)* Isakson (2nd generation) - Republican Senator from Georgia since 2005.(Johnny Isakson, United States Senator from Georgia)* Albert Johnson, 16th of Minnesota(named as one of 24 Famous Swedish Americans at)* B. Johnson (Swedish-born), 70th of Vermont* Johnson (Swedish-born), U.S. Senator from Minnesota*Alexis Johnson,  United States diplomat* LeVander, 32nd of Minnesota(MNHS.ORG : Governors of Minnesota: Harold (Karl Harold Phillip) LeVander)* John Lind (Swedish-born), 14th Governor of Minnesota(http://www.mnhs.org/people/governors/gov/gov_16.htm ethnic background: Swedish)* August Lindbergh, Congressman for 6th District of Minnesota from 1907 to 1917(http://www.mnhs.org/library/findaids/P1675.html born in Stockholm, Sweden)* Lindsten, 32nd Governor of Minnesota* Lofgren, Member of the U.S. House of Representatives from California* Lundeen, Senator from Minnesota* Lungren, Member of the U.S. House of Representatives from California* G. Magnuson, United States Senator from Washington* Albin Walter Norblad, Sr (Swedish-born), 19th of Oregon (father of Albin Walter Norblad, Jr, grandfather of Albin Walter Norblad III)* Albin Walter Norblad, Jr, Member of the U.S. House of Representatives from Oregon (son of Albin Walter Norblad, Sr, father of Albin Walter Norblad III)* Albin Walter Norblad III, attorney, judge of the Circuit Court (son of Albin Walter Norblad, Jr, grandson of Albin Walter Norblad, Sr)* J. Newell The former United States Ambassador to Sweden (19851989)and a U.S. Assistant Secretary of State for International Organization Affairs (19821985). Former assistant secretary of State for President Ronald Reagan(http://www.ldschurchnews.com/articles/19455/He-thawed-relations-between-nations.html)* Olson, 29th of California* B. Olson, 22nd of Minnesota* Lowell Olson, Jr., politician and diplomat(Appointed The Swedish-American of 2002 by the Order of America http://www.saccny.org/main/scholarship/donors/olson/)* Rehnquist, lawyer, jurist and a political figure, who served as an Associate Justice on the Supreme Court of the United States and later as the Chief Justice of the United States(Named Swedish-American of the Year)* Frederic St. Sure, States District Court Judge(http://linkstothepast.com/waukesha/pinelakebios.php#stsure)* Skoglund, socialist(http://www.ilwu19.com/history/loss.htm Swedish immigrant)* Stenholm, Member of the U.S. House of Representatives from Texas* Sundquist, 47th of Tennessee* Wallgren, 13th of Washington, Member of the U.S. House of Representatives and the U.S. Senator from Washington* Warren, California district attorney of Alameda County, the 30th Governor of California, and the 14th Chief Justice of the United States (from 1953 to 1969)(Listed as one of FAMOUS SWEDISH AMERICANS at)  Was of Swedish and Norwegian decent* Youngdahl,(MNHS.ORG : Governors of Minnesota | Luther W. (Wallace) Youngdahl) 27th of Minnesota* Youngdahl, Member of the U.S. House of Representatives from MinnesotaReligious personalities*Borg, religious author*Carlson, medical missionary of the Covenant Church*Carlsson (Swedish-born),  Lutheran minister and one of the founders and President of the Synod(Christian Cyclopedia. The Lutheran Church--Missouri Synod)*G. William Dahl (Swedish-born), Lutheran minister, Founder of Bethphage Inner Mission in Axtell, Nebraska.*Alexis Edgren (Swedish-born), Baptist Minister, Founder of Bethel University in Paul, MN.(Whose Shoulders Do We Stand? by Virgil Olson, Professor Emeritus, Bethel University)*Paul Esbjrn (Swedish-born), Lutheran minister and one of the  founders of the Synod of the Lutheran church*Hasselquist (Swedish-born), Lutheran minister and founding president of the Synod*Jansson (Swedish-born), pietist leader*Nelson, missionary, linguist and lexicographer associated with the Adventist Church*Norelius (Swedish-born), Lutheran minister and one of the founders and President of the Synod  (http://www.worldcatlibraries.org/wcpa/top3mset/63a11d35f35bbdae.html Swedish-born)*Nyvall (Swedish-born), immigrant and church leader who helped shape the Covenant Church and establish Park University(Swedish American Historical Quarterly - 1986-1997)*Rudman (Swedish-born), pioneer Lutheran minister and pastor of Dei (Old Swedes) Church(Andreas Rudman and his Family (by Dr. Peter Stebbins Craig . Swedish Colonial News, Volume 2, Number 1 . Winter 2000) http://www.colonialswedes.org/Forefathers/Rudman.html)*Aaron Swensson, Lutheran minister and President of Bethany College*Unonius (Swedish-born), Episcopalian clergyman and immigrant(http://www.townofmerton.com/abouttown.html)right|thumb|Glenn T. SeaborgScience*David Anderson, physicist who won 1936 Prize in Physics(Carl David Anderson biography)*Elof Boodin (Swedish-born),  philosopher and educator*Elmer Ekblaw, geologist and botanist and college professor.* Enflo, University Professor of Mathematics at State University* R. Lindberg, malacologist, professor of integrative biology at the of California, Berkeley*T. Seaborg, scientist who won the 1951 Prize in Chemistry (Seaborg biography)* Tegmark, Cosmologist and Associate Professor of Physics at MIT.* Lindblad-Toh, Co-Director of Genome Sequencing and Analysis Program, Institute* Harry Vestine, geophysicist and meteorologistright|thumb|Phil MickelsonSports* Burnquist, skateboarder* Carlstrom, Major League shortstop for the Red Sox*Cederstrom, umpire in Major League Baseball* Enberg, sportscaster* Faust, stadium organist for the White Sox franchise in League Baseball*Gustafson, Professional athlete with the Dodgers.* Hamill, figure skater*Rudolph Emil Hagberg, American football offensive lineman in the National Football League.* Hellman, draughts player* Holmgren, head coach of the Seahawks(http://www.thegoal.com/players/coaching/holmgren_mike/holmgran_mike.html Raised in a Swedish-American family)* Chester Johnston, former professional American football player* Johnson, pitcher and three time triple crown winner for the Washington Nationals/Senators from 1907-1927 (Johnson was sometimes called Swede)* Mataya Laurance, professional pool player* Lindberg, athlete* Lindros, hockey player* Lindstrom, baseball player* Lindstrom, baseball player* Louganis, diver* Lund, football player.(University of Minnesota Gophers)*Mickelson, American professional golfer*Nils. V. Swede Nelson(Award Winners - Nils V. Swede Nelson)* Lundin, ice hockey player * Noah, basketball player* Nystrom, icehockey player*Andrew James Oberlander, All-American halfback football player* Olson (Swedish father), boxer* Charles August Risberg, baseball player* Samuelsson (Swedish-born), ice hockey player* Sundquist, bobsledder and football manager* Theslof, first American soccer player to play in Europe, grandson of Hultn.*Adolph Frederick Youngstrom, football player.Writers* Algren, writer* Jack Anderson, journalist* Bradbury, science fiction and fantasy(http://www.nordicway.com/search/Famous%20Swedish%20Americans.htm listed as one of FAMOUS SWEDISH AMERICANS)*Cedering, poet*Carl Johan Gustafson (Swedish-born), writer* Davis Hanson, military historian, columnist, political essayist and former classics professorsusan* A. Mellander, (Gus), historian, columnist, political commentator, university administrator, college president. Honored by the United States House of Representatives, 1985.* Morris, writer(referred to as a Swedish-American at)* Nelson, political columnist* Olson, writer and environmentalist* Ostrom, writer and professor* Sandburg, poet, historian, novelist, balladeer and folklorist(*Skarstedt (Swedish-born), first author editor, and newspaper publisher(An Immigrants American Odyssey: A Biography of Ernst Skarstedt (Emory Lindquist, Rock Island, Illinois: Augustana Historical Society, 1974))* Vizenor, novelist and literary critic.(The son of a Chippewa house painter and a Swedish-American mother http://ls.berkeley.edu/art-hum/framing/old/chapter3/vizenor.html)Colonial people* Andersson (Swedish-born), Resident of Sweden* Bronck (Swedish-born), Settler after whom the York City borough of Bronx was named*Gunnarsson (Swedish-born), Resident of Sweden* Matson (Swedish-born), Resident of Sweden* Plsson Mullica (Swedish-born), Resident of Sweden* Gunnarsson Rambo (Swedish-born), Resident of Sweden* Torkillus (Swedish-born), Resident of SwedenEducators* Akerlof, Economist* Barton, educator and historian* Lee Cadwell, teacher and the widow of Lee*Hjalmar Edgren (Swedish-born), linguistics and university professor  (The Founders of the Graduate College (by Robert Knoll, Professor Emeritus of English. University of Nebraska-Lincoln January 13, 2000)http://www.unl.edu/scarlet/v10n01/v10n01research.html)*Claes Gsta Ryn,  academic and educatorOther* J. Alexanderson, last captain of the United States* O. Andersson, publisher* Asplund, Titanic survivor*M. Doud, mother of Eisenhower(* Fornander, journalist, judge and ethnologist* S. Forsberg, publisher and diplomat* Lindbergh, pioneering aviator famous for piloting the first solo non-stop flight across the Ocean in 1927(Named as one of 24 Famous Swedish Americans at)* Lindbergh, aviator*Lundberg (Swedish-born), engraver  (Wentz, Paul (February 1950). Engraving Pin Heads. American Horologist & Jeweler)*Buell Halvor Quain, ethnologist*Thord-Gray (Swedish-born),  adventurer, ethnologist and linguist (Gustaf Hallstrms fotografisamling (Forskningsarkivet)) See also *of SwedesReferences
13954403
Xinjiang_Xinxin_Mining_Industry_Company
Xinjiang Xinxin Mining Industry Company (), or in short form Xinxin Mining or Xinxin, is the second largest electrolyted nickel in China. It has 30-year extraction rights of copper and nickel mines in County, Xinjiang. Its products include metals, cobalt, metals, gold, silver, platinum and palladium.It was listed in the Kong Stock Exchange on 12 October, 2007.External links*Xinjiang Xinxin Miningzh:
13964032
Gortnahoe
thumb|Church in GortnahoeGortnahoe () is a village in Tipperary, Ireland. It is located on the R689 road  south of Urlingford, Kilkenny. It is  southeast of the N8 Dublin - Cork road. Gortnahoe, pronounced Gurt/na/hoo by the locals, is part of the united parish of Glegoole-Gortnahoe.  History When you travel from Gortnahoe to Glengoole you expect to find Glengoole after Ballysloe, but the stranger finds that the sign for the next village reads New Birmingham.  He also finds that the village is neither New nor Birmingham.   There must be history here and there is.  It takes you back to the beginning of the 19th century, when the local landlord, Vere Hunt, could see great potential for the development of coal mining.  The plans were to build a city for coal mining in the Slievardagh Hills.  In reality it never got to the stage of full development, so you can find the remains of a gaol, which never held a prisoner and the extensive diary of Vere Hunt, giving a vivid account of how Glengoole got the name New Birmingham, but failed to reach its full potential.It is not the only place in the parish that got its name from another country.  In the townslands of New Park and Bawnleigh we have Palatine Street, called after a province in Germany, which now brings us back to the eighteenth century.  It was Sir William Barker, the landlord in Kilcooley, who offered protection and property to some families who left the Palatine on the borders of Germany and France, settled in England and later came to New Park and Bawnlea.  In the Griffith Valuations of 1850 we find that there was a Methodist Chapel and a Baptist Chapel in that area.  Descendants of those families still farm those areas and form an important part of the parish and of the Church of Ireland.Not far from Palatine Street is the Wellington Monument, with the inscription Erected in August 1817 in the eightieth year of his age by Sir William Barker, in honour of his grace the duke of Wellington and of his glorious victory over the French at Waterloo on the 15th June 1815.   When we stop to think about the placing of our parish on the map of Ireland you notice that it is right on the border between Munster and Leinster and it is at the end of the valley, leading from Kilkenny into the plains of Munster, a gap important for control and protection.  This may be the reason why we find the ruins of a constabulary barracks at Longford Pass North or Durrihies.  We are now going further back into history, because this was very likely the site of the ancient Celtic Monastery of Doire Mor, the monastery established by St. Colmn, which continued with the other Celtic Monasteries of Liath Mr, Doire na Flan and Derryvilla to serve the religious needs of the people.With the decline of the Celtic Monasteries and the arrival of the Cistercians in Ireland in the 18th century, the Cistercian Monastery of Kilcooley was established by the monks from Jerpoint in 1184.  The monastery continued to proper until the disestablishment of the monasteries by King Henry VIII in 1539.  During this time there were also the Church centres of Boulick and Fennor.  All the townslands were divided between those three parishes.The magnificent ruins of the monastery of Kilcooley point to its important and the wonderful stonework.  A great deal of this work was done by the OTunneys, especially the tomb of Pierce Butler of Lismolin and a number of other headstones.  The carved slabs of the Crucifixion, the abbot, St. Christopher and the mermaid are tributes to their genius.  The beautiful East Window is the reminder of how capable the stonemasons were to be able to design and build what has lasted for so many centuries.  The church that was at Ballinalackin in Glengoole was an outchurch from Kilcooley. Fennor, like Kilcooley and Boulick is mentioned in the Papal Taxation lists of 1291.  The Church is dedicated to the Nativity of the Blessed Virgin Mary.  When Archbishop James Butler visited the parish in 1752, the church at Fennor does not appear to have been in use.  The ruins in Fennor cemetery include the ruins of the Church of Ireland Church and the ruins of the Catholic Church and the residence of the priests together.In Boulick we have the remains of a motte, Tower house and church.  Boulick was an important settlement from earliest times.  It was a parish as far back as 1291.  The church in Boulick also has a protective tower.  When a grave was being dug underneath the tower at the end of the 19th century two bells were found underground.  Those bells were given to Archbishop Croke and at the time of the restoration of Holycross Abbey they were hung in the tower of the abbey.During the 18th century the Penal Laws made it difficult for Catholics to practise their religion and priests were scarce throughout Ireland.  The outcome was that in 1743 the parishes of Kilcooley, Boulick and Fennor were amalgamated with Urlingford and Graine.  The amalgamation continued until Fr. Michael Meighan became P.P. of Gortanhoe and Glengoole in 1805.  It was Fr. Michael Meighan who built a new church in Glengoole in 1815.  This was replaced on the same site by the present church which was built in 1976.  The present church in Gortnahoe was also built  by Fr Michael Meighan in 1820.  This Church has undergone extensive renovations in 1923, 197475 and most recently in 2008.School developments have also been very much part of the history of our parish.  At the time of Catholic Emancipation in 1829 the government launched a major enquiry into the provision of education and in that report we find that there were twelve schools in the parish, organised and funded in different ways.  Nine of them were Roman Catholic Schools and three were Protestant Schools.  It was in 1831 that the Board of National Education was established.  This marked a big development in the funding of education by the government.  Since 1829 there have been many changes and amalgamations, until the present number of schools in the parish is three, Gortnahoe, Ballysloe and Glengoole.  There are many other areas of life that go to make up our history, but we hope this short essay gives some information of interest and value.See also*List of towns and villages in IrelandExternal linksru:
13985654
Poker_tools
Poker tools are a variety of software or web-based applications that allow the statistical analysis of poker players, games or tournaments.Hand convertersPoker hand converters allow players to take text-based poker history files from online cardrooms and convert them into formats friendly to the eye and suitable for posting on online message boards. Hand converters are often used to show played hands to other players for analysis and discussion. Depending on the converter used, the output may include the pot size per betting round, blind level, seating order, and stack sizes. Most online cardrooms store played hands on the computer of the player, allowing players to analyze and track their own performance or to discuss strategy with other players. Statistics a player can track include showdown percentage, frequency of aggression, percentage of check/raise etc.(Poker SignUp Codes: Poker Tracking) Most major poker sites such as Tilt Poker, PokerStars and PartyPoker provide players with hand history files, while a few such as the Playtech network offer hand histories, but not in text file format.In addition to using hand history files to analyze and improve an individuals game,(Full Tilt Poker: Hand History) they can also be used to gather statistical data about opponents, both those a player has played against and even opponents never faced.(Explaining Winning Poker: A Data Mining Approach) Whether the latter constitutes cheating depends on the Use Policy (AUP) of the cardroom. Sharing the raw hand history files is generally considered collusion and a violation of the AUP.(PokerStars: Prohibited Online Poker Software FAQ)  Even though some sites dont offer readily available hand history files, you can usually request a transcript by e-mail.The first hand history converter, PokerStat, was introduced in 2001. Numerous software products and web-based tools now offer similar functionality.Odds calculatorsNumerous programs allow people to run hot and cold simulations where two to ten hands are run against each other to show the approximate winning percentage for each.  The first such simulator, Poker Probe, was invented by Caro in 1990.(Poker1.com About Mike Caro)Tournament databasesSeveral commercial websites data mine the results of online poker cardroom tournaments and then offer rankings and return on investment statistics for players who have participated in these events.Game softwareSeveral commercial companies offer personal game software products where players can play against a table full of programmable robot opponents.BotsPokerbots are computer programs that play online poker disguised as a human opponent. Online poker rooms normally prohibit their use.(PartyPoker.com: PartyGamings Unfair Advantage Policy)Datamining toolsDatamining tools, also known as hand grabbers, record the game play information of online poker games without requiring the user to play in the game. This data is usually stored as a text or XML file in a format which can be parsed by analysis tools. Note that in science and market research the term datamining is used for the act of extracting knowledge from data, not for collecting raw data. See also *of poker terms*of poker related topics*strategyNotes( External links *Hulpprogramma
13993722
Kevin_Krueger
Kevin Krueger is a Liberal Member of the Legislative Assembly, in the province of Columbia, Canada. He represented the riding of Thompson from 1996 to 2009, and currently represents Thompson as of 2009.()He is a member of the Council of British Columbia as the Minister of Tourism, Culture and the Arts and has previously served as Minister of Community Development and Minister of State for Mining.(http://www.gov.bc.ca/premier/cabinet_ministers/) References 
